,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,Data Engineer - Clutch,$71k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"Primary Location: 3390 Peachtree Rd NE, Atlanta, GA, USA

Division: Cox Automotive

Job Level: Individual Contributor

Travel: No

Schedule: Full-time

Shift: Day Job

Requisition Number: 206818

Do you enjoy enabling business teams to make good decisions with data? The work
you do as a Data Engineer focused on Business Intelligence and Reporting will be
instrumental in providing dashboards and Key Performance Indicators (KPIs) to our
SaaS customers. This is a technical role requiring a combination of strong software
engineering skills and data visualization and charting skills including defining and
maintaining definitions of key business metrics.

What You'll Do

Build and maintain dashboards leveraging Business Intelligence tools such as Sisense, Power BI etc.
Help build systems and processes to get the data into a format where it can be queried easily for insights
Spend part of your time consulting and providing guidance with both internal teams and customers
Ensure that gold standard dashboards providing key metrics are always well maintained and accurate
Define and implement Extract Transform Load (ETL) jobs on data for internal and external data sources
Qualifications:

Must Haves

2-5 years experience working with data
Expert SQL skills
Intermediate Python programming knowledge
Detail oriented and passionate about keeping the dashboards accurate and communicating with business users

Nice to Haves

Delivering software working in an Agile environment
Experience with best in class commercial Data Warehousing and Business Intelligence tools
Experience with data warehouse design including understanding Star schema and other design approaches
Experience with Amazon Web Services or other Cloud providers
BS in Computer Science or equivalent

Who We Are

About Cox Automotive

There’s nothing ordinary about Cox Automotive. We are people of every background driven by our passion for mobility, innovation, client success and community outreach. We make buying, selling and owning (or simply using) cars easier for everyone. Touching more than 40,000 clients across five continents, we bring together the best brands and the best teams to propel the automotive industry forward. Some of those team members work for our iconic consumer brands like Autotrader and Kelley Blue Book, while others are creating the future of automotive at industry-facing brands like Dealer.com, Manheim and vAuto.

About Cox

We are the Cox family of businesses. We’ve been making our mark since 1898 by building and evolving world-class businesses, staying true to our values, and encouraging top talent to always look for growth and impact while building a career with us. Our primary divisions – Cox Communications and Cox Automotive – are driving a new wave of innovation, powering smart cities with powerhouse broadband communications and pioneering greener, more progressive transportation alternatives for individuals and fleet operators. We’re also expanding into new spaces like cleantech and healthcare to rev up our momentum toward building a better future for the next generation. We’re looking for the talent today who will be our leaders tomorrow. Sound intriguing? Learn more about where we are today, where we hope you’ll be going with us, and the common purpose that unites us at coxenterprises.com.

Cox is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer - All qualified applicants/employees will receive consideration for employment without regard to that individual’s age, race, color, religion or creed, national origin or ancestry, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, physical or mental disability, veteran status, genetic information, ethnicity, citizenship, or any other characteristic protected by law.

Statement to ALL Third-Party Agencies and Similar Organizations: Cox accepts resumes only from agencies with which we formally engage their services. Please do not forward resumes to our applicant tracking system, Cox employees, Cox hiring manager, or send to any Cox facility. Cox is not responsible for any fees or charges associated with unsolicited resumes.",3.6,"Cox Automotive
3.6","Atlanta, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,2014,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
1,"Data Engineer, Analytics Lead (Ad Monetization and Delivery)",$153k-$249k (Glassdoor Est.),"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.

In this role, you will work closely with the Facebook App Monetization (FAM) team whose mission is to build people-first experiences that give economic opportunity and access to everyone. You will be responsible for building a strong data foundation, data infrastructure and architecture in the FB App Monetization (FAM) Ecosystems team that will help the analytics, product, engineering and FAM leadership to drive decisions and build products with a holistic view and long term optimization founded in data. You will work on some of our most challenging problems that cut across our products, solve for a number of our teams, and set high level direction for the organization.
Drive vision, data strategy for FAM Ecosystems.
Plan, build roadmap for longer data strategies, data foundation, data assets to drive longer term needs for FAM Ecosystems.
Define goals and technical direction within FAM and participate in defining team goals and technical direction within organization.
Design, build and own the optimal data processing architecture and systems for new data and ETL pipelines, dashboards and experimentation metrics.
Build core datasets as well as scalable and fault-tolerant pipelines.
Build data anomaly detection, data quality checks, and optimize pipelines for ideal compute and storage.
Define and own the data engineering roadmap for long term Ecosystems data foundation.
Collaborate with cross-functional partners including data scientists, product managers and Software Engineers and FAM leadership to design and develop end to end data assets.
Work with data infrastructure teams to suggest improvements and influence their roadmap.
Recommend improvements and modifications to existing data and ETL pipelines.
Communicate and influence strategies and processes around data modeling and architecture to multi-functional groups and leadership.
Drive internal process improvements and automating manual processes for data quality and SLA management.
4+ years experience in the data warehouse space.
4+ years experience working with either a MapReduce or an MPP system.
7+ years experience in writing complex SQL and ETL processes.
7+ years experience with schema design and dimensional data modeling.
4+ years experience with object-oriented programming languages.
BS/BA in Technical Field, Computer Science or Mathematics.
Knowledge in Python or Java.
Experience in analyzing data to identify deliverables, gaps, and inconsistencies.
Experience mentoring team members in their careers.
Experience effectively collaborating and communicating complex technical concepts to a broad variety of audiences.
Knowledge of monetization or advertisement world for consumer products.
Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,"Facebook
4.5","Menlo Park, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2004,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
2,Senior Site Civil Engineer / Project Manager,$76k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"Page 1 of 3

Position Description Senior Engineer III

Department: Engineering Reports To: Team Leader Effective Date: 10-22-01

Location: All Pay Type:  Hourly  Salaried  Non-Exempt  Exempt

Schedule:  Full time  Part time

I. Purpose: What is the overall purpose and objective of this position, why does it exist?

This position functions as a senior member of a RAI client services team, with the purpose of facilitating the completion of assigned projects and tasks by providing leadership, direction, training and mentoring to junior staff within the team organization, and coordination and cooperation with the client and other teams & personnel within the firm. The objective of this position is to deliver construction plans that a) clearly convey to the client and his contractors the implementation of the land plan, b) meet the requirements of our agreement as to type and quality of services and timeliness of completion, c) meet the approval of local, state and federal governing authorities and d) meet company goals of team and firm profitability.

II. Essential Duties: What would someone have to be able to do to achieve the desired results of this job?
Plan, organize and lead the daily engineering activities of assigned staff in the accomplishment of client project tasks. Identify and manage priorities of assigned staff to meet client, team and corporate goals. May function in a lead position with respect to actual accomplishment of tasks and/or may function as technical consultant to other team members.
Function as a contact point for the client concerning the engineering aspects of his/her project, including conflict resolution, with RAI. Facilitate good communications among the client, all RAI departments and team groups and applicable governing bodies.
With the Team Leader, attend and participate in initial client meetings regarding new project proposals as well as new project kickoffs to ensure a clear understanding of the complete project in order to be able to effectively contribute to the preparation of proposals and facilitate the proper completion of assigned tasks.
Assist Team Leader in preparing proposals for clients including a clear and complete scope of work, pricing, time schedule and resource requirements (both RAI and subconsultants).
Review and approve a) the technical approach to project tasks and b) intermediate & finished work product to ensure that they meet objectives of client while adhering to local, state and federal laws. Also assure compliance with company quality assurance/control standards.
Review the research and data necessary for the design of the project., such as zoning conditions, latest design standards, existing utility information, environmental issues, topo, etc.
Coordinate with applicable government agencies and attend meetings as appropriate to assure that client projects comply with agency regulations and are approved by them.
Ensure that additional work requested by the client that is outside the scope of the original contract is identified, and that change orders are issued and approved by the client before this additional work is done.
Perform initial QA/QC and final review of the design documents if engineer of record.
Page 2 of 3

Position Description Senior Engineer III
In cooperation with the Team Leader, assure that all internal paperwork such as project proposals, contracts, budget reviews, time card reviews & submittals and invoicing follow established company policy, procedures and standards, and are accomplished in a timely and efficient manner. Assist Team Leader in reviewing and approving field and office timecards daily to ensure correct allocation of time to projects or overhead accounts.
Supervise and lead assigned staff in accomplishing their essential duties related to client and government agency communication & relationships and RAI internal paperwork.
Participate in the establishment and implementation of staff training & professional development programs, and lead in affecting daily technical and administrative on-the-job skills training of assigned staff. Function as a mentor to assigned staff.
Ensure that staff is aware of and abides by all appropriate safety and loss prevention guidelines and policies.
As directed by the Team Leader, participate in the routine and special evaluations of staff work. Participate in performance reviews; hiring, promotion, discipline and termination decisions and other appropriate Human Resource functions affecting assigned staff.
Participate in the marketing efforts of the firm by ensuring that, in the course of conducting normal project tasks, clients are made aware of all the related services that the firm offers.
Be alert to information about potential upcoming projects that might require RAI services, and alert appropriate firm personnel to pursue.
May function as a Project Engineer when one is absent or when the team is too small to support a separate Project Engineer function.
React to change productively and handle other essential tasks as assigned.
III. General Description: Describe this job as you would to someone who has never done it.

This senior level client services position functions as a part of a client services team, and is responsible for organizing, leading and managing a staff of junior level technical personnel in the production of construction plans that can be used by clients and their contractors for the development and construction of projects. This includes participating in a) initial meetings and proposals, b) accomplishment of project tasks, c) coordination and communication with clients, d) coordination with applicable government agencies and sub contractors, e) interim and final QA/QC reviews and f) successful delivery of the final product to the client. This position coordinates the production and delivery of RAI services with other team members, clients and their subcontractors on all assigned projects. Position also involves a) management and skills & professional development of assigned staff, b) participation in the firms marketing efforts and c) upholding the firm’s standards of technical practice, policies and philosophies.

IV. Experience & Education

A. Work experience (including length of time), training, and/or level of education necessary for this position.
BS degree in related technical field required. Level of proficiency usually associated with 10 or more years engineering design experience in the land development field including a minimum of
4 years project management experience. Requires Professional Engineer registration in the state of Georgia and proven ability to handle all aspects of project management.

B. Required technical skills (typing, computer skills, etc.):
Requires a working knowledge of CAD design software so that competency in working with and managing the use of the current RAI design software may be achieved within three months.
Familiarity with word processing, spreadsheet and project management software so that competency in using MS Outlook, Word, Excel and Project desktop software may be achieved quickly.

Page 3 of 3

Position Description Senior Engineer III

C. Special training and/or abilities necessary to qualify for this position.
Good verbal and written communications skills required. Familiarity with applying financial data to project management; thinking and planning strategically; the building, organization and leadership of teams and an understanding of project management skills is highly desirable.
Must be able to make project presentations before government agencies.

V. Working Conditions & Physical Demands: Particular working conditions and/or physical demands associated with this position that should be noted (i.e., working environment, hours of work, travel, work space, walking, lifting, etc.).

Work hours are normally early morning to late afternoon (7:30 AM to 6:00 PM, for example) Monday through Friday but may vary depending on weather, client needs, company priorities and workload or other considerations. Some evening and/or Saturday work may be required. Occasional evening meetings with government agencies may be required. Position is mostly office work at a computer terminal with occasional visits to job sites to observe work and conditions. This may involve walking through difficult terrain in all types of weather conditions. Some overnight travel may be required.
Firm maintains a smoke-free office environment.

VI. Special Considerations

A. How closely supervised is this position?  Closely,  Moderately,  Minimally
Position requires someone who is self-motivated who can work with minimal supervision from the Team Leader while accomplishing the essential duties of this position.

B. Does this position have supervisory responsibility (i.e., responsible for hiring, firing, performance appraisals, etc.)?  Yes,  No.
Usually directs and supervises the work of one or more technical personnel. Shares in directing and supervising the work of an administrative assistant. Makes recommendations concerning hiring, promotion, discipline, termination and performance appraisals relating to those under his/her supervision.

C. Does this position have access to confidential information?  Yes,  No

May have knowledge of clients’ confidential business plans. Prepares and reviews proposals and invoices containing confidential information.

D. Does this position have access to or handle company funds?  Yes,  No

May handle client payments to the firm and may be assigned a company credit card. Must use mature judgement and follow established company policy and procedures in such matters.

VII. General Notes or Comments

A Senior Engineer is expected to demonstrate an “ownership mentality” with respect to the operations of his/her team as a part of the overall company. Although successful operation of the team is of high importance, equally important is the cooperation among all company personnel toward achieving overall client satisfaction and corporate goals. All supervisors of the firm need to be able to adopt a style of management that includes leading by serving. A Senior Engineer must understand and actively support all of these concepts.

The firm has adopted a Purpose Statement and a Statement of Core Values. All employees, especially managers and supervisors, must understand, accept and apply these statements as guiding principles in the daily conduct of their business.

There are some fundamentals that we need for all employees to grasp as an essential part of being a successful member of the Rochester & Associates, Inc. team:
You are needed at your job every day and you need to be on time.
You should dress appropriately for the job you will be performing. This includes dressing for safety where applicable.
The desire and motivation to improve and grow needs to come from within you.
If the company does not make a profit, its ceases to exist along with all the jobs there.
Stretch, don’t be afraid to try new things. Ask for help as soon as you need it.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: Up to $110,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Relocation assistance
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
COVID-19 considerations:
We follow CDC / DPH Guidelines as it related to COVID-19

Ability to Commute/Relocate:
Gainesville, GA 30501 (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
AutoCAD / Civil 3D: 2 years (Preferred)
Civil Site Engineering / Project Management: 5 years (Preferred)
Language:
English (Required)
License/Certification:
Professional Engineer License (Preferred)
Shift Availability:
Day Shift (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",4.1,"Rochester
4.1","Gainesville, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,1850,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
3,Software Engineer with OSIsoft Experience,-1,"Role: Software Engineer with OSIsoft experience

Reporting to: Global Head of Engineering/Project Manager

Status: Regular, Full-Time

Location: Philadelphia, PA. We are open to remote working options also.

About TQS Integration

TQS provides engineering services and product sales to clients in the Pharmaceutical, Chemical, Healthcare and Power industries. We are integrators of the PI System from OSIsoft (OSI). Our industry experience and the GMP critical nature of our software systems ensures that all software development and implementation is carried out in accordance with clients' strict quality system guidelines and compliance to FDA requirements for software validation and 21 CFR part 11. We have a broad client base in a mixture of Pharmaceutical, Oil & Gas, Power Generation and Food & Beverage industries. Our mission is to provide instantaneous data to our clients so that they can realize their full potential. If we take pride in our work, then that shines through on the quality of what we deliver. Our team is what makes our company a success and we want you to be a part of it!

The Role

Our team is made up of 170+ talented, enthusiastic and hardworking individuals who are based all over the world, working from our offices, client sites and remotely from their homes. We are looking for a candidate capable of providing technical support, integrating PI systems, completing documentation, and performing validation testing. This position offers flexibility and growth opportunities with different potential career paths within TQS Integration. This is a hands-on role where you will be given the platform to build a successful career with TQS, where your progression is rewarded, and different career paths open for you.

Key Duties / Responsibilities:

Integrate the PI System with SCADA, PLC, OPC, Continuous/Batch Historians, MES systems and DCS Based control systems
Implement, configure and troubleshoot OSI PI Interfaces including but not limited to OPC DA, PItoPI, RDBMS, UFL, EMDVB and SISBatch
Install and configure the PI System in redundant environments including but not limited to Interface Failover, PI Collective, Load Balanced AF Server, SQL AlwaysOn, Clustered Notifications and Analysis, Load Balanced PI Vision
Work with clients to understand, agree and implement technical requirements, in conjunction with TQS Team.
Draft PI Systems and GxPValidation document lifecycle, including installation/operational qualification and design specification with minimal supervision
Execute installation/operational qualifications across multiple projects
Provide resourcing estimates and technical configurations, of client quotations, to the Business Development Team.
Coordinate work with vendors and contractors, during project conception and implementation stages.
Manage smaller projects or a Project team from conception to completion.
Provide feedback on Junior engineers for performance evaluations.
Manage Project timelines in conjunction with the PM, ensuring the PM is informed of any potential changes to the project.
Anticipate and communicate issues involving quality and timeliness of project deliverables.
Understand and apply our quality policy statement in all aspects of your work.
Ensure that the needs and requirements of TQS Integration’s internal staff and customers are understood and delivered.
Help develop and improve TQS Integration’s internal processes and management system by reporting corrective actions, updates and improvement ideas.
Contribute to internal knowledge base about installation, configuration and troubleshooting of interfaces, in line with TQS standard and OSI recommendations.

Full clean driving license is preferred.
Undergraduate degree in IT, Automation, Science or Engineering, or related discipline.
Minimum of 24-48 months of experience in installing, configuring, and/or supporting PI Systems:
Configuring an interface
Setting up Interface failover
Creating a PI Collective
Configuring Buffering
Creating and editing PI Tags, asset structures
Familiarity with using basic IT concepts to support integration needs:
Ports
Service accounts
Command prompt
Windows Server
SQL
Strong drive for precision when installing, configuring, and documenting a system to specifications

Desired Skills and Qualifications

Level 100 & 200 OSIsoft Accredited or OSIsoft course certificates.
Experience with RtReports installation and configuration.

Installation and configuration experience in batch interfaces that use event frames.
Background in Life sciences, particularly pharmaceuticals.
Background in Automation including SCADA, PLC,OPC, Continuous/Batch Historians and DCS based control system.
Experience with SDLC, particularly in critical or GxP environment.
Familiarity with validation documentation.
Takes the initiative to solve problems and continually updates their own skillset

Experience in mentoring Junior staff.",3.5,"TQS Integration
3.5","Philadelphia, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
4,Senior Software Engineer-Search Virtual Hiring Event,$70k-$138k (Glassdoor Est.),"EBSCO Information Services Development Opportunities Hiring Event!

Event Details
Date: Thursday, October 22, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Principal Systems Architect

Director of Product Management

Mobile Application Developer

System Architect

System Architect-Platform Engineering

Senior Technical Product Owner

Senior Software Engineer-Search

Senior Software Engineer: Search Engine Team

Intake Details:

Technical requirements

The interview will take place on Indeed's virtual interviewing platform. After RSVP, you will find a link in your email that will lead you directly to the virtual interview lobby during the event. Try to find a quiet place with good lighting and a stable internet connection.

What to bring to this event

Please forward your resume prior to the event.

Completing our online application prior to the event is strongly encouraged and will speed up the process.

What to wear

Dress code is Business casual (dress pants/skirt, button down/blouse, optional tie).

About EBSCO Information Services

EBSCO is the leading provider of research databases, e-journals, magazine subscriptions, e-books and discovery service to libraries of all kinds. For more than 70 years, we’ve partnered with libraries to improve research with quality content and technology.

There is an EBSCO Way.

We strive for a culture of entrepreneurship. We seek new ideas and encourage innovation. Successful team members are entrepreneurial by nature. They practice sound business fundamentals and take advantage of best practices, but they think beyond the expected and experiment with new ideas and approaches.

EBSCO Way is the philosophy we grow by. In addition to ten operating principles, these are the characteristics we value in our people and teams.

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

Primary Responsibilities:

Provide expertise in architecting search systems, standing up search platforms, building data ingest pipelines, writing custom code, interfacing with data sources, and managing the platform
Be the technical leader for supporting the assessment, design, implementation, and maintenance of scalable search platforms that use the latest and best in search technologies
Collaborate with product management and your team while analyzing and decomposing complex software features into simpler stories for planning and execution.
Own system and feature quality throughout the development, testing and deployment phases to ensure quality delivery expectations are met.
Drive value and build to continuously improve the quality of the team’s deliverables.
Conduct new technology research, proof of concept, and design work that will provide direction for the enhancement of the overall system and products.
Contribute to software engineering best practices for design, coding standards, performance, security, delivery, maintainability and culture.
Demonstrate ownership of developed components from development through production.

Requirements:

5+ years of software engineering experience with Elasticsearch, ELK, Lucene, or Solr
3+ years writing in Java or related object-oriented programming languages
3+ years performing object-oriented design and building backend applications with REST API services using Java or Node.js
Bachelor of Science degree in Computer Science, a similar technical field of study or equivalent practical experience.

Preferred Qualifications:

Hands-on experience with Cloud services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform)
Hands-on experience with containerized services (Kubernetes, Docker Swarm).
Demonstrated ability to lead or drive a project with sound technical and design skills.
Demonstrated leadership and communication skills, including an ability to look forward and anticipate problems and assess risk.
Excellent mentoring skills and the desire to contribute to efforts beyond the scope of the day-to-day project work.
An advocate for unit testing, automation, and test-driven development.
Detailed understanding of Agile software engineering principles and methodologies",3.5,"EBSCO Information Services
3.5","Ipswich, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1984,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
5,Senior Software Engineer: Search Engine Team Virtual Hiring Event,$70k-$138k (Glassdoor Est.),"EBSCO Information Services Development Opportunities Hiring Event!

Event Details
Date: Thursday, October 22, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Principal Systems Architect

Director of Product Management

Mobile Application Developer

System Architect

System Architect-Platform Engineering

Senior Technical Product Owner

Senior Software Engineer-Search

Senior Software Engineer: Search Engine Team

Intake Details:

Technical requirements

The interview will take place on Indeed's virtual interviewing platform. After RSVP, you will find a link in your email that will lead you directly to the virtual interview lobby during the event. Try to find a quiet place with good lighting and a stable internet connection.

What to bring to this event

Please forward your resume prior to the event.

Completing our online application prior to the event is strongly encouraged and will speed up the process.

What to wear

Dress code is Business casual (dress pants/skirt, button down/blouse, optional tie).

About EBSCO Information Services

EBSCO is the leading provider of research databases, e-journals, magazine subscriptions, e-books and discovery service to libraries of all kinds. For more than 70 years, we’ve partnered with libraries to improve research with quality content and technology.

There is an EBSCO Way.

We strive for a culture of entrepreneurship. We seek new ideas and encourage innovation. Successful team members are entrepreneurial by nature. They practice sound business fundamentals and take advantage of best practices, but they think beyond the expected and experiment with new ideas and approaches.

EBSCO Way is the philosophy we grow by. In addition to ten operating principles, these are the characteristics we value in our people and teams.

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

Primary Responsibilities:

Understand architecture of search system and components and interfaces
Research, prototype and present search enhancements and technologies.
Design and develop software components and tools to extend and enhance our search systems
Collaborate with teammates to refine and prioritize requirements, estimate and scope work, and time releases.
Collaborate with teammates on decisions/solutions related to search engine.
Collaborate with teammates in documenting search technologies, systems and tools
Assist in troubleshooting search problems and repairing defects

Requirements:

Bachelors Degree in the field or 4 Years equivalent experience
1 year experience with Unix operating systems
4 years experience developing, deploying, tuning large scale, high-performance distributed systems.
5 years experience with OOA/OOD and OO programming using C++, Java
Experience working in Agile teams that leverage CI/CD tools

Preferred Qualifications:

Experience with AWS
Experience with database systems (Relational/SQL, No-SQL, Graph Databases)
Basic understanding of Information Retrieval systems and techniques
Solid understanding of core algorithms and data structures (order, complexity, hashes, trees, others).
Demonstrated ability to create diagrams, charts and graphs to convey concepts both to engineering staff and management
Demonstrated ability to work effectively in a fast-paced, team-oriented work environment
Knowledge of multiple language support and natural language recognition and processing
Experience with search technologies such as Elastic Search is a big plus",3.5,"EBSCO Information Services
3.5","Ipswich, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1984,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
6,Instrument Controls Computer Hardware Software Engineer,-1,"Job Number: *WFS-2020-95
Job Title: *Instrument & Controls Computer Hardware/Software Engineer
Supervisor: *
Status: *Full Time
Location: *WIPP / Carlsbad, NM
CONTINGENT UPON CONTRACT AWARD*
_Per Diem is available for those who qualify_*
For consideration, please include a resume clearly outlining your experience and qualifications and provides a minimum of three professional references. If your experience meets job requirements, we will contact you for additional application process steps.

Waséyabek Federal Services, LLC (WFS) is a subsidiary of Waséyabek Development Company, LLC (WDC), providing services to the Federal marketplace. WDC is a legal entity, created and wholly owned by the Nottawaseppi Huron Band of the Potawatomi (NHBP), a Federally recognized Indian Tribe. WDC is committed to fostering the development of a stable, diversified economy for members of the Band which will contribute to their long-term wealth and economic self-sufficiency while managing risk and creating quality employment opportunities.
JOB DUTIES
Assume responsibility for completion of detail phases of assigned projects under direction of project/and cognizant engineering
Provide detailed solutions to assigned engineering problems
Make engineering and design calculations applying basic engineering principles, theories and concepts
Prepare technical reports and other technical documents such as procedures and operation and maintenance manuals
Prepare cost estimates related to assigned technical projects; prepare engineered work packages under supervision for construction or modification of equipment and facilities
Analyze specific equipment or system failures of limited scope and recommend repairs, modifications, or appropriate corrective actions through application of basic engineering principles
Provide general functional requirements to perform basic design of new equipment/systems or modification of existing equipment/systems
Provide engineering support to other groups
Make technical presentations
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS
Ten (10) years I&C and HW/SW Engineering experience in design, systems or programs engineering, OR Six to Nine (6-9) years I&C and HW/SW Engineering experience with engineering application experience.
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering (Instrumentation, Control, and Automation) or related engineering discipline, with work experience in I&C and HW/SW Engineering required.
Relevant job experience in lieu of the education requirements may be considered on a case-by-case basis, with specific customer approval.
DOE experience, preferred
Specialty areas include
Process Computer
Process Controls
Data Acquisition
Nuclear instrumentation
Control Room Displays
Control room distributed controls systems
Instrumentation Calibrations and refurbishments
Substantial equipment replacements and refurbishments
Thorough understanding of engineering principles, theories and concepts and microcomputer applications
Ability to deliver oral presentations to convey technical findings and recommendations
Ability to write, clear, concise and organized memos and reports
JOB REQUIREMENTS
Sound communication skills to effectively interface with internal and external customers
Able to work well in the field and take ownership of assigned system equipment mechanical and electrical control systems
Able to work with groups to provide overlapping support to other engineers while possibly working on several assigned tasks
Able to clearly communicate technical information to non-technical personnel both verbally as well as in writing
Able to expand skill set beyond own discipline to include understanding of control systems, interfaces with other electrical, mechanical, and structural systems
Able to work in an industrial and construction site environment including walking over uneven surfaces, in the underground mine, and over long distances with periods of standing
HIRING PREFERENCE
Native American & Veteran Hiring Preferences will be applied in accordance with WFS policy.

Waséyabek Federal Services is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $10.00 - $100.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
I&C HW/SW Engineering: 10 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Company's website:
www.wfedservices.com
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Waseyabek Federal Services, LLC","Carlsbad, NM",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
7,Senior Software Engineer (React/U.S. Citizen),-1,"Senior Software Engineer

Overview

Kalani Consulting, Inc. has an immediate opening for a Senior Software Engineer to join our engineering team!

Are you a senior developer with expertise across the tech stack developing quality code? Do you desire to make a difference and have an impact through the work that you create? If so, come join Kalani Consulting! You’ll work to develop applications within a cloud-based big data platform in an Agile development environment. You’ll work with our team of engineers and designers to develop and maintain applications using technologies such as Java, React, Docker, and Java Spring.

Responsibilities:
Mentor a team developers and interface with the client.
Design, develop, test and debug new and existing applications using microservices
Document software technical specifications, application design, and database design.
Responsible for writing code to specifications and under direction of management.
Develop custom reports and respond to ad-hoc requests from client.
Meet with end users to understand their needs to implement software solutions.
Perform analysis and provide recommendations of software requirements to determine feasibility of design.
Participate in Agile Scrum ceremonies (Sprint planning, Backlog grooming, Story point estimation etc.)
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or a related field
Strong understanding of microservices architecture and hands-on experience designing and creating microservices using best practices
5+ years of professional full stack development experience using React, Docker, GraphQL, Apollo and Java Spring.
Hands-on experience designing and developing applications that are decoupled from backend via RESTful web services.
Professional experience writing unit tests, performing code reviews, doing API testing (Postman, Swagger etc.)
Working knowledge of multiple database and storage environments: PostgreSQL, MongoDB, Elasticsearch, and AWS S3.
Expertise with Git version control
Desired:
Knowledge of accessibility/UX best practices and Section 508 compliance, and/or WCAG 2.0 standards
Clearance Requirements:
Must be US Citizen and be able to obtain and maintain a DHS Suitability
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Software Engineering: 3 years (Required)
React: 1 year (Required)
Application Question:
Are you a U.S. Citizen?
Security Clearance Required:
Confidential (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.kalani-consulting.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Kalani Consulting,"Crystal City, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
8,UMCS Architecture Engineer,-1,"**Security Clearance Required: Secret or Eligible for a Secret Clearance***
Primary Responsibilities:

This position provides technical support to the Unmanned Mission Control Station (UMCS) AIRWorks Team focusing on MQ-25 system architecture, analysis of models, verification of ""as-built"" DODAF documentation, review of UMCS architecture implementation, and development of software/system design guidance.

The Architecture will be responsible for the development and implementation of standards to guide the software, hardware and interfaces design with a focus on communications, network, and avionics systems.

Additionally, the Architecture Engineer will will review CDRLs that address:
Open Architecture (OA);
MQ-25 system functionality;
SW components focusing on OA requirements; and
CSCI functional descriptions and alignment to DODAF SV-6 (interface definitions) as documented in the MQ-25 system Integrated Architecture and Requirements Model (IARM).
Tasks Performed:

The Architecture tasks include:

Liaison with NAVAIR, Air Force and SAE International in review and update of existing standards such as NIOP, OMS, and UCS;
Review and update of Open Architecture requirements in solicitation documents and specifications;
Traceability of requirements to design documentation and standards.
Functionally decomposition of requirements manifested in information exchange components;
Review contractor deliverables and documentation to ensure adherence to open architecture standards and applicable ICDs;
Provide inputs into technical roadmaps for multiple weapon systems;
Coordination with the Software Test and Integration Lab for development of test of design approaches;
Prepare and review engineering and technical analyses, reports, change proposals and other technical documentation;
Develop technical inputs to whitepapers, briefs and contractual language
Assist UMCS SEIT team with Statements of Work (SOWs), Contract Data Requirements Lists (CDRLs) and other documentation;
Review of Open Architecture documentation and provide feedback on changes required based on discoveries

Education: Bachelor's Degree and/or Master’s Degree in an engineering field from an accredited college or university. An engineering degree is required.

Experience:

JOURNEYMAN (Mid): A Journeyman level person within a labor category has 3 to 10 years of experience related to the functional duties for that labor category and a BA/BS degree. A Journeyman level person typically performs all functional duties independently.

SENIOR: A Senior level person within a labor category has over 10 years of experience related to the functional duties for that labor category and a MA/MS degree. A Senior level person typically works on high-visibility or mission critical aspects of a given program and performs all functional duties independently. A Senior level person may oversee the efforts of less senior staff and/or be responsible for the efforts of all staff assigned to a specific job.

Allowable Experience/Education Substitutions: Bachelor’s Degree plus 4 years additional relevant work experience may be substituted for a Master’s Degree.

Other Desired Experience:

Ability to communicate and adapt well in dynamic team environments
Good organizational skills
Strong skills in Microsoft Word, Excel and PowerPoint

Familiarity and/or experience with:

NAVAIR SETR events
Cameo sysML

Security Clearance Required: Secret or Eligible for a Secret Clearance

Estimated Travel: 10%",5.0,"CRL Technologies
5.0","Lexington Park, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
9,Senior Software Engineer (Qt5/GUI),-1,"You will be a key member of our engineering team, working on complex developer tool applications, written in C++, using the Qt5 toolset. You will have Full Software Development Lifecycle responsibilities for our multi-protocol client products, focusing on Qt5 Application Development.

We are only interested in \*careful\* expert C++ programmers with lots of experience using the Qt5 toolset. This position requires advanced knowledge of C++ and Qt5 APIs, and an ability to design and develop new application features. There is a significant existing C++/Qt5 code-base that needs to be utilized, which provides model-based management of NETCONF servers, based on some of our YumaPro SDK technology.

Full-time attendance at our headquarters in Simi Valley, CA, is a requirement.
Projects planned for this position include: *
Develop new network management features such as automatic regression testing, code generation management, Push-based telemetry collector, configuration management
Create Qt Installer programs using Qt Installer Framework
Create automated regression test suites using the Squish toolkit
Integrate Cryptlex License Management software into applications
Improve Model-based YANG data handling user interfaces
Handle customer support and maintenance issues for the GUI applications
Position Requirements*
Bachelor of Science, Computer Science
3 or more years of related Qt5 application development experience
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Excellent software development and documentation skills
Required Programming Languages: C++
Required Tools: Qt5, QtCreator, Squish, Qt Installer Framework
Networking experience: NETCONF, HTTP, TCP/IP, SSH, TLS, Google's gRPC
YANG data modeling experience: IETF, OpenDaylight, OpenConfig, O-RAN, Metro Ethernet Forum
Other: Jenkins, git, JIRA Agile, Freshdesk, LibreOffice, Windows, macOS, Linux
Benefits*
Competitive salary
4 weeks PTO + 2 weeks company-paid holiday

About YumaWorks

Check out our website at http://www.yumaworks.com

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $90,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
relevant professional Qt5/GUI software development: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Simi Valley, CA 93065 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.yumaworks.com/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/yumaworks
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"YumaWorks, Inc.","Simi Valley, CA",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
10,"Equipment Breakdown Risk Engineer, National Insurance",$38k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Advance your career Liberty Mutual Insurance - A Fortune 100 Company

Are you looking for an opportunity to use your degree in the business world? Then Liberty Mutual's Equipment Breakdown Risk Control group might be right for you. Our Equipment Breakdown Risk Control team works closely with our customers to help them identify, quantify, mitigate, or eliminate serious threats to their businesses. In the process, we help fulfill Liberty Mutual's mission of helping people live safer, more secure lives.
Liberty Mutual is currently hiring an Equipment Breakdown Risk Control Consultant to provide jurisdictionally required inspections and other services to an assigned group of customers.

Reporting to the Equipment Breakdown Engineering Manager, you will:
Perform jurisdictional inspections on boilers and pressure vessels within assigned territory and report findings to the authority having jurisdiction and other interested parties. Support underwriters with risk assessment account reviews and serve as a technical resource to field claim adjusters

Conduct extensive research and data collection which helps to identify customer's source of risk, loss and costs. Compiles facts from on-site visits and various reports and databases to assess existing processes/practices, determine severity/frequency of problems, and identify needs. Assesses and benchmarks customers performance against internal and industry standards.

Interpret and analyze data to determine best course of action and/or solution that satisfies customer's risk service's needs. Utilize advanced software applications to help find innovative and cost-effective solutions to customers risk service's needs. Conduct cost-benefit analysis to determine how and when a recommended improvement at customers' facility/operation will pay off. Investigate cause and effect relationships.

Prepare technical reports which reports and evaluates data.

Organize data into a format which can easily be presented to customer. Prepare and present reports which outline action plan for improved practices and/or changing workforce cultures/behaviors.

Maintain effective partnerships with customers. Learn about customer's business in order to identify risk management objectives and needs. Ensure accurate and concise communication and mutual understanding with customers. Keep customers informed of status of services, support material available and outside resources relevant to identify customers' safety concerns.

Participate in training and development of customers. Oversee implementation of program(s). Provides technical support to assist with implementation of recommendations/actions plans. Counsel customers regarding technical issues.

Actively pursues professional development efforts to better meet customer expectations.

May actively participate in acquiring new business by following up on leads and presenting proposals to potential customers.

Successful candidates will possess the following:

National Board Commission required.

Knowledge, skills and experience in boiler and pressure vessel inspections, service planning and delivery, risk assessment, risk analysis, solutions management and progress measurement. Fully effective interpersonal, writing and other communication skills required to develop and maintain relationships with customers, peers, and industry contacts.

Bachelor's degree or equivalent with coursework in mathematics and engineering or related area, plus a minimum of 3 years of directly related consulting experience. Demonstrated ability to retrieve and enter information using various proprietary software applications and create/modify documents and spreadsheets using Microsoft Office suite.

Ability to work closely with Claims and Underwriting.

Position requires regular travel.

Benefits:

We value your hard work, integrity and commitment to positive change. In return for your service, it’s our privilege to offer you benefits and rewards that support your life and well-being. To learn more about our benefit offerings please visit: https://LMI.co/Benefits

Overview:

At Liberty Mutual, we give motivated, accomplished professionals the opportunity to help us redefine what insurance means; to work for a global leader with a deep sense of humanity and a focus on improving and protecting everyday lives. We create an inspired, collaborative environment, where people can take ownership of their work; push breakthrough ideas; and feel confident that their contributions will be valued and their growth championed.At Liberty Mutual, we give motivated, accomplished professionals the opportunity to help us redefine what insurance means; to work for a global leader with a deep sense of humanity and a focus on improving and protecting everyday lives. We create an inspired, collaborative environment, where people can take ownership of their work; push breakthrough ideas; and feel confident that their contributions will be valued and their growth championed.At Liberty Mutual, we give motivated, accomplished professionals the opportunity to help us redefine what insurance means; to work for a global leader with a deep sense of humanity and a focus on improving and protecting everyday lives. We create an inspired, collaborative environment, where people can take ownership of their work; push breakthrough ideas; and feel confident that their contributions will be valued and their growth championed.

We’re dedicated to doing the right thing for our employees, because we know that their fulfillment and success leads us to great places. Life. Happiness. Innovation. Impact. Advancement. Whatever their pursuit, talented people find their path at Liberty Mutual.",3.5,"Liberty Mutual Insurance
3.5","Charlotte, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,1912,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
11,Senior Electrical Engineer / FPGA Designer,-1,"*Position: *Senior Electrical Engineer / FPGA Designer

*Reports to: *Director of Engineering

*About the Company*:

Founded in 1968, Klein Marine Systems is the world's leading supplier of side scan sonar equipment. Our sonar is used by the world’s largest Navies, surveyors, universities, and wreck hunters. One of our many successes is developing sonar that found the Titanic wreck.

Our strategic location in Southern New Hampshire enjoys short commutes, low taxes, lower housing cost, and convenient proximity to the Boston metro area.

*Job Description: *

Design cutting-edge sonar imaging systems for both unmanned underwater vehicles (UUV) and underwater towed systems. Convert logic and algorithm descriptions into functional products. Debug completed PCB assemblies in-system, in collaboration with other software and hardware engineers. Enjoy learning from the very best in the industry while making a significant personal contribution.

*Areas of work to include*:

* Mixed signal design
* FPGA coding (Verilog / System Verilog)
* Verification testing
* Collaboration with software and mechanical engineering

*Requirements: *

* BS Electrical Engineering (Masters Preferred) – Or similar experience
* Minimum 5 years designing electronics, FPGA or embedded microprocessor systems

*FPGA - Required*

* Design FPGAs from specifications using Verilog HDL. (Xilinx, Vivado experience a plus )
* Use Verilog test benches to verify FPGA compliance to specifications.
* Apply suitable timing constraints to guarantee reliable operation.

*FPGA - Preferred*

* Familiarity with digital filters in FPGA - low-pass, pulse-compression, FFT.
* Ability and willingness to reverse-engineer and improve existing FPGA designs.

*Circuit Design Required: *

* Design digital PCB circuitry for data I/O, computer interface. (OrCAD experience a plus)
* Guide PCB layout to achieve signal integrity in digital circuitry. (PADs experience a plus)

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* 401(k) matching
* Dental insurance
* Disability insurance
* Flexible schedule
* Flexible spending account
* Health insurance
* Life insurance
* Paid time off
* Professional development assistance
* Relocation assistance
* Retirement plan
* Tuition reimbursement
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* 8 hour shift
* Monday to Friday

Work Location:
* One location

Company's website:
* http://kleinmarinesystems.com/

Benefit Conditions:
* Waiting period may apply

Work Remotely:
* No",-1,Klein Marine Systems,"Salem, NH",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
12,Model Based Systems Engineer / Software Systems Engineer,-1,"**Security Clearance Required: Secret or Eligible for a Secret Clearance***
Primary Responsibilities:

• Develop strategies for implementing a Model Based Systems Engineering approach for Future Vertical Lift Family of Systems

• Develop and maintain models using modeling languages such as Unified Modeling Language (UML), Systems Modeling Language (SysML), Integration DEFinition (IDEF), Business Process Modeling Notation (BPMN), Architecture Analysis & Design Language (AADL) and FACE Data Architecture modeling language.

• Create metrics and measures to assess progress and value of the MBSE approaches

• Conduct market research and analysis of state-of-the-art and emerging MBSE trends

• Participate in working groups and collaborative organizations to promote and advance MBSE

• Support model based systems engineering to document requirements in model based format using industry standard tools (MagicDraw / CAMEO, Enterprise Architect, etc.)

• Develop use cases

• Coordinate with domain area SMEs to determine information needed to incorporate in model

Education: Bachelor's of Science degree in engineering, science or mathematics degree (REQUIRED).

Experience:

Required experience (Junior): less than four years experience.

Required experience (Journey): 4 to 10 years of related embedded systems software experience.

Security Clearance Required: Secret or Eligible for a Secret Clearance

Estimated Travel: 10%",5.0,"CRL Technologies
5.0","Huntsville, AL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
13,Senior Systems Engineer/Systems Architect,-1,"**Security Clearance Required: Eligible for Secret***
Primary Responsibilities:

Develop architectures for future systems (such as Future Vertical Lift Family of System) to enable the government to meet objectives of portability, interoperability and capability overmatch.

Liaison with DoD leadership to develop strategies and implementation plans for effectively utilizing a consistent Modular Open Systems Approach (MOSA).

Create requirements for the Army's Digital Backbone approach and implement experimental approaches to rapidly remove and replace avionics hardware components.

Collaborate with enduring fleet and future platforms to develop technical strategies for implementing Open Architecture standards and processes in software and hardware products.

Develop system models and create representations using data architectures and data models to facilitate interoperability; determine appropriate modeling languages and tools to represent system model requirements in an MBSE manner

Develop hardware and software requirements that are enforceable and compatible with current aviation methodologies

Prepare and review engineering and technical analyses, reports, change proposals and other technical documentation

Develop technical inputs to whitepapers, briefs and contractual language

Draft engineering inputs for Statements of Work (SOWs), Contract Data Requirements Lists (CDRLs) and other documentation

Review Open Architecture documentation and provide feedback on changes required based on discoveries

Education: Bachelor's of Science degree in engineering, science, or mathematics (REQUIRED). Advanced degree in engineering, science, or mathematics (REQUIRED for SME).

Experience

Required (Senior): 10 years related to systems or software engineering experience.
Required (SME): 20 years of Systems Engineering experience related to avionics architectures.
Desired: Experience with open architecture initiatives (i.e., the Future Airborne Capability Environment (FACE) Technical Standard, Joint Common Architecture (JCA), Hardware Open Systems Technologies (HOST) standard, Open Mission Systems (OMS) standard, UAS Control Segment (UCS)), embedded software, or software/modeling tools.

Security Clearance Required: Eligible for Secret
Estimated Travel: 25%

CRL Technologies is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employer and welcomes all qualified applicants. Applicants will receive fair and impartial consideration without regard to race, sexual orientation, color, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, genetic data, or religion or other legally protected status.",5.0,"CRL Technologies
5.0","Huntsville, AL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
14,"Senior Software Engineer (Full-Time) located in Plano, TX",$48k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"A Senior Software Developer at Anderson Merchandisers will develop a variety of computer applications that meet specific user needs. They will work on a small software team where their individual contributions will be highly visible. They will be asked to bring their years of experience into the entire software development lifecycle from inception to delivery. They will participate in customer feedback to identify the purpose, requirements, feasibility, performance requirements, and security for new or current software. They will use java or other programming languages and collaborate with other Software Developers to write, test, revise and launch the software. They will be involved in DevOps tasks and develop large patches to improve or adjust features or functionality. They will do their own production deployment and emergency maintenance. Our systems cross PHP, Kettle ETL, Salesforce, Workday, Native Mobile, and Oracle analytics cloud. Using MySQL and Microsoft SQL Server as our primary Databases.
Responsibilities and Duties*
Developing Microservices using Spring Boot and Spring Data Rest.
Maintain and debug existing Kettle ETL processes.
Providing clear instructions to the project team, clearly explaining how the software works to the customer and being available to answer any questions that may arise using exceptional communication skills.
Using analysis and critical thinking skills to determine and assess the needs of the user and then create software to meet the requirements.
Collaborating with management, departments and customers to identify end-user requirements and specifications.
Developing technical documentation to guide future software development projects.
Applying keen attention to detail and organization to work on numerous parts of a system or application at the same time while being accurate and thorough.
Working well with others on the IS Team using effective interpersonal skills.
Being able to efficiently identify and resolve issues that arise during the design, testing and maintenance processes using problem-solving skills.
Observing user feedback to recommend improvements to existing software products.
Qualifications*
7+ years of professional Information Systems Software Development experience
Proficiency in popular coding languages including Java, PHP frameworks
Expertise in API integrations and ETL technologies and strategies like Pentaho Kettle
Excellent knowledge of the software development life cycle
Strong problem-solving skills and Expert at code debugging and reading
Strong Communication skills
Knowledge of Object-Relational Mapping frameworks
Experience with Agile and Scrum development methodologies
Ability to learn quickly and work independently or as part of a team
Able to code using existing coding architecture
Anderson Merchandisers LLCInformation Systems

Location: 5601 Granite Pkwy, Plano, TX 75024, USA

Job Type: Full-time",2.6,"Anderson Merchandisers
2.6","United, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1917,Company - Private,General Merchandise & Superstores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
15,Senior Big Data Engineer,$62k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you want to be part of the transformation that's pushing forward a truly data-driven company? Are you ready to collaborate and innovate with a team responsible for changing the customer experience using the latest technologies? As a Senior Big Data Engineer on the GEICO IT squad, you’ll thrive in a fast-paced innovative culture that turns data into information and uses that information to drive action. One focus is our Single View of the Customer (SVOC) initiative. As part of this team you will be designing, creating, and populating customer centric data stores necessary for deriving valuable insights in real time to provide tailored customer experiences. As a senior engineer you will have the opportunity to mentor more junior associates and help grow our team.
When you first join our SVOC team, you will have opportunity to come up to speed on the innovative technologies we use to develop SVOC!

Basic Qualifications:

o At least 2 years as a Big Data Engineer/Developer on the Hadoop Ecosystem, with experience in data profiling and transformations
o At least 2 years of experience using Spark core, or Spark SQL,
o Experience with core Java (and/or Scala, Python)
o Experience with NoSQL databases such as HBase, Cassandra, or MongoDB
o Proficient in designing efficient and robust ETL/ELT workflows, schedulers, and event-based triggers
o Strong critical thinking, decision making, and problem-solving skills
o Excellent verbal/written communication skills, including communicating technical issues to non-technical audiences
o A Bachelor's degree in a computer related field or equivalent professional experience is required

Preferred Skills:

o Exposure to Spark Streaming and Machine Learning
o Exposure to Data Mining, Data Engineering, and Data Modeling
o Exposure to Graph Databases

Note: The safety of our associates, both current and future, is GEICO’s highest priority. At this time, most of our associates are working remotely due to the current COVID-19 pandemic. Candidates who are selected for this position will be trained remotely and must be able to work from home in a designated work area. Once GEICO determines it is safe for associates to return to the office, candidates may be required to work in our Chevy Chase, MD office.

Qualifications

About GEICO
For more than 75 years, GEICO has stood out from the rest of the insurance industry! We are one of the nation's largest and fastest-growing auto insurers thanks to our low rates, outstanding service and clever marketing. We're an industry leader employing thousands of dedicated and hard-working associates. As a wholly owned subsidiary of Berkshire Hathaway, we offer associates training and career advancement in a financially stable and rewarding workplace.

As a full-time Senior Big Data Engineer, you’ll enjoy our Total Rewards Program* to help secure your financial future and preserve your health and well-being, including:

• Premier Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance with no waiting period**
• Paid Vacation, Sick and Parental Leave
• 401(k) Plan with Profit Sharing
• Tuition Reimbursement
• Paid Training and Licensures
Benefits may be different by location. Benefit eligibility requirements vary and may include length of service.
*Coverage begins with the pay period after hire date. Must enroll in New Hire Benefits within 30 days of the date of hire for coverage to take effect.",3.4,"GEICO
3.4","Chevy Chase, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1936,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
16,Senior Digital Signal Processing Engineer,-1,"Digital Signal Processing Engineer

US Citizenship is required due to security clearance requirements,

At Expedition Technology, we push the boundaries of what is possible every day. Our engineers excel in tackling traditional signal processing problems and creating novel solutions using machine learning/deep learning algorithms. We are one of a very few companies that has been successful in employing deep learning to traditional signal processing. Our collaborative culture is conducive to researching and developing the cutting-edge solutions our DOD and IC customers seek.

We are currently seeking like-minded engineers and developers to join our growing team. A successful candidate will have the privilege of driving research and development activities to enable automated machine learning techniques to detect, demodulate and exploit signals in complicated environments. Emphasis includes software defined radio design and development, spectrum analysis and channelization, adaptive beamforming, channel equalization, waveform analysis, signal coding and decoding.

Primary Responsibilities:

Develop, modify, and maintain digital signal processing algorithms
Create machine learning models/neural networks designed to glean intelligence from signal processing data
Maintain robust existing code and develop new code
Work on small teams on various machine-learning oriented R&D programs

Position Requirements:

Minimum 5 years related experience- preferably within Research & Development focused positions
Interest in extending state-of-the-art machine learning and deep learning research to traditional signal processing problems
Experience with some or all of the following: C, C++, Python, MatLab (Python preferred)
Experience and understanding of Detection & Estimation Theory
In depth understanding of spectral estimation, digital communication theory and/or information theory (need not have all three)
Prior experience with adaptive filtering and interference mitigation in challenging environments
Bachelor’s degree or higher in Electrical Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Computer Engineering, Mechanical Engineering or similar
Candidates holding active US Government clearances are highly desired- must at least be eligible to obtain a TS/SCI or higher
US Citizenship is required

Interested in joining our team? Let’s explore together!

Expedition Technology is an IBA company that offers self-directed, company-paid, comprehensive medical, dental and vision insurance, PTO, 401k with up to 12% company match, equity shares (SARs), student loan repayment options and a generous tuition reimbursement program. Most importantly, we offer an environment where we are encouraged to push boundaries, take risks and enjoy the rewards.

EXP is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer that believes a diverse range of talent creates an environment that fuels creativity and innovation. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, national origin, genetic information or protected veteran status.

Powered by JazzHR

M90ruzNxxD",5.0,"Expedition Technology, Inc.
5.0","Herndon, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
17,Spark/Big Data Engineer,$52k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Consumption team of Decision Sciences and Transformation (DSaT) is seeking a highly motivated Spark / Big Data Developer to start or continue an IT career on the Big Data Platform project. Teaming up with architects, scrum masters, leads, managers and directors, you will work in an Agile environment to make the data on the Big Data Platform accessible for the needs of the organization through Atomic Models and Analytical Data Stores. In this role, you will coordinate with a variety of IT departments to elicit and translate high level business requirements into detailed system requirements. You will participate in the entire software development lifecycle by writing and executing test plans, finding solutions to issues during development and after deployment. You should be intellectually curious, have a solutions-oriented attitude and enjoy learning new tools and techniques.

Basic Qualifications:

At least two years of experience with SQL and Java or Scala

Experience with manipulating and transforming data

Exposure to NoSQL databases, Spark and the Hadoop Ecosystem (MapReduce, Oozie, Hive, Pig)

Strong critical thinking, decision making, and problem-solving skills

Excellent verbal/written communication skills, including communicating technical issues to non-technical audiences

Bachelor’s degree in a computer related field or equivalent professional experience required

Preferred Qualifications:

Experience in designing efficient and robust ETL/ELT workflows, schedulers, and event-based triggers

Experience with Spark core and Spark SQL
Experience as a Big Data Developer

Exposure to Data Mining, Data Engineering and Data Modeling

Exposure to Graph Databases

Note: The safety of our associates, both current and future, is GEICO’s highest priority. At this time, most of our associates are working remotely due to the current COVID-19 pandemic. Candidates who are selected for this position will be trained remotely and must be able to work from home in a designated work area. Once GEICO determines it is safe for associates to return to the office, candidates may be required to work in our Chevy Chase, MD office.

Qualifications
About GEICO

For more than 75 years, GEICO has stood out from the rest of the insurance industry! We are one of the nation's largest and fastest-growing auto insurers thanks to our low rates, outstanding service and clever marketing. We're an industry leader employing thousands of dedicated and hard-working associates. As a wholly owned subsidiary of Berkshire Hathaway, we offer associates training and career advancement in a financially stable and rewarding workplace.

Benefits:

As a full-time Big Data Developer, you’ll enjoy our Total Rewards Program* to help secure your financial future and preserve your health and well-being, including:

Premier Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance with no waiting period**

Paid Vacation, Sick and Parental Leave

401(k) Plan with Profit Sharing
Tuition Reimbursement
Paid Training and Licensures
Benefits may be different by location. Benefit eligibility requirements vary and may include length of service.
*Coverage begins with the pay period after hire date. Must enroll in New Hire Benefits within 30 days of the date of hire for coverage to take effect.",3.4,"GEICO
3.4","Chevy Chase, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1936,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
18,Forensic Electrical Engineer,-1,"Trident Engineering Associates is a full-service engineering, fire investigation, environmental, health and safety, and specialty consulting services firm serving a variety of industries in both the public and private sectors. We are an Annapolis based forensic engineering firm seeking a part-time Electrical Engineer. Our electrical forensic analysis consists of failures of electrical and electronic products. Instrumentation, data logging, operation, and analysis of electrical testing programs. Trident was founded by a group of senior faculty members of the United States Naval Academy and has been operating successfully for over 60 years. Trident draws associates from a variety of academic institutions and the private sector, and maintains offices in Annapolis, Maryland, and Carlisle, Pennsylvania. We incur most of our work through our reputation of high integrity and honesty with insurance companies and through legal clients. *PRIMARY PURPOSE: * To provide clients with investigating engineering services related to events, systems, devices, and/or failures and providing expert opinions. *ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS and RESPONSIBILITIES* * Surveys losses and loss scenes at residential and commercial buildings * Conducts investigations to determine and document the scope of damage. * Investigates and assesses damages due to failures and determines the origin of failure for insurers and litigation support. * Analyzes and documents the failure analysis and causation of failures. * Collaborates with other investigators to produce detailed reports outlining the cause and origin of losses and damages. * Serves as an expert witness in court and/or in depositions. * Documents and maintains billable hours on a time and expense basis for failure analysis and forensic engineering projects for clients. *ADDITIONAL FUNCTIONS and RESPONSIBILITIES* * Performs other duties as assigned. * Supports the organization's quality program(s). *QUALIFICATIONS* *Education & Licensing* Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university preferred. Professional Engineering (PE) license is preferred, but not required. *Experience* Six (6) years of experience or equivalent combination of experience and education required. *Skills & Knowledge* * Excellent oral and written communication * PC literate, including Microsoft Office products * Analytical and interpretive skills * Strong organizational skills * Excellent interpersonal skills * Ability to work independently or in a team environment * Ability to meet or exceed Performance Competencies *Physical: * * Must be able to stand and/or walk for long periods of time. * Must be able to kneel, squat or bend. * Must be able to work outdoors in hot and/or cold weather conditions. * Have the ability to climb, crawl, stoop, kneel, reaching/working overhead, * Be able to drive up to 4 hours per day. Job Type: Part-time Pay: Up to $90.00 per hour Schedule: * Monday to Friday Experience: * Forensic Electrical Engineering: 5 years (Preferred) Education: * Bachelor's (Required) License: * P.E. (Preferred) Work Location: * Multiple locations Company's website: * https://www.tridentengineering.com/",-1,"Trident Engineering Associates, Inc","Annapolis, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1959,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
19,MDR Engineer,-1,"Medcomp is Hiring!*
If you want to help people, then Medcomp is the place for you!
We are searching for an experienced Engineer to join our Product Support Team.*
VISION & MISSION STATEMENT*
To be the leading solution provider for every customer we serve.

To drive sustainable growth of our business through the continued investment in our people, technology and quality while delivering world class products and services.
*About Us -* Medcomp® develops, manufactures, markets and supports cutting-edge vascular access devices and accessories to meet the clinical needs of the medical industry, particularly in the fields of interventional medicine and dialysis. Our company's engineering and applications expertise provides superior products whose progressive designs accommodate advances in medicine and whose quality anticipates the requirements of our professional clients and the patients they serve. Currently one of the world's largest manufacturers of dialysis and centrally terminating venous catheters, Medcomp is, and always has been, on the cutting edge of new vascular access device technologies.
Engineer Responsibilities –*
Working with DHF and holding design review meetings
Develop medical devices from concept to finished product following all Design Control procedures.
Work with regulatory to ensure the design meets 510k, MDD and MDR requirements.
Driven, detail oriented and able to look at multiple avenues to find solutions.
Responsible for developing project plan and verification testing and validation testing.
Maintain and follow proper compliance and quality systems requirements.
Lead projects including team members, and be responsible for all meetings, and working with all individuals from supporting departments such as scheduling and planning.
Write and review protocols and summaries.
Gather, track, and analyze product data as needed.
Understand and develop specifications, bills of materials, routers, SOPs and SUPs for prototypes.
Assist in root cause analysis for return product failures.
Responsible for investigating field complaints
Responsible for assessing design risk when completing change review
Responsible to create MS Project Plans, flow charts, tables and Power point presentations.
Assist with manufacturing to resolve production issues as required.
Actively communicate with lab and production to ensure the build and testing is done per project priority.
Perform feasibility studies on testing done out of house and calculate ROI on projects to provide support for new capital improvement projects.
Perform statistical analysis
Travel to other facilities.
Other duties as assigned.
Education and Experience Requirements –*
Requires a Bachelor of Science in an engineering, scientific or technical discipline.
Would prefer M.S. degree in an engineering, scientific or technical discipline or other professional certifications. Knowledge of Six Sigma is preferred.
3-5 years of related experience in the medical device industry in an engineering environment.
_Relocation and Visa Sponsorship are not offered with this position._*
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday",3.2,"Medical Components, Inc.
3.2","Harleysville, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,-1,-1,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
20,Senior Geospatial Information Systems (GIS) Integrations Engineer (JGASS II),-1,"AEVEX Aerospace seeks highly skilled/qualified candidates to join our Joint Geospatial Analytics Support Services team. AEVEX is a dynamic employee focused company that truly empowers their team members to succeed in every endeavor. If you are a high performer looking for a new challenge which directly impacts national security in an organization with outstanding professional development and excellent employee benefit opportunities, apply now.

Senior Geospatial Information Systems (GIS) Integrations Engineer

Job Description:

Administration/Integration is responsible for the development, implementation, and maintenance of an enterprise wide GIS and associated geospatial databases, network equipment and software tools and applications. The contractor shall perform complex analysis, design and modification of GIS applications and databases and evaluation of new GIS hardware and software. The Senior GIS Database Administrator is responsible for the development, implementation, and maintenance of an enterprise level geospatial database that contributes to the GIS architecture. The contractor duties shall include, but are not limited to, performing complex analysis, design, development and modification of GIS database strategies; monitoring and improving database performance and capacity; and planning for future expansion requirements. The Senior GIS Integrations Engineer is responsible for the development, administration, deployment, and maintenance of custom geospatial applications in support of intelligence organizations. The contractor duties shall include, but are not limited to, performing complex analysis, design, development and modification of .NET tools utilizing traditional RDBMS, NoSQL data stores, Hadoop File Stores and SOLR indexes.

Job Location:

Fayetteville, North Carolina

Clearance Requirement:

TOP SECRET level with SCI eligibility

Qualifications

Qualifications and Experience:

A typical successful Senior GIS Integrations Engineer shall perform advanced level planning, development, implementation, and maintenance of test and production custom applications. A minimum of eight years system integration experience. Shall possess the ability to create and develop custom tools utilizing RDBMS, NoSQL data stores, and distributed process of large datasets. Performs high level/expert intelligence systems architecture design and evaluation. Shall possess strong oral and written communication skills and be capable of effectively directing subordinates. Shall possess high level/expert ability to manage and work with static and dynamic streaming geospatial oriented data. Shall be proficient in C# and Python programming languages. The Senior GIS Integrations Engineer is required to obtain and maintain currency of the appropriate level certification in accordance with DODD 8570.01.

Must be able to pass a Psychological Evaluation and Drug Testing

Candidate must have the ability to deploy OCONUS. This includes the ability to obtain a Passport, Drivers License, applicable International permits, and pass medical and physical examinations.

Desired:

Bachelor's degree and three additional years of general experience in the intelligence community and geospatial systems experience are highly desirable.

About AEVEX Aerospace

AEVEX Aerospace, headquartered in Solana Beach, California, supports the U.S. national security mission around the world by providing full-spectrum airborne intelligence, surveillance and reconnaissance solutions. The company’s capabilities include custom design and engineering, sensor integration and sustainment, aircraft modification and certification, mission operations services, advanced intelligence data processing, exploitation, and dissemination solutions, and tailored hardware and software mission-system tools. With over 600 professionals, AEVEX uses agile and customized approaches to rapidly define, develop and deliver specialized solutions for airborne intelligence requirements to DoD, other government agencies, and commercial businesses. AEVEX has major offices in California, Massachusetts, North Carolina, Ohio, and Virginia.

AEVEX Aerospace is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"AEVEX AEROSPACE
3.8","Fayetteville, NC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
21,"Radar Modeling, Analysis, and Simulation Engineer",-1,"Radar Modeling and Analysis Engineer*
Signature Solutions, Inc., an engineering services company headquartered in Huntsville, AL, has an immediate opening for a Radar Modeling, Analysis, and Simulation Engineer supporting electromagnetic phenomenology, radar signature, and radar simulation development. A Bachelor of Science or greater in Electrical Engineering, Physics, or other associated technical field is required. Candidates with a minimum of 5 years or more related experience are a plus, but not a requirement. Applicants must have MATLAB experience. Strong verbal and written communication skills are required. Talented and motivated engineers or scientists ready to join a dynamic and engaging team and push the limits of their skills should apply.

Work will involve creating radar simulation model inputs for use include all-digital and hardware-in-the-loop environments. Engineers/Scientists will support first principles based electromagnetic model development, empirical data modeling, radar model algorithm refinement and development, weapon system performance assessment, and threat validation and accreditation analysis. Candidates should have strong programming skills; ideally with MATLAB. Applicants will work independently as well as in a team setting and must be able to balance multiple task requirements in a robust development environment.
Bachelor’s degree in engineering, physics, or mathematics is required; advanced degrees are a plus
5 years or more of related experience is a plus
Experience with Xpatch and Method of Moments predictive software is a plus
Strong software programming skills and experience are required; specific Matlab experience is a plus
Ability to obtain and/or hold a security clearance is required
Active DoD security clearance is a plus
*U.S. Citizenship is required for this position*
Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Engineering: 3 years (Preferred)
Location:
Huntsville, AL (Required)
License:
U.S. Citizenship (Required)",4.0,"Signature Solutions, Inc.
4.0","Huntsville, AL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
22,Sr. Software Engineer/Architect,$67k-$138k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Software Engineer works as part of an aggressive team, comprised of software engineers as well as machinery engineers involved with designing, developing, and testing complex software applications related to integration of real-time sensor based machinery predictive analytics with a transactional equipment information database, producing web based BI dash-board views. *Responsibilities: * · Develop high-quality software design and architecture · Design and develop full stack software applications · Convert client’s high level requirements into functional workflows and data models. Convert functional requirements into associated software design. · Develop software and documentation, as derived from the functional requirements definitions and the selected design approach. · Collaborate with other professionals to determine functional and non-functional requirements for new software or applications · Develop high-level product specifications with attention to architectural efficiency, system integration, and functionality in line with defined customer requirements · Coordinate cross-functionally to ensure projects meets business objectives and compliance standards · Develop test plans for performing multi-level software testing against design · Support test and deployment of new products and features *Requirements: * · BS or MS degree in Computer Science or Computer Engineering · At least 7 years experience in software architecture design, development, testing, and documentation · Experience in C# based software, developed in the ASP.Net Framework. · Experience in MS SQL and Oracle DB. · (Preferred) Experience in InfluxDB and InfluxQL · Experience in web development tools jQuery, Ajax, Infragistics, Mindfusion, HighCharts, and Bootstrap. · Understanding of the Software Development Life Cycle Methodology · Outstanding communication and presentation abilities · Excellent knowledge of software and application design and architecture · A technical mindset with great attention to detail · Outstanding communication and presentation abilities · Ability to work as a team member Job Type: Full-time Pay: $100,000.00 - $130,000.00 per year Benefits: * 401(k) * Flexible Schedule * Health Insurance * Relocation Assistance * Tuition Reimbursement Schedule: * Monday to Friday Experience: * Software Engineering: 7 years (Required) Location: * Millersville, MD 21108 (Required) Work Location: * One location Company's website: * The DEI Group Benefit Conditions: * Waiting period may apply * Only full-time employees eligible Work Remotely: * No",3.1,"The DEI Group
3.1","Millersville, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1975,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
23,Data Engineer,$59k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary of Responsibilities

Codes and develops software applications. Works as part of a development team on the design and implementation of analytical applications, including current Business Intelligence technologies, modern programming languages (Python, Scala, R) and current SQL database skills. Conducts requirement analysis, produces design documents on proposed solutions, and delivers consistent, test-covered, high quality code in a timely fashion. Recommends and completes product revisions or enhancements based on feedback. Develops and maintains documentation as required.

Performs work under minimal supervision. Handles moderate to complex issues and problems, and engages higher-level staff on only the most complex issues as necessary. Possesses comprehensive knowledge of subject matter. Provides coaching, and/or mentoring to a subordinate group.

Preferred Experience and Skills

Four to Eight year of related experience
Technical expertise and detail orientated
Complex problem-solving and critical thinking skills
Analytical thinking skills
Ability to build collaborative skills
Agile/SCRUM methodology experience
Azure DevOps experience
Property and Casualty insurance experience
4+ years of Hands-on experience with SQL databases, SSIS/Informatica ETL, Power BI, Cloud based integration tools.
Knowledge of Data warehousing concepts, and data modeling using Kimball methodology.

Preferred Education and Training

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field

INDSP",3.6,"West Bend Mutual Insurance Company
3.6","West Bend, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1894,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
24,Electrical Controls Engineer / PLC,-1,"OVERALL JOB PURPOSE: *
The engineer supports Victory Energy (VEO) by the execution of job requirements to meet schedules and budgets. This encompasses the creation of P&ID’s, knowledge of boiler codes, selecting instruments and control components, and preparing instrument data sheets that meet customer and VEO requirements. Design, develop, and implement all aspects of the programming for a Burner Management System (BMS), Boiler Control System (BCS), and Combustion Control System (CCS). Auxiliary equipment control systems are also the engineer’s responsibility. The engineer works with minimal supervision.
ESSENTIAL JOB DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: *
General knowledge of boilers: instrumentation and control concepts.
Ability to generate ISA data sheets, instrument indexes and logic drawings.
Work with Microsoft Excel and Word to generate and maintain department documents.
Organize documents both physically and electronically.
Read customer specifications and use them when developing control systems and choosing instruments.
Design electrical control systems in accordance with recognized codes and standards (NFPA 85, ASME, ISA, NEMA, UL, etc.).
Collaborate with department members and members of other VEO departments to resolve job-related concerns as required.
Be the sole engineer for an entire project or share portions thereof with other engineers.
Conform to existing departmental standards and offer objective, valuable input for the development of future standards.
Programming
Create software programs for BMS, BCS, CCS, and other systems as required using RSLogix500 and RSLogix5000 to program Allen-Bradley Programmable Logic/Automation Controllers (PLCs and PACs).
Work with FactoryTalk View Studio software to create graphically interactive Human Machine Interfaces (HMIs).
Enable system software/hardware to communicate with other systems via various communication protocols (Ethernet/IP, Modbus, Modbus TCP/IP, DeviceNet, ControlNet, etc.).
Assist other department personnel with control system Factory Acceptance Tests (FATs).
Troubleshoot software/hardware issues with fellow employees and/or product manufacturers as needed.
OTHER JOB DUTIES: *
View and manipulate drawings in AutoCAD.
Attend internal job-specific meetings.
Meet with customers and vendors at VEO.
Provide phone support to VEO customers and personnel in the field as needed.
Perform other duties as assigned.
ESSENTIAL JOB QUALIFICATIONS: *
B.S. in Electrical Engineering, Electrical Engineering Technology, Computer Engineering, or Computer Science with a minimum of 4 years experience in electrical controls.
At least 8 years experience in electrical controls programming will be considered in lieu of a B.S. degree.
PLC/PAC programming experience using Rockwell (Allen-Bradley) software *is required*. Additional manufacturer’s products is a bonus: GE Fanuc, Siemens, Triconex, Telemecanique, Modicon (Schneider Electric), etc.
Excellent interpersonal skills with ability and motivation to represent Victory Energy well when in the field with customers.
Must have valid driver’s license and be able to obtain a passport (if required).
A working knowledge of NFPA 85, and 54 are desired.
Prior boiler experience is a plus.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $70,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
NFPA 85 and 54: 4 years (Preferred)
Electrical Control Programming: 8 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.victoryenergy.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Yes",2.9,"Victory Energy Operations, LLC
2.9","Tulsa, OK",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
25,NETMAN Senior Engineer,$58k-$137k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Network Management (NETMAN) Senior Engineer provides services in support of the U.S. Army Network Enterprise Technology Command (NETCOM). You will provide engineering and capability management support for the NETMAN which consist of core toolsets that identify device failures, perform failure root cause analysis, monitor network performance, identify important trends, deep packet analysis, network analytics and situational awareness data providing an automated solution for analysts to quickly correlate data across multiple sensors located globally, and provides alerts when network behavior deviates from normal patterns as well as bandwidth utilization. Provide planning, design, development, engineering, integration, and technical and operational support to the ADCNOMS project.

Qualifications:

Previous experience in the following areas:
Experience in Network Management (such as CA Spectrum® and eHealth®)
Knowledge of CMDB/SS
Working Knowledge of Jumpstart (bare metal recovery) VM (Virtual Machine)
Windows and Linux Security Technical Implementation Guide (STIG), Security Content Automation Protocol (SCAP), and hardening using DISA’s Benchmark
CA Spectrum® Product Family (minimum 9.2)
CA eHealth® (minimum 6.3)
CA Business Intelligence (CABI) (minimum 3.2)
OneClick for CA Spectrum® (minimum 9.2) OneClick for eHealth® (minimum 6.3)
Microsoft Office suite and working knowledge of Microsoft Visio

Qualifications/Certifications:

DoD 8570.1-M certification: IAT Level III Certification
Computing Environment Certification, Network Management Certification
2 – 5 years of experience in information technology field
Active TS/SCI DoD Clearance required

Education:

BA/BS or equivalent experience.

Link Solutions, Inc. delivers reliable and effective Information Technology services to government clients in support of critical mission needs. Delivering a broad range of Infrastructure Operations, Application Development, Cybersecurity, Virtualization, Cloud and Mobility services, Link is quality and compliance focused, under our guiding philosophy “Mission First… Customer Always,” We are ISO 9001:2008, ISO 20000-1:2011, ISO 27001:2013 certified and appraised for CMMI ML3 for Services and Development.

Link Solutions, Inc. is an EOE. AA/M/F/D/V. We participate in the E-Verify Employment Verification Program.",3.7,"Link Solutions
3.7","Fort Huachuca, AZ",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
26,SAP Maintenance Master Data Engineer,-1,"L&T Technology Services Limited (LTTS) is a listed subsidiary of Larsen & Toubro Limited focused on Engineering and R&D (ER&D) services. We offer consultancy, design, development and testing services across the product and process development life cycle. Our customer base includes 52 Fortune 500 companies and 51 of the world’s top ER&D companies, across industrial products, medical devices, transportation, telecom & hi-tech, and the process industries. Headquartered in India, we have over 14,700 employees spread across 17 global design centers, 27 global sales offices and 48 innovation labs as of December 31, 2018. For additional information about L&T Technology Services log on to www.LntTechservices.com

Job Title: SAP Maintenance Master Data Technician

Seeking a skilled technical resource with 5 years experience in the maintenance reliability or design fields. The ideal candidate will have experience in:
Hands on equipment maintenance and management
Management of timelines and work outline
Able to read schematics and technical drawings
Working Knowledge of MircoSoft® suite
Working in a team environment, multiple customers
Consideration given to those with robotics and automation experience
Job Duties:
Perform asset walk down for equipment
Creation of Functional Locations in SAP up to 6th level (this will be trained)
Critical Assessment of equipment
Creation of Maintenance task list based on OEM recommendations
Creation of Maintenance Actives
Maintenance Planning & Scheduling
Creation of Bill of materials
Successful candidate will possess and demonstrate these attributes:
Dedication to collaborative work environment and committed to team success.2. Works for win-win scenarios, whenever possible
Internally motivated, goal driven, biased toward action
History of success and overcoming adversity
Experienced with multilayered matrix organizations
Have a Technology Degree or Military Equivalent
Communicates in timely, honest, candid, direct, and concise manager in all environments
Willing to work out of Anderson, Indiana location",4.1,"L&T TECHNOLOGY SERVICES LIMITED
4.1","Anderson, IN",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
27,Software Engineer II Virtual Hiring Event,$53k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Staples Virtual Hiring Event!

Event Details
Date: Thursday, October 22, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Software Engineer III

Software Engineer II

Benefits Analyst

Senior Digital & eCommerce Strategist

Intake Details:

Requirements

Review job specific requirements on Staples Retail Career Site (https://retailcareers.staples.com/)

Technical requirements

To attend the virtual hiring event, please ensure you're able to be on video via a computer or phone.

What to bring to this event

Resume

Completing our online application prior to the event is strongly encouraged and will speed up the process.

What to wear

Dress code is Casual (come as you are, but please be presentable).

About Staples

Staples helps the world work better with work solutions that deliver industry-leading products, services and expertise across office supplies, facilities, breakroom, furniture, technology, promotional products, and print and marketing services. The company supports businesses of all sizes from sole-preneurs to the Fortune 100 and everything in between. Headquartered near Boston, Mass., Staples operates in North America. More information about Staples is available at www.staples.com.

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

As a Software Engineer II for Staples, you will join an established technology team to help lead technical innovation within the Staples Digital Solutions division. You will be responsible for the design, development, testing, implementation, and support of applications and related integrations. You will partner with both technical and business teams on multiple initiatives and drive new features and enhancements.

Software Creation & implementation:

Develop in-depth knowledge of several Staples business processes and systems environment
Actively lead in the definition, design, development, testing and implementation of software functionality using the Agile methodology
Create, modify, and design complex programs, modules, routines, scripts and data objects from a detailed design where efficiency, performance and reliability are critical
Work with and advise both business and technology teams on how best to implement desired features and enhancements
Ensure that technical solutions follow best practices, are reliable, are easily maintainable and are scalable under sustained load
Full job description: retailcareers.staples.com",3.2,"Staples
3.2","Framingham, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1986,Company - Private,Office Supply Stores,Retail,$10+ billion (USD),-1
28,IT Senior Software Engineer/Architect,$57k-$120k (Glassdoor Est.),"POSITION TITLE: Systems Architect/Senior Software Engineer

REPORTS TO: IT/Project Manager

SUMMARY:

This role will be responsible for the overall development, performance, and efficacy of the entire codebase.

The Systems Architect/Senior Software Engineer works collaboratively within the IT department and other business units to provide technology architectural assessments, strategies, and roadmaps for one or more projects; oversees development and implementation of programs, providing technical leadership and support to software development teams by identifying best-fit architectural solutions; and actively participates and responsible for the overall development, performance, and efficacy of the entire codebase. This role will serve as a technical liaison between the business and the project team of developers and testers, will leverage their architecture, design, and technical skills and experience to develop cost-effective and timely solutions to meet functional, code quality, and performance requirements.

This role will require thorough knowledge of AWS with web, mobile, database, and API development experience with strong attention to detail and ability to identify errors and make adjustments while contributing towards developing and adhering to best-practices for applications that are scalable, secure, reliable, and critical to the business.

PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITES:

Design, develop, and drive the standards, development processes, systems architectures, and design patterns to support IT and business solutions
Collaborate with business users and stakeholders through design and implementation, including needs analysis and system requirements
Define and refine methodology and standards for setup, design, and implementation of the application or technology to meet the needs of the business
Generate detailed system requirements with cost projections, cost-benefit analysis, and ROI
Coordinate with product development teams in defining project scope and approaches
Coordinate with both internal and external software development teams in implementing software applications
Propose most effective architectural solutions to meet cost, quality, and schedule requirements
Coach or mentor other developers when required to ensure quality and productivity
Work with project team to design prototypes to validate application functionality
Assist managers in analyzing project requirements and project designs
Participate in design, code, and test plan reviews as needed and provide appropriate recommendations
Analyze software issues and recommend workaround solutions
Develop best practices to ensure software functionality, usability, reliability, and availability
Respond to business queries and concerns professionally and build positive customer relationships
Assist in development of design documents, white papers, training documents, and software architectural documents

QUALIFICATIONS:

Undergraduate Degree in Computer Science or related field from an accredited academic institution preferred
7+ years of experience working in software development
3+ years of experience working in application architect role
Proficient understanding of the AWS platform including: EC2 instances, Elastic Load Balancer, ElastiCache for Redis, Beanstalk, CodeDeploy, CloudWatch, and Route 53
Proficient understanding of virtualization technologies for servers, storage, and networking
Experience with PHP development with frameworks such as Laravel, PHPUnit, PEST, Composer
Experience with JavaScript language and frameworks including Vue.js
Experience with mobile application development for iOS and Android devices including React Native framework
Experience with container systems such as Docker and Docker Compose
Experience with tools such as: Jira, Bitbucket, Git, Node
Experience with database systems like MS SQL Server and PostgreSQL
Experience with Agile methodologies such as Scrum and Kanban
Experience working in the Healthcare domain a plus
Experience with Healthcare EDI transactions: ICD10, HL7, and FIHR a plus
Strong understanding of security, risk, compliance, disaster recovery, high availability architectures, hardware, operating systems, and networking connectivity

SKILLS:

Excellent verbal and written communication skills to ensure ability to articulate systems and application architecture to both technical developers and non-technical stakeholders
Shows initiative on assignments and professionally executes projects with very little direction, or can provide direction and leadership to technical teams
Knowledge of systems architecture
Keen attention to detail
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Able to gather and interpret relevant data and information
Able to provide reports and data management within tight time constraints
Able to adapt quickly to changing environment
Able to think analytically and be a proactive problem solver
Creative and innovative thinker
Diligent and meticulous
High regard for safety standards and quality control
Able to sit or stand for long hours at a time

We will conduct a full background check including criminal history, work history, education history; a complete motor vehicle report as applicable for the past 10 years; a chemical report, including drugs, alcohol and nicotine. We are a NON-NICOTINE Organization.

Benefits:

Health Insurance, Dental Insurance, Vision Insurance, TeleDoc services, 401K Retirement with Match, Short Term Disability, Long Term Disability, Life Insurance, Fifteen Days of Vacation yearly (accruing upon your start date), Six paid Company Holidays, Forty hours of paid Community Service yearly, Four Company Events per year, Continued education and training to develop our employees, as well as our Team(s). – Benefits only apply to FULL TIME EMPLOYEES.

Barnes is an Equal Opportunity Employer

Barnes Healthcare Services – We take care of people - Since 1909",2.8,"Barnes Healthcare Services
2.8","Gainesville, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1909,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
29,Senior Software Engineer,$47k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"Minimum Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree in computer science, information technology, or a related field or equivalent experience

Preferred Qualifications

3 years of experience in programming in Angular, Cocoa, Objective C, C#, HTML, .NET, PHP, Java, Progress or other programming languages
3 years of experience in software testing and design
3 years of experience in database management as it relates to software development
Proficiency in the Microsoft Office suite

Job Summary

The Senior Software Engineer uses various programming languages to develop, improve, test and/or maintain software that meets user needs. They mentor other software engineers, lead small development teams and act as an application owner. The Senior Software Engineer takes a lead role in design and code reviews, assists with delivery estimates and provides feedback about all aspects of the process.

Responsibilities

Design, develop or modify software and/or software systems by using various programming languages depending on the product and also taking the service architecture into consideration
Modify existing software to fix errors, improve the overall quality and functionality, or update integrations with other software
Analyze user needs to determine how software should be built or if existing software should be modified
Develop and/or perform software automated testing procedures, solutions and frameworks to ensure software functions as needed
Translate business requirements and specifications into usable and scalable software
Process and understand capabilities and limitations of data outputs from the software
Understand and assist with the technical infrastructure of an application or system
Troubleshoot performance issues
Lead design and code reviews
Lead delivery estimates
Determine and execute the software deployment process
Anticipate and communicate blockers, delays and cost ballooning within the team’s projects before they require escalation
Ensure expectations with the team and external stakeholders are clarified between all parties involved
Mentor other software engineers
Look for security vulnerabilities in coding
Participate in discussions about the team’s future vision and strategy

Who We Are

We're America's largest mortgage lender, closing loans in all 50 states. J.D. Power ranked Quicken Loans ""Highest in Customer Satisfaction in Primary Mortgage Origination"" for the past 10 consecutive years, 2010 - 2019. The company was also ranked highest in the nation for client satisfaction among mortgage servicers by J.D. Power for 6 consecutive years, 2014 through 2019, each year the company was eligible. There's a simple reason we've been so successful: We care about the people we work with.

If you're tired of stuffy, bureaucratic workplaces, then you'll be delighted to find something different here. We strive to make a creative, fun and collaborative environment you simply won't find anywhere else. Quicken Loans was named #1 in ESSENCE Magazine's first ever list of ""Best Places to Work for African Americans"" in 2015. We've been on Computerworld's ""Best Places to Work in IT"" list for 13 years running, hitting #1 the last 5 years. We were also ranked #14 in FORTUNE Magazine's list of ""100 Best Companies to Work For"" in 2018, remaining in the top 30 for the past 15 years.

Disclaimer

This is an outline of the primary responsibilities of this position. As with everything in life, things change. The tasks and responsibilities can be changed, added to, removed, amended, deleted and modified at any time by the leadership group.",3.9,"Quicken Loans
3.9","Detroit, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
30,Database Engineer/Developer,-1,"Database Engineer/Developer*
Salary: * 60-90k
Location: * Temple, GA
Database Engineer/Developer is responsible for all aspects of the design, development and delivery / implementation of data and database solutions. This person will need to:
be able to understand the SDLC model and what their specific activities are in designing and then delivering a solid, robust data solution
to understand how to develop and enforce coding standards and source code development standards for database objects / code
to design, develop and deliver data models that are clean, understandable, maintainable and solid
to design, develop and implement solid test plans to accurately test the data solution code / objects / resources
to support and maintain database servers and systems; and to develop and maintain detailed and accurate documentation per all project standards.
Responsibilities*
· Design, develop and deliver / implement data solutions to include: architecture design, prototyping of concepts to proof of concept, development of standards, design and development of test plans, code and module design, development and testing, data solution debugging, design and implementation of a solution that follows efficient design techniques and development that meets and exceeds the intent of the design of the data solution.

· Effectively manage day-to-day tasks / activities to effectively meet the deliverables and schedule of a data solution component within a larger application project

· Lend support to various business and technology teams as necessary during design, development and delivery to ensure solid, scalable, robust solutions

· Support and maintain data and database systems to meet business delivery specifications and needs

· Be able to clearly communicate complex technical designs and solutions in clear, concise and easily readable format by both technical and non-technical personnel

· Communicate effectively in both verbal (i.e. day-to-day discussions, team meetings) and written (requirements and design specifications) form, as well as have an overall ability to be clear and concise in all communications

· Accurately determine, assign, track and manage project task, activity, documentation, and time information

· Accurately assess the risks associated with each solution design / project
Skills*
· Strong design, development and implementation experience with .Net framework (5 yrs)

· Expertise with SQL, SQL server and Entity Framework (5 yrs)

· Experience with web application and design

· Thorough working knowledge of the design and database development processes, methodologies and their direct implementation to data solution projects

· Strong database setup, configuration, maintenance / support, programming, debugging and testing skills, troubleshooting skills, and experience with numerous operating systems, database environments and architectures

· Experience in developing and executing a data solution implementation plan

· Strong knowledge and experience with database tuning, ETL, DTS, T-SQL and business intelligence technologies

· Excellent ability to understand and express complex topics

· Demonstrated leadership and attention to detail skills through prior experience at the tactical / implementation levels
Education / Experience*
· Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering or a related field, AND At least 5 (five) years of experience in data solutions development.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
.NET: 5 years (Required)
SQL Server: 5 years (Required)
Location:
Temple, GA 30179 (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Confidential,"Temple, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
31,BI/Visualization Engineer,$60k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"The BI/Visualization Engineer will be responsible to design, build, test and deploy complex analytical solutions utilizing Qlik Sense from multiple data sources. This position will focus on developing and deploying insightful dashboards and utilizing Qlik Sense based on user and business requirements. Additionally, s/he will play a key role contributing to the development of Qlik extensions, mash-ups, embedded analytic solutions, server side extensions, and other strategic initiatives

Key Responsibilities: Technical

• Qlik Sense Mashup design and development experience including Qlik extensions, SSE, and various programming languages (JavaScript, HTML, CSS) • Participate with technology to evaluate appropriate database solutions and architecture

• Own full development life cycle from system design, development, testing and production implementation following Agile Methodologies

• Experience performing complex ETL working with: Relational Databases/API/CSV/Excel/XML/JSON

• MusMust know advanced scripting, aggregation functions, advanced charts, and extensions

• Experience with Qlik Sense Apps Deployment, Security & User role based access activity processes.

• Experience working with the Qlik Management Console (QMC), to provide data & application governance, library maintenance, and user application security

• Qlik architect & implementation on AWS experience would be a plus

Key Responsibilities: Analytical

• Be passionate about Business Intelligence with ability to read, write and communicate data in context to tell a meaningful story

• Perform QA tests on dashboard changes comparing old versions to new versions

• Must be confident enough to help guide users away from bad design

• Ability to identify different types of visualization models that best suits the user's needs and knowledge of front end best practice

• Strong drive to solve problems with creative solutions

Key Responsibilities: Organizational Agility

• Develop subject matter expertise across multiple business lines spanning finance & insurance

• Knowledge of version control tool (Github, SVN etc.), ticket tracking system (JIRA)

• Expert at figuring out the processes necessary to get things done. Can see opportunities for synergy and integration where others can't

• When applicable, prepare clear and concise application documentation for business users

• Advocate the voice of the client and drive enormous value for our customers!

• Ability to use ambiguity as an opportunity to shape the environment

• Excellent communications skills (written / verbal) at all organizational levels. Strong team player and willingness to learn is a must

Qualifications

• BA/BS or equivalent industry experience

• 5+ years’ related analytics experience

• Strong knowledge of SQL, VBA, Python, Qlikview, Qlik Sense,

• Ability to work in a dynamic environment under tight deadlines with changing priorities

• Must have strong attention to detail, be self-motivated

OneMagnify is an equal opportunity employer.
OneMagnify is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",4.7,"OneMagnify
4.7","Dearborn, MI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1967,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
32,Data Engineer: TS/SCI Clearance with Poly Required,$58k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"Type of Requisition:

Regular

Clearance Level Must Currently Possess:

Top Secret SCI + Polygraph

Clearance Level Must Be Able to Obtain:

Top Secret SCI + Polygraph

Suitability:

No Suitability Required

Public Trust/Other Required:

Job Family:

Software Development

Job Description:

Required:

Act as main point of contact and subject matter expert for issues involving technological aspects of telecommunications systems.

Evaluate information, explain technical literature, descriptions and specifications.

Provide recommendations regarding telecommunications systems, communicating requirements through non-technical third-parties.

Act as a consultant to technical operations pertaining to telecommunications systems, particularly regarding identification of system data security vulnerabilities.

Meet with other technical experts on behalf of or in conjunction with Customer representatives for the purpose of explaining the operation of complex systems.

Limited travel may be required to meet with such experts and familiarity with Customer practices in conducting such meetings.

Familiarity and expertise in the design, installation, and operation of core networks and operating systems for modern telecommunications systems including 2G, 3G, LTE and 4G networks.

Familiarity with related switching systems, billing systems, fraud detection and lawful intercept systems associated with the operation of these networks.

Scheduled Weekly Hours:

40

Travel Required:

10-25%

Telecommuting Options:

Telecommuting Not Allowed

Work Location:

USA VA McLean

Additional Work Locations:

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics
3.6","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
33,Data Engineer- TS/SCI with Polygraph,$57k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"Meet our professionals


CGI: An employer of choice
Position Description


CGI Federal is looking to hire Data Engineers to develop, enhance, and maintain data science capabilities for a government customer in Chantilly, VA.

Required qualifications to be successful in this role


•Due to the nature of this government contract, an Active TS/SCI full-scope polygraph is required.
•Bachelor's degree
•5+ years of data engineering or data management experience
•Experience with big-data tools, e.g., Hadoop, Spark, Kafka.
•Experience performing ETL processes, designing data infrastructure, optimizing performance, and adhering to compliance and audit requirements for data storage, architecture, cybersecurity, etc.

Desired Skills:
•Familiarity with machine learning, statistical modeling, time-series forecasting and/or geospatial analytics is preferred

#CGIFederalJob
#Poly2020

What you can expect from us


Build your career with us.

It is an extraordinary time to be in business. As digital transformation continues to accelerate, CGI is at the center of this changesupporting our clients' digital journeys and offering our professionals exciting career opportunities.

At CGI, our success comes from the talent and commitment of our professionals. As one team, we share the challenges and rewards that come from growing our company, which reinforces our culture of ownership. All of our professionals benefit from the value we collectively create.

Be part of building one of the largest independent technology and business services firms in the world.

Learn more about CGI atwww.cgi.com.

No unsolicited agency referrals please.

CGI is an equal opportunity employer.

Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, ethnicity, ancestry, color, sex, religion, creed, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, medical condition, military and veteran status, marital status, sexual orientation or perceived sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, and gender expression, familial status, political affiliation, genetic information, or any other legally protected status or characteristics.

CGI provides reasonable accommodations to qualified individuals with disabilities. If you need an accommodation to apply for a job in the U.S., please email the CGI U.S. Employment Compliance mailbox atUS_Employment_Compliance@cgi.com. You will need to reference the requisition number of the position in which you are interested. Your message will be routed to the appropriate recruiter who will assist you.Please note, this email address is only to be used for those individuals who need an accommodation to apply for a job. Emails for any other reason or those that do not include a requisition number will not be returned.

We make it easy to translate military experience and skills! Clickhere to be directed to our site that is dedicated to veterans and transitioning service members.

All CGI offers of employment in the U.S. are contingent upon the ability to successfully complete a background investigation. Background investigation components can vary dependent upon specific assignment and/or level of US government security clearance held.

CGI will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with CGI's legal duty to furnish information.",3.6,"CGI
3.6","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$10+ billion (USD),-1
34,Software Development Engineer - CloudWatch,$74k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"· 4+ years of professional software development experience
· 3+ years of programming experience with at least one modern language such as Java, C++, or C# including object-oriented design
· 2+ years of experience contributing to the architecture and design (architecture, design patterns, reliability and scaling) of new and current systems

Come change the way the world sees the Cloud!

Amazon CloudWatch gives customers actionable visibility into the health of their applications and services. Today we run one of the largest time-series data stores on the planet and teams in CloudWatch solve problems of massive metric ingestion, distributed systems/cloud computing, data visualization, log processing and analytics, anomaly detection, and predictive analytics. Our services are the “eyes and ears” for customers everywhere, both inside Amazon along with AWS customers across the world.

We are looking for software development engineers that are passionate about creating application software that underpins the robust CloudWatch system. On any given day, we use Python, Java, SQL, Lambda, DynamoDB, and CloudFormation, as well as other public AWS services and a host of Amazon-internal tools. We don’t expect you to be an expert in, or necessarily even be familiar with, all of the technologies listed above, but we do expect you to be excited to learn about them!

This position involves on-call responsibilities, typically for one week every two months. We don’t like getting paged in the middle of the night or on the weekend, so we work to ensure that our systems are fault tolerant. When we do get paged, we work together to resolve the root cause so that don’t get paged for the same issue twice.

Our team is dedicated to supporting new team members. We are partnered with a team of mostly mid-level engineers who enjoy helping new engineers grow through one-on-one mentoring and thorough, but kind, code reviews.

We take code reviews seriously. We believe that good code reviews raise our code quality, grow our technical acumen, and provide opportunities to support and share knowledge with each other.

We care about your career growth. We try to assign projects and tasks based on what will help each team member develop into a more well-rounded engineer and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.

Our team is family-oriented and values work-life balance. Most days, our team is located in our northern VA office, but we’re also flexible when people occasionally need to work from home. We generally keep core in-office hours from 10am to 4pm. About half of us come in earlier and the other half of us stay later.

We are building a new team from scratch, and we're looking for a new members who are enthusiastic, empathetic, curious, motivated, and reliable; someone who will help us build the positive team culture we’ve been cultivating.

· Proficient in GoLang programming
· Administrative knowledge in both Linux and Windows
· Hands on working experience with containers
· Experience with open source software development
· Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal
· Experience with Agile engineering practices (continuous integration, continuous release, etc.)",3.9,"Amazon Dev Center U.S., Inc.
3.9","Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
35,Cloud Software Engineer (TS with Poly Required),-1,"Do you enjoy working in an environment that uses leading technologies in a fast paced environment? You will be developing prototypes answering new questions as well as providing better answers to existing questions Working in a variety of environments, the successful candidate will use leading edge technologies to develop analytics pulling data from multiple cyber sources, as well as classic SIGINT. These analytics will be used in standard presentation systems throughout the enterprise to support missions throughout the world covering a variety of subjects.. There are also opportunities to evaluate and work with new leading edge platforms, frameworks and technologies, all while working directly with the customer in a highly collaborative, integrated environment.

What you will like about this position…
Developing answers to questions via Java Map/Reduce, making them available via the corporate tool suites
Opportunities to research and work with multiple platforms for development
Working in a cohesive, small team environment
Basic Qualifications
At least five (5) years of general experience in software development/engineering, including requirements analysis, installation, integration, evaluation, enhancement, maintenance, testing, and problem diagnosis/resolution.
At least three (3) years of experience developing software with high level languages (such as Java, C, C++), developing software in UNIX/Linux (RedHat versions 3-5+), and software integration and testing (to include developing and implementing test plans and scripts).
At least two (2) years of experience with distributed scalable Big Data Store (NoSQL) such as H Base, CloudBase/Accumulo, Big Table, etc., as well as Map Reduce programming model, the Hadoop Distributed File System (HDFS), and technologies such as Hadoop, Hive, Pig, Etc.
Shall have demonstrated work experience with 1) Serialization such as JSON and/or BSON, 2) developing restful services, and 3) using source code management tools.
A bachelor’s degree in computer science, engineering, mathematics or a related discipline may be substituted for 4 years of general experience.
Active TS with Poly is required. Candidates without an active clearance will not be considered.

PCI is an equal opportunity employer with over 12 years supporting the customer, and partnerships with Amazon, Elastic and Microsoft Azure. We consider our employees our most valuable asset, prioritizing company culture and providing generous benefits.

We were founded on the principal that uncompromising personal integrity and ethics are the primary guides in all business situations. We believe that the company’s collective character is of utmost importance, the trust of our clients is sacred, and view reliability as a requisite quality in each of our professionals. PCI is centered on ensuring three principles are ingrained in everything that we do: Performance, Commitment and Integrity.",4.6,"PCI
4.6",Maryland,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
36,Senior Applications Engineer/Atlassian Administrator,$60k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Audacious Inquiry is seeking a talented, adaptable, Senior level Atlassian administrator to become part of a dynamic Atlassian services team. The Applications Engineer will be instrumental in helping to support Atlassian applications for organizations that are changing healthcare across the country. Our Atlassian administrators are a passionate group of quick learners, who identify problems and provide custom solutions using Atlassian tools while maintaining high quality of Atlassian services. If you are looking for a career with room for advancement and professional growth, in a fun and collaborative environment that also makes a difference to your community, look no further!

RESPONSIBILITIES
Configuring, maintaining, and administering multiple Atlassian applications/tools across multiple clients.
Collaborate with the team to improve and maintain the architecture of existing Atlassian implementations.
Daily management of Atlassian application stack – JIRA, Jira Service Desk, Portfolio, Confluence, Bitbucket and Trello.
Perform software upgrades and apply security patches to our self-hosted Atlassian instances.
Promote usage of Atlassian tool set with various teams across the organization.
Work with all departments to on-board users and implement custom solutions to meet the operational needs of the teams
Conduct periodic both internal and external user training for Jira, Service Desk, Portfolio, Confluence, Trello and Opsgenie
Ensure best practices are followed, and systems are compliant to HIPAA and other required regulations.
Train and guide junior admins in the team in administering Atlassian tools
Collaborate with various internal and external teams to identify business needs and use cases for Atlassian tools.
Communicate effectively with business partners and clients when needed.
QUALIFICATIONS

Required
Bachelor’s or master’s degree in computer science, engineering, or related field
Active ACP-400 or ACP-100 Atlassian certifications
2-3 years of administration experience of the following Atlassian tools; Jira Software, Jira Service desk and confluence
Experience in administering and maintaining Linux based systems.
Familiarity with SQL and proficiency in writing intermediate level database queries
Experience in writing automation scripts in Groovy, Bash and Python.
Working knowledge of Networking, DNS, Databases, Web proxies, Active Directory, Web APIs.
Exposure to AWS, Azure, and other cloud platforms
Experience with maintaining and customizing Restful API’s
Must be a great Team player.
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Great attention to detail and ability to handle competing priorities
Preferred
AWS cloud practitioner certification
Certifications in ITIL or Agile frameworks
Experience in Salesforce administration preferred.
Experience in a healthcare or public health setting
Experience in administering Postgres SQL or MYSQL
Experience with CI/CD principles and version controlling systems like GIT
Experience with enterprise server and application monitoring tools, integration with JVM monitoring using New Relic or Splunk is a plus
Experience in Atlassian cloud and data center deployments
Previous experience in developing apps for Atlassian marketplace
This position may include access to protected health information (PHI) and confidential information. The successful candidate will be required to complete training and must handle all PHI appropriately according to Ai policies, and all applicable laws and regulations.

What Makes You a Great Fit for Audacious Inquiry:
You are a lifelong learner and passionate about learning new things, taking on new challenges, and continually improving.
You thrive in a challenging and collaborative environment.
You are solution-driven with an ability to understand the big picture
You have great analytical and problem-solving skills.
You have strong communication skills and an ability to synthesize information.
Highly organized, detail oriented, and able to work autonomously with minimal direction.
What Audacious Inquiry Offers:
Working with and learning from the top talent in the healthcare IT industry in the US – we are thought leaders in health information technology and policy. Our team is passionate about making healthcare more connected and we love to share our knowledge and learn from each other.
Making a real difference in the healthcare industry on a large scale and improving healthcare outcomes for individual patients – you’ll get to work on really cool projects and feel good about the work you’re doing. Check out the case studies on our website for examples!
Performance bonuses – we ask for high performance from our team and we make sure to recognize and reward high performance with competitive compensation and annual bonuses.
Growth and professional development – we’re invested in every Ai team member and we encourage our team to pursue opportunities to grow their skills, and make sure you have a path for growth at Ai that you’re excited about.
Benefits and perks – we cover the full cost of health insurance for employees and most of the cost for dependents, along with a full suite of benefits, including 401k matching, monthly wellness bonuses, cell phone reimbursement, paid time off, and a lot more.
Our culture – this is one of the best things about working with Audacious Inquiry, and one of the things we’re most proud of. We’re inclusive, we’re collaborative, we’re supportive, and it’s fun here! Check out our careers page and our social media for some recent examples.
Ai is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer.
Audacious Inquiry is deeply committed to the principles of equity, diversity, and inclusiveness. We seek to create a pluralistic community for all team members, and we are proud to be an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity employer. We encourage all people to apply",4.4,"Audacious Inquiry
4.4","Baltimore, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
37,Data Architect,$86k-$142k (Glassdoor Est.),"GEICO is looking for an IT Data Architect for the Decision Sciences and Business Transformation (DSaT) Data Consumption team where we work to make GEICO enterprise data usable and easily accessible for our internal customers. We are looking for a highly motivated, high energy, self-starter, problem solver, with a positive attitude, a strong work ethic, and solid interpersonal and communication skills. Must have intellectual curiosity and a desire to learn new skills and technologies.

Qualifications:
Minimum 4 years’ experience as an IT Data Architect

Able to gather requirements from both IT and the Business partners

Demonstrate the ability to create high quality technical artifacts such as Source to Target Mappings (STMs) and Record Level Specifications (RLS)

Data Warehouse experience. Candidate must have experience with designing Data Warehouse schemas (3NF model) as well as Data Mart schemas (Dimensional model)

Familiarity with XML/JSON schemas
Perform data profiling using SQL

Prototype ETL transformation logic using Advanced SQL techniques

Actively participate in data architecture and project discussions

Ability to thrive while working on ambiguous or challenging projects

Able to multi-task under tight deadlines

Able to work independently as well as be a strong team player

Proficient with erwin Data Modeler and MS Office Suite

Big Data experience

Preferred Skills:

P&C Insurance Subject Area Model experience (i.e. Policy, Sales, Service, Claims, and Billing systems)

UNIX command line and vi editor skills
Databases: Preferably DB2 and/or Netezza
Big Data Experience. Hadoop, Hive, Linux.

Note: The safety of our associates, both current and future, is GEICO’s highest priority. At this time, most of our associates are working remotely due to the current COVID-19 pandemic. Candidates who are selected for this position will be trained remotely and must be able to work from home in a designated work area. Once GEICO determines it is safe for associates to return to the office, candidates may be required to work in our Chevy Chase, MD office.

Qualifications

About GEICO

For more than 75 years, GEICO has stood out from the rest of the insurance industry! We are one of the nation's largest and fastest-growing auto insurers thanks to our low rates, outstanding service and clever marketing. We're an industry leader employing thousands of dedicated and hard-working associates. As a wholly owned subsidiary of Berkshire Hathaway, we offer associates training and career advancement in a financially stable and rewarding workplace.

Benefits:

As a full-time IT Architect, you’ll enjoy our Total Rewards Program* to help secure your financial future and preserve your health and well-being, including:

Premier Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance with no waiting period**

Paid Vacation, Sick and Parental Leave

401(k) Plan with Profit Sharing
Tuition Reimbursement
Paid Training and Licensures
Benefits may be different by location. Benefit eligibility requirements vary and may include length of service.
*Coverage begins with the pay period after hire date. Must enroll in New Hire Benefits within 30 days of the date of hire for coverage to take effect.",3.4,"GEICO
3.4","Chevy Chase, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1936,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
38,Cybersecurity Systems Engineer - Secret Clearance Required,-1,"Job Summary*
The candidate will support a variety of security and engineering activities across Cybersecurity, Risk Management, C&A or A&A, Information Assurance oversight, technical support and documentation, as specified in the DoD Instruction 8500.01 and SECNAV Instruction 5239.3B. Primarily candidates will be expected to support data gathering, accreditation package development for systems covered under DIACAP or RMF. Candidates holding a current Navy Validator endorsement may also provide validation services for specific systems and artifacts. Candidates will support laboratory device testing for impacts to performance functionality and security compliance as well as assessments of system hardening through the review of Security Technical Implementation Guides (STIG) and Security Requirements Guides (SRG). Candidates may support other system assessment events as well.
Responsibilities and Duties*
The candidate is expected to be able to perform, but is not limited to, the following activities:
Author DoD IA Accreditation artifacts
Document a system from an IA perspective using Microsoft Office including MS Word, MS Excel and MS Visio and other appropriate tools such as eMASS and VRAM.
Derive, document and/or identify system CONOPS for Mission Assurance Categorization per DoDI 8500.2.
Research and recommend logical and physical solutions that prevent, detect and correct the system to be certified and accredited.
Apply DISA Security Technical Implementation Guides (STIGs) and NSA recommendations.
Identify disagreements between as built specifications, security requirements and DoD security policies and recommend approaches to bring the system into compliance.
Author and revise system requirements and specifications to meet DoD security policies.
Perform vulnerability tests using manual techniques, Assured Compliance Assessment Solution (ACAS) and other similar and appropriate IA and security tools.
Plan, execute and document risk assessments against known vulnerabilities based upon security approaches and known hacker techniques and exploits.
Identify and perform security analysis of connectivity relationships between the subject US Naval warfare system and the equipment to which it interfaces, both physically and virtually.
ations

Candidates must be able to conduct themselves in a professional manner within office, laboratory, or operational military environments. Candidates should be able to periodically lift up to 50 lbs. for short periods of time (e.g. lifting/moving laboratory equipment).
Required knowledge and years of experience*
Five (5) years professional systems engineering experience with a DoD major platform, weapon, Command and Control (C2), or fire control systems program, with five (5) years concurrent experience as a team leader performing system engineering and mission engineering efforts that include developing requirements, top level designs and system architectures for software intensive systems. This includes experience related to the identification, analysis and resolution of complex systems engineering design issues involving platform, weapon, C2, and fire control systems for Navy/Joint warfighting capabilities.

Specialized Cyber-Security Systems Engineering Experience – Three (3) years generalized cyber-security experience in preparing and submitting documentation for obtaining Navy/DoD security A&A of major weapon systems. Two (2) years of this experience supporting engineering efforts to obtain the A&A of the weapon systems via RMF or predecessor processes. As per DoD Directive 8570, this position shall require IAM level II certification or higher. This position shall also require an IT-1 level clearance.
Education Requirements*
A Bachelor’s of Science (BS) degree from an accredited college or university in an engineering, scientific, or technical discipline, or four (4) years of a demonstrated and established knowledge base and relevant subject matter expertise relating to the qualification requirements of the position; or US Naval operational experience at the E7 level or higher.
Certifications*
Minimum of a DoD 8570.01-M IAM Level II certification (CISSP, CAP, CASP+ CE, CISM, GSLC or CCSIO) AND computing environment (e.g. Windows, Linux, Cisco, etc.) certification or training.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $100,000.00 - $140,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Cyber Security: 7 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
License:
DOD 8570 or IAM Level II (Required)
Secret Clearance (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",3.9,"Systems Technology Forum Ltd
3.9","Dahlgren, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
39,Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst,$62k-$111k (Glassdoor Est.),"Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst

Join a member-driven leader in a fast-paced, challenging and collaborative environment with the shared mission of supporting America’s network of rural electric cooperatives. Since its formation in 1969, National Rural Utilities Cooperative Finance Corporation, or CFC, located in Dulles, Virginia, has provided capital and industry-leading financial products to more than 900 not-for-profit, consumer-controlled utility systems across the United States. Our exceptional team delivers the “CFC Difference” that encompasses our values of service, integrity and excellence in all our interactions.

CFC has a need for a Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst in the BID - Industry Research & Analysis group. In this position you will maintain a high-degree of industry expertise and awareness of current developments in markets, regulations and technologies by conducting research and data analysis on emerging industry trends in the energy and utility sectors. This role contributes to CFC’s thought leadership through expertise and knowledge that is used to support management decision-making and identify areas where CFC can provide value to its utility member-owners with innovative financing products and services and business support tools.

As a Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst, you will:

• Monitor and conduct analysis of evolving industry, regulatory and technology short and long term trends and developments and their impacts on the electric utility industry and electric cooperatives.
• Utilize data mining and various data analytics techniques including visualization, statistical modeling, regression and probabilistic analyses (e.g. Monte Carlo simulations) to create models that inform risk and opportunity based decision-making.
• Develop economic and financial analytical models and tools capable of forecasting financial performance for use in budgeting, scenario planning and strategic planning.
• Serve as a leader and resource for industry data, market intelligence and modeling expertise to internal and external stakeholders through industry meetings, conferences, membership meetings and other venues.
• Conduct financial and economic analysis of utility investment scenarios through pro forma analysis.
• Work collaboratively across all functions while building strong relationships and credibility through joint research and analysis.

To be successful, you will need:

• Bachelor’s degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Finance, Engineering or other related field.
• Master’s degree in one of the above preferred.
• 8 years of experience in any combination of the following electric utility industry, consulting, finance, or economic forecast modeling and data analytics.
• Strong data mining, data analysis and modeling skills.
• Advanced knowledge of various database and analysis tools (e.g. Visual Basic, SQL, Qlikview, Monte Carlo, artificial intelligence techniques and statistical programming languages) and ability to build forecast models.
• Proficiency in regression analysis techniques and in extracting value from big data sets by leveraging business intelligence tools (e.g. Power BI, Tableau).
• Proven ability to work collaboratively and effectively in a matrixed and team environment and across the organization at all levels.
• Strong and effective verbal, written and presentation communication skills.
• Ability to work effectively in a consultative role.
• Highly organized, with ability to prioritize and manage multiple assignments in a dynamic work environment while maintaining high quality and error free work with minimal supervision.

We offer a comprehensive benefits package that includes short-term and long-term incentive opportunities; an employer-paid pension plan; 401(k); medical, dental and vision insurance; a generous leave policy; onsite gym; and more—all in a friendly, professional work environment. For additional information, please visit our website at www.nrucfc.coop.

CFC is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to workforce diversity.",3.4,"National Rural Utilities Cooperative Finance Corporation
3.4","Dulles, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1969,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
40,Enterprise Software Engineer,$70k-$126k (Glassdoor Est.),"Piping Rock is aggressively expanding its global reach and with it, its use of data and analytics to drive business decisions. We are looking for a great Enterprise Software Architect. This is a key role that reports into the VP of Technology Operations.

Be at the forefront of the future of health and wellness, with the ability to work in a fast paced, family owned entrepreneurial environment where the work is meaningful, associates are valued, and you can grow your long-term career. Joining Piping Rock means being part of a fast-growing team where you can take ownership of your work and be a decision maker, where you are encouraged to work smarter, not harder, with all of the tools necessary to be successful.

We are looking for talented, self-motivated people to join us in this effort. Piping Rock manufactures and packages its own branded product lines, operating its own end-to-end supply chain, all in-house. This is how we consistently deliver the best quality and value directly to customers all across the globe.

We are quickly becoming a data-driven commerce organization that is leveraging any available technologies to drive growth. While we are growing fast, we are maintaining a laser focus on our customers and are driven by our desire to delight them. We see endless opportunities in delivering the best possible experience - adding value, reducing friction and earning loyalty each step of the way.

As an Enterprise Software Architect, you’ll be involved in the whole lifecycle of PipingRock's digital product portfolio. You will bring leadership - and thought-leadership - to a great team whose focus is enablement - of your business/marketing side partners; on the engineering side for implementation and delivery; and of our customers – whose happiness, satisfaction and loyalty drive everything we do here.

Your responsibilities will include:

Design and deliver the elegant, frictionless digital products that will enhance and expand our ability to delight our customers, by delivering the best digital experience in the business.
Master the business we are in. We are in an interesting, challenging, complex, international business space that requires full engagement. We believe in drinking from the firehose, becoming the job, and knowing our customers as real people.
Be hands-on. This role is about architecture AND engineering. We are engineers here, including leadership. We get our hands dirty and we wouldn't have it any other way. If your comfort zone leans more toward the PowerPoint and LucidChart side, all due respect, let's pass. Yes, we want the diagrams, but they're only part of this role, which is waiting for a builder.
Design and implement data solutions that solve for this problem space - elegant, performant, secure and highly available. This applies equally to our green-field initiatives and our existing systems and solutions - and we have plenty of both.
Engage on an end-to-end basis: from strategic infrastructure planning; to close partnership with the dev and product teams; right on through to our delighted customers.
Design and implement effective database solutions and models to store and retrieve company data.
Examine and identify database structural necessities by evaluating client operations, applications, and programming.
Design, build and maintain in accordance with organizational requirements for compliance and other regulations. PCI, SOC, SOX, ADA, HIPAA, etc.
Communicate effectively in all formats - across the team and up to senior leadership.
Oversee the migration of data from legacy systems to new solutions.
Monitor the system performance by performing regular tests, troubleshooting and integrating new features.
Recommend solutions to improve new and existing database systems.
Be generous at sharing knowledge, while being curious and learning from your teammates as well. Be a mentor, and generally make your team better.
Offer support by responding to system problems in a timely manner.

Requirements

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or relevant field.
A minimum of 5 years’ experience in a similar role.
10 years’ experience in the web tech space as a whole.
Strong experience with cloud-based solutions (emphasis on AWS), cloud-first strategy and migration/transformation/hybridized environments. Excellent grasp of AWS vocabulary, with skills to back up the vocab. We’ll ask what you’ve built, and how.
Specific experience with enterprise-level e-commerce is preferred.
Programming: expert-level at client-side web - HTML/CSS/JS, etc. Expert level at server-side/full-stack, both architectural and hands-on.
Demonstrable ability to model/map problem spaces to elegant architectural solutions.
Be experienced and comfortable working in customer-first, product- Agile
Excellent organizational and analytical abilities.
Outstanding problem solver.
True customer-first mindset in the context of Agile methodologies.
Be a great teammate. We want to be happy to see you in the morning, and vice versa. That’s very important here.
Excellent communications skills – verbal, written and visual.

Benefits

We know talent when we see it, and we value it highly. For the right candidates, this is a great place to come to work every day. If it sounds like we're talking about you, we really hope to hear from you.

Piping Rock proudly offers comprehensive medical, dental, vision plans to all full-time associates. In addition, voluntary life insurance, flexible spending plans, and short-term disability plans may be optionally added. All full-time associates also receive group term life insurance and long-term disability coverage. Associates are eligible to participate in a 401(k) savings plan with a generous company match.

Piping Rock Health Products LLC is an equal opportunity employer.",3.4,"Piping Rock Health Products
3.4","Bohemia, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
41,Senior UI Software Engineer,$73k-$190k (Glassdoor Est.),"Riverside Research has an immediate opening at Wright-Patterson AFB, Ohio for a Senior UI Software Engineer.

The Senior UI Software Engineer will lead a small team of geographically distributed UI developers in improving the usability and capabilities of the UI for a computational physics tool developed by the US Government.

Built using web technologies (HTML5, WebGL, Google Protocol Buffers, etc.), the UI supports the construction and attribution of computer aided design (CAD) geometries, manages simulation execution, and displays post-processing visualizations. Primarily deployed to the desktop while interfacing with a C++ backend server, the tool is positioned for future deployment over the web. Candidates will ideally have experience in both types of deployment.

All Riverside Research opportunities require U.S. citizenship.

Job Responsibilities:
•Be the Technical Lead for a team of approximately 4 geographically distributed UI developers
•Collaborate with the team to design a system architecture program that satisfies requirements, while taking into account both near- and long-term customer objectives
•Interface with expert users to understand their needs
•Apply User Experience (UX) best-practices to improve the usability of the software
•Survey successful implementations of similar applications and make recommendations on how those approaches may be used
•Develop UI software using HTML and JavaScript and its language extensions
•Develop server/backend software as a hybrid of C++ and Python
•Other duties as assigned

Qualifications:
• Ability to obtain and maintain a Secret security clearance
• Bachelor’s degree or higher in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or related field.
• Extensive experience in UI/UX software Web development using such tools as JavaScript, Angular, Node, Restful APIs, or similar.
• Must be able to lead a team of developers
• Experience with compiled languages, such as C++, C, Java, C#, or similar
• Development experience on Windows and Linux systems including development of shell scripts
• Experience with revision control systems and managing requirements within an issue tracking system

Desired Qualifications:
• Experience combining web client and server backend components into a single thick client application using tools such as Chromium Embedded Framework, Electron.js, or similar
• Experience with full stack development, design, and review
• Experience with 3D rendering libraries such as X3D, three.js, WebGL, OpenGL, or similar
• Experience working in projects comprising >100,000 source lines of code
• Familiarity with CAD systems like AutoCAD, SolidWorks, etc
• Experience developing with interpreted languages and numerical libraries such as Python and numpy
• Ability to produce data visualizations in scripted plotting tools such as matplotlib

IND1
Riverside Research strives to be one of America’s premier providers of independent, trusted technical and scientific expertise. As we continue to add experienced, technically astute staff, we are looking for highly motivated, talented team members that can help our DoD and Intelligence Community (IC) customers continue delivery of world class programs. As a not-for-profit, technology-oriented Defense Company, we believe service to customers and support of our staff is our mission. Our goal is to serve as a destination company by providing an industry-leading, positive, and rewarding employee experience for all who join us. We aspire to be a valued partner to our customers and to earn their trust through our unwavering commitment to achieve timely, innovative, cost-effective and mission-focused solutions.

All positions at Riverside Research are subject to background investigations. Employment is contingent upon successful completion of a background investigation including criminal history and identity check.

This contractor and subcontractor shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR 60-741.5(a). This regulation prohibits discrimination against qualified individuals on the basis of disability, and requires affirmative action by covered prime contractors and subcontractors to employ and advance in employment qualified individuals with disabilities.

This contractor and subcontractor shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR 60-300.5(a). This regulation prohibits discrimination against qualified protected veterans, and requires affirmative action by covered contractors and subcontractors to employ and advance in employment qualified protected veterans.",3.4,"Riverside Research
3.4","Wright Patterson AFB, OH",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1967,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
42,Software Systems Engineer (nCino),$76k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Farm Credit Mid-America, we believe people are our strongest asset. We are consistently looking to hire individuals from a wide range of experience and capabilities who have a desire to serve. Currently, we have over 1,400 employees across Indiana, Ohio, Kentucky and Tennessee.

We are looking for a Certified Sales force Administrator or a Certified nCino Administrater with 2 plus years experience implementing and administering nCino. The primary function of this position will be to provide experience in Salesforce and nCino administration within a financial organization .

MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES :

• Reviews and analyzes requirements to design a solution utilizing the lightning app builder, lightning components, the available declarative development tools, AppExchange apps, or a combination of these

• Communicates and builds strong relationships with end users, stakeholders, vendors and leadership

• Troubleshoots errors, overcome challenging roadblocks, or design creative solutions to solve challenging requests

• Develops documentation as necessary to support users

• Designs, documents, builds, tests and deploys alerts, reports, dashboards and workflows.

• Assists with ongoing system administration including security, profiles, workflow rules, custom objects, custom fields, etc.

• Integrates Salesforce/nCino with other 3rd party apps, downstream Enterprise applications, and business intelligence databases

• Assists with release evaluations including updating user guides and system documentation

• Manages ongoing support requests and administrative needs of the client

• Regularly performs database de-duping and clean-up procedures

• Experience supporting Change Management, Data Migration, and Production Deployment processes and tools

• Applying Analytics and Data Management skills to create Reports and Dashboards across the Association

• Mentor new nCino/Salesforce Administrators

• Salesforce Lightning Experience

EXPERIENCE IN THE FOLLOWING IS A PLUS:

• Certified Salesforce Advanced Administrator, and/or other Salesforce certifications

• Certified Salesforce Sales Cloud or Service Cloud Consultant

• IPaaS software (Azure, Apigee, Mulesoft etc.)

• Salesforce Financial Services Cloud

• Ability to Configure and Deploy Community Cloud Solutions for Partners and External Customers

Knowledge in the following area(s) is a plus; Database systems and data integration experience, MS SQL, Non-Salesforce Customer Relationship Management (CRM) systems, IT Service Management software, Enterprise Content Management software.

MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS

Education and Experience

Bachelor's degree in computer science, business or related field; with at least one year experience supporting enterprise software applications; or a minimum of four years of direct experience in a software administration/software implementation role. Good project management skills, oral and written communication skills, and analytical skills necessary.

Here's What We Can Offer You...

Farm Credit Mid-America has an outstanding Total Rewards package, which includes, but is not limited to:

Salary commensurate with experience
15 vacation days, 15 sick days, and 11 paid holidays per year
401(k) plan with outstanding match
Medical, Dental, Vision, STD, LTD, Life/AD&D benefits, etc.
Fitness Incentive Program
Tuition assistance for employees and dependents.

Requirements of the job include the ability to do the work, with or without reasonable accommodations. It is the Association's policy to make reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities. Leadership retains the right to add, subtract or change duties of the position at any time.

IND123

Farm Credit Mid-America is an Equal Opportunity Employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, veteran status, disability or any other category protected by law.

IND123",3.7,"Farm Credit Mid-America
3.7","Louisville, KY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1985,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
43,Data Architect,-1,"Now Hiring a Data Architect

Ability to maintain an Interim Secret Clearance is Required

As a Data Architect, you will use cutting edge cloud and data technologies to power the mission of our clients and streamline services. Join our team of Data and Cloud professionals and accomplish what others only dream of. An Interim Secret Clearance is required and this is a remote position but must be able to travel once every quarter.

Profile of Success

Ability to apply your skills in Azure Cognitive Services, Azure PaaS, data science, data analytics, and data warehousing to pioneer Azure cloud and data services within the DoD, bringing Azure Data Factory to IL4 & IL5
Work in a team with other smart AIS employees and use cutting edge technologies to solve challenging enterprise problems
Use experience working with Azure Data & Storage, Azure Analytics & Azure IoT tools, as well as the traditional Microsoft BI stack
Bachelor's degree in an IT-related field and six years of experience
Must posses strong mentorship abilities to train junior colleagues
Proven experience developing Big Data solutions in the Azure space
Extensive experience with the Azure suite (Azure Data Lake, Azure Data Factory, Azure SQL Data Warehouse, Data Lake Analytics, HDInsight, Machine Learning, and Stream Analytics)
SQL Server 2014/2016 experience
Experience using Spark, Hive, Pig, and Scala
Comfortable with Microsoft Full Stack (SSAS/SSIS/SSRS)
In-depth knowledge of Data Warehousing and ETL/ELT
Proven ability to work with clients to understand requirements and to envision solutions
Possess DoD 8570 security certification

Desirable Skills

Background with Data Science tools such as R, Python, and SAS is a plus
Microsoft related certifications such as the MCSD/MCSE
Experience with Tableau
Experience working with Hadoop ecosystem

About AIS

AIS, Dedicated to Our People

AIS employees can spend their entire career at AIS doing challenging, rewarding work and reach their desired level of achievement and responsibility. We offer the opportunity to move up, without the obligation to move out of a position where one excels. We are committed to our employee's success; however, they define it.

It's our dedication to our employees that inspired our leadership to invest in our future and become partially employee-owned through an Employee Stock Ownership Program (ESOP).

Our employees are our greatest strength, and we do all that we can to serve them. We invest in technology as early adopters, allowing us to create transformative and innovative solutions for our customers while exposing our team to cutting edge technology.

We hire outstanding individuals who are committed to curiosity, passionate about emerging technology, and who are excited to find innovative solutions for the biggest tech challenges facing international brands and government agencies today.

We Invest in Individuals Committed to Innovation

AIS is seeking professionals of a certain character and level of excellence. People that we can learn from and that we can help grow to achieve their personal career goals. We are looking for:

Smart people with a passion for technology
Strong technical capabilities with a consultancy mindset
Close involvement with local technical communities
A willingness to think outside of the box to provide innovative solutions to clients
Ability to solve challenging technical business problems
Self-directed professionals

Our Core Values

Client Success
Continued Learning and Technical Excellence
Strong Client Relationships
Citizenship and Community

AIS is an Equal Opportunity Employer

Applied Information Sciences is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, religion, color, gender, sexual orientation, age, disability, protected veteran status or any other basis covered by law. Employment decisions are based solely on qualifications merit, and business need.",4.5,"Applied Information Sciences
4.5",Virginia,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
44,Senior System Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE),$66k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior System Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Job Description:
Title: Senior System Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Location: Remote Eligible

Vertica believes that each of us knows the work environment that makes us the most productive. Thats why we provide our employees with the ability to work how and where they will be the most successful. We enable a flexible approach to work location, meaning for roles where it makes sense, you can work from the office or from home, or a combination of both, but you make that choice including where you choose to live. Vertica invests in the best technologies and provides flexible benefits and collaborative work environments to empower employees to work productively in the setting that meets their personal needs. Thats why were so proud to have a highly productive and engaged team in every function of the company.

About your role

Youll be part of the team that enables the database to scale larger without compromising on consistency. The ability to scale-out the database can lead to higher query throughput and faster single query performance.

You will help design and implement innovative features to efficiently maintain consistency even in the face of frequent updates made to a database that is comprised of very many nodes. To accomplish this, youll leverage your knowledge of distributed systems, networking, and systems level programming. Its an exciting time to join the team.

The amount of data stored and analyzed is growing fast, as is the number of transactions and queries processed per second. In response our engineers are constantly thinking of new ways to scale larger.
Required skills
C/C++
Proficient with multi-threaded applications
Customer focused with the ability to work in a cross-functional team with QA, documentation and others
Advanced knowledge of algorithms and data structures
Excellent communication
Desired skills
Distributed systems
Experience with relational databases, such as Oracle, SQL Server, etc.
Willingness and ability to mentor interns and junior team members
SQL
About our team
The best ideas often come from fresh perspectives. At Vertica, our open-minded, diverse and inclusive team is always learning from each other. We approach intellectually challenging work with a ""get it done"" attitude. Vertica Engineers are given significant latitude and support to pursue what they are passionate about to make Vertica an even better place. If you are excited about building great technology with a proactive team, you will find yourself in good company at Vertica. Welcome to the family.
About our product
Vertica is a recognized leader in analytics powering some of the worlds most data driven organizations like Uber, Wayfair, Intuit, Cerner, and more. Our columnar, MPP, distributed database delivers unprecedented speed, petabyte scale, with analytics and machine learning functions built into the core.
We believe the future belongs to the fast. Join us for the ride!

#LI-GC2

#DiceGC

Job:

Engineering

Micro Focus is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Prospective employees will receive consideration without discrimination because of race, colour, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, marital or veteran status, sexual orientation, genetic information, citizenship or any other legally protected status",3.3,"Micro Focus
3.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
45,Network Operating Center (NOC) - IT Systems Engineer,$32k-$67k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Network Operating Center – Systems Engineer (NOC-SE) is an experienced IT support professional working onsite in our data center to provide around the clock support to a variety of clients. The NOC-SE assumes responsibility for the 24x7x365 monitoring of the data center and our client's critical systems. In this role you are expected to provide exceptional customer service and technical support for both internal and external clients and products. Additionally, the NOC-SE performs Data Center activities/inspections and assists the managed services teams with technical support , such as desktop/server, software, smartphones, printers and Active Directory admin functions (creating/deleting users, managing groups, managing distribution lists and public folders, etc.) Please see ""Special Requirements"" section for position hours.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Ability to handle Prioritization, Escalation & Incidents
Works with the Technical Services/Managed Services teams to monitor and respond to events to ensure client system uptime and stability
Provides intermediate desktop OS support and includes new hardware deployments.
Provides basic technical support for each client’s server-based systems and environment as a whole
Provides basic technical support for each client’s collaborative technology, including email and unified communication systems
Provides basic technical support for each client’s virtualization and shared storage environments
Provides basic technical support for each client’s data network, including configuration, performance and security
Ensures change control and other processes and procedures are followed and that configuration documentation is completed when systems are deployed and/or modified
Monitor critical Data Center Infrastructure (i.e. HVAC, Electrical Infrastructure, Fire Suppression, Physical Security, and Access Control)
Detailed utilization and time tracking through a ticketing system
Review & Act on NOC Incident Reports
Perform Data Center Inspections
Oversee Customer Visit Escorts
Compiles Tape Rotations and DataSafe Reporting
Manages Hardware OS Staging and Installations
Handles Cabling and Cross-connects
Provides first line end-user technical support via phone, email, ticketing system
JOB QUALIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS:

A) Knowledge/Skill/Ability
An individual must be able to perform each essential job duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required:
1+ year experience with system monitoring in a NOC environment
1+ year experience within a Data Center
Must pass internal NOC certification.
Basic level knowledge of TCP/IP, networking (DNS, DHCP, PING)
Intermediate knowledge of desktop operating systems and configurations (Windows 7, 8, and 10), server operating systems (Windows) and productivity software (Office, Outlook, etc)
Knowledge of Active Directory and email administration
Ability to manage O365\M365 Tenants i.e. License, User management, etc.
Ability to identify, through troubleshooting critical issues and escalate appropriately
Analytical and process-oriented approach to issue resolution and assigned tasks
Intermediate level diagnostic method and skills in a variety of environments
Understanding of concepts, such as virtualization, share storage, networking and thin-client technology
Effective both independently and as a member of a team
Highly effective interpersonal and organizational skills
Effective verbal and written communication
B) Education
Some formal IT training and/or certification preferred
1 year of experience in a Tier 1 technical support capacity
Relevant Certifications:
M365 Certified: Modern Desktop Administrator Associate (MD-100, MD-101), Enterprise Administrator Expert (MS-100, MS101)
C) Special Requirements
Will be required to work 12 hour shifts from 12:00am-12:00pm including holidays and weekends. Overtime as needed.
D) Physical Requirements
The physical requirements described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job:
Must be able to sit for extended periods of time, performing work on a computer
Must be able to periodically lift parcels weighing in excess of 50 pounds and 100 pounds occasionally
Job Title: Network Operating Center - System Engineer
Division: Technical Services
Location: Kansas City, KS
Reports To: Data Center Manager
FLSA Status: Non-Exempt",3.2,"NetStandard
3.2","Kansas City, KS",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1996,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
46,"Sr. Software Development Engineer, Amazon S3",$89k-$138k (Glassdoor Est.),"· 4+ years of professional software development experience
· 3+ years of programming experience with at least one modern language such as Java, C++, or C# including object-oriented design
· 2+ years of experience contributing to the architecture and design (architecture, design patterns, reliability and scaling) of new and current systems
· Able to debug, troubleshoot and resolve complex technical issues reported by customers

Amazon S3 powers businesses across the globe that make the lives of consumers better daily. Whether its electronic content delivered to your home, technology that betters your remote working experience, allows you to plan travel to exotic places or simply get stuff delivered to your home. As a Sr. Software Dev Engineer in S3, you get to deliver these capabilities and delight our customers through teams of talented engineers and leaders.

As an engineer in the S3 User Security team, you will drive development that improves security for all S3’s users. You will work with peer engineers to deliver new APIs and features that provide customers with flexible access control, cryptographic data protection, and secure audit facilities. You will design, build, and deploy new services and tools that help S3 to scale with its growing user base and increase team agility, all while maintaining the focus on customer trust that is at the heart of S3’s culture.

Our team works together to provide work/life balance for all team members. We recognize that the circumstances of our team members vary, and we balance work across the team so that we’re all able to maintain high standards on behalf of our customers, while at the same time allowing for rich and happy personal lives.

S3 services are highly available, but there are times when we occasionally stray away from our SLAs. In order to minimize the impact of such excursions, we do have On-Call rotations. However, we set these up so there are focused time periods when you are on-call and when you are not, you can focus on your day job :)

We have a formal mentor search application that lets you find a mentor that works best for you based on location, job family, job level etc. Your manager can also help you find a mentor or two, because two is better than one. In addition to formal mentors, we work and train together so that we are always learning from one another, and we celebrate and support the career progression of our team members.

We have a diverse team and drive towards an inclusive culture and work environment. Our team is intentional about attracting, developing, and retaining amazing talent from diverse backgrounds. Our team members are active in Amazon’s 10+ affinity groups, sometimes known as employee resource groups, which bring employees together across businesses and locations around the world. These range from groups such as the Black Employee Network, Amazon Women and Engineering and LGBTQ+

This role will sit in our new headquarters in Northern Virginia, where Amazon will invest $2.5 billion dollars, occupy 4 million square feet of energy efficient office space, and create at least 25,000 new full-time jobs. Our employees and the neighboring community will also benefit from the associated investments from the Commonwealth including infrastructure updates, public transportation improvements, and new access to Reagan National Airport.

· Experience with security threat modeling and analysis
· Deep understanding of scalable computing systems, software architecture, data structures and algorithms
· Proven track record of designing, building and delivering high quality software on time
· Possess strong verbal and written communication skills
· Possess a passion for technical leadership and mentoring
· Experience in Agile/SCRUM enterprise-scale software development
· Strong desire to build, sense of ownership, urgency, and drive.
· Possess strong analytical skills, with excellent problem solving abilities in the face of ambiguity",3.9,"Amazon Dev Center U.S., Inc.
3.9","Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
47,SENIOR SOFTWARE ENGINEER - Python/Node.js,-1,"SENIOR SOFTWARE ENGINEER - Python/Node.js*
(Top Secret - TS/SCI Clearance Required!)
BigBear, Inc.* is an industry-leading provider of big data computing and analytics solutions. We help people make sense of their data using our cloud-based platform and big data processing algorithms. Each day, we crunch massive volumes of structured and unstructured data into usable and actionable information for our customers. We currently have offices in Reston, VA., Charlottesville, VA., and San Diego, CA.
REQUIRED: *
5+ years of professional software development experience (MINIMUM)*
Solid experience with Python/ Django, Node JS, or Flask.
Solid experience with PostgreSQL.
Solid experience in Linux environment.
Solid experience with data modeling, business logic, and RESTful APIs.
Experience with NGINX and SSL.
US Citizenship and TS/SCI US Security Clearance.*
BS/MS in Computer Science or related field or equivalent military experience.
BONUS SKILLS: *
Experience working in an Agile/Scrum development process.
Experience with deployment automation in Amazon Web Services.
Experience with Django Framework.
Experience with geospatial toolkits including GDAL and PostGIS
Experience with high volume data flow.
Solid experience with Amazon Web Services (EC2, S3, SQS, RDS).
TECHNOLOGY WE USE: *
ElasticSearch
PostgreSQL
Python - Django
Java
AWS
Docker
Git
Angular, React
Jenkins
Our Company: *
BigBear, Inc.* is a software development company with locations in San Diego, Washington DC, Charlottesville, and Reston, VA. Our mission is to enable big data computing and analytics for our customers at a low cost. We leverage capabilities such as machine learning, crowdsourcing, geospatial image processing, and Extract-Transform-Load (ETL) data processing using our on-premise cloud computing technology stack. Our solutions provide a unique offering of products, custom-built software, and services focused within Big Data Analytics, Geospatial Information Systems (GIS), Visualization and Cloud Computing to our Department of Defense, and Commercial customers. We currently have exciting and challenging career opportunities for talented, motivated individuals who want to be part of a fast-growing company.
Our Team: *
We like to play with new toys and technologies. We like to break things to see if we can put them back together again in a better way. Our tails wag when we hear the words Big Data, Geospatial or Machine Learning. Each team member provides a unique set of advanced technical skills and trade that contributes to our overall success.
Perks/Benefits: *
· 100% employer-paid for Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance (PPO)
· A competitive salary based on experience
· Flexible Spending Account (FSA) - optional
· 401(k) with dollar-for-dollar match up to 6%
· A warm, cozy office with actual chairs and tables
· Life and Disability Insurance 100% paid for by the company
· Education Assistance
· 529 College Savings Plan - optional
· Healthy Rewards Program
· Pre-paid Legal & Identity Theft Protection - optional
· Gym Reimbursement
· Pet Insurance - optional
· A shiny magical machine that does wonderful things
· Flexible Hours
· Unlimited Coffee, Drinks and Snacks
· 6 WEEKS of Paid Time Off (PTO) on top of 11 Paid Holidays!
BigBear is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled *
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $100,000.00 - $135,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
COVID-19 considerations:
We are mostly working remotely at the moment due to COVID but we will be back to full time onsite at some point in the not too distant future

Experience:
Python: 4 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Reston, VA 20191 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Relocation Assistance Provided:
No
This Job Is:
A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to apply
Company's website:
www.bigbear.io
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"BigBear, Inc.
4.4","Reston, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
48,Systems/Database Administrator,-1,"About Us: *
Redbarn Pet Products is a manufacturer of premium pet food, treats, and chews. For over 20 years, Redbarn has been a family-owned business, and our co-founders, Jeff and Howie, are committed to staying that way. What began in 1996 as two lifelong best friends cooking in a kitchen has flourished into what they call, one big family. Jeff and Howie are honored to have many talented people who've worked beside them for over 20 years and to support a team of more than 500 today. Together, we work every day to put a smile on your pet's face.
Position Summary: *
The System/Database Administrator will keep the database up and running smoothly 24/7. The goal is to provide a seamless flow of information throughout the company, considering both backend data structure and frontend accessibility for end-users.
Roles and Responsibilities: *
Maintaining and troubleshooting of physical and virtual Linux servers (rack mounts/blades, and VMs).

Maintaining, configuring, patching, upgrading and troubleshooting of physical and virtual Windows servers (rack mounts/blades, and VMs.)

Maintaining of backup, off-site tape storage, inventory-asset management.

Design, Deployment, and Management of complex application infrastructures.

Ability to manage and support database deployments and operations. (monitoring, backup, restore, cluster/replication configuration).

Investigating, resolving and closing user reported problems and application issues through our ticketing system.

Supporting users in the use of computer equipment by providing necessary training and advice.

Installing, configuring and deploying new PCs & Servers.

Providing a high level of customer service at all times.

Monitor server event logs, performance logs, growth of data on the network, and checking the status of nightly server backups.
QUALIFICATIONS*
Education, Knowledge, Skills & Abilities*
Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent experience.

3 years' experience in systems and database administration and integration, user relations, and vendor interactions.

Experience with Microsoft Windows 2012-19 Server, Active Directory, Office365, Windows Pro 10, MacOS.

Experience with Veeam Backup & Recovery.

Experience with Linux (SUSE Linux Enterprise Server).

Experience with SQL (SAP Hana SQL), Tomcat, Nginx.

Experience with Networking (switch and router configuration) mostly Cisco a plus.

Experience with server virtualization technology, VMWare, Hyper-V.

Experience with Crystal Report is a plus.

Shell scripting in various languages Bash, Perl, Ruby.

Experience in highly available 24x7 production environment.

Hands-on with every aspect of our technical operations.

Implement infrastructure, system, application level monitoring to ensure high system availability.

Improve and manage application/configuration deployment tools

Ability to travel domestically and internationally to multi-site locations as needed.

Be an excellent team player and creative problem solver.

Self-motivated, organized and able to work independently in a fast-paced environment

Share 24x7 on-call duties to maintain system availability.

Employee is regularly required to use hands to finger, handle, or feel and talk or hear.

The employee is frequently required to stand; walk; sit and reach with hands and arms.

The employee is occasionally required to climb or balance and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl.

The employee must regularly lift and /or move up to 50 pounds, frequently lift and/or move up to 50 pounds and occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision and ability to adjust focus.

Employee is frequently exposed to risk of electrical shock. The employee is occasionally exposed to wet and/or humid conditions; moving mechanical parts; high, precarious places and outside weather conditions. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.

The Company offers competitive wages and benefits including employee discounts, company matched 401(k), Medical Insurance, Vacation and Paid Holidays.

Redbarn Pet Products is an equal opportunity employer, and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee discount
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
On call
Weekends
Experience:
systems and database administrationn: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Great Bend, KS (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Multiple locations
Work Remotely:
No",3.8,"Redbarn Pet Products
3.8","Great Bend, KS",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
49,Electrical Engineer II - Juneau,-1,"Company: Electric Power Systems, Inc.

Location: Juneau, AK

Base Pay: $55,000 – $65,000 / Year DOE

Employee Type: Full Time Position

Job Type: Engineering

Req’d Education: BSEE Degree

Req’d Experience: 1+ Year required

Req’d Travel: Yes

Contact: Melanie Coar

Description:

Electric Power Systems, Inc is a unique company offering a wide range of experience and education in the area of power system operations, design, consultation and studies. We provide extensive services from planning studies, design and construction, to periodic testing and maintenance. We are currently seeking a skilled Electrical Engineer to join our Anchorage team.

Responsibilities:

This person will be responsible for the support and performance of distribution line design and planning, including overhead and underground line extensions and rebuilds, structure and guying strength calculations, clearance reviews, right-of-way requirement determinations, one-lines, protective device coordination, short circuit calculations, and operation of system modelling and planning software. The person will be responsible for developing means and methods of tracking project design status and data requests, design coordination, design progress submissions to client, and incorporating and responding to comments from clients.

Benefits:

Electric Power Systems offers a great benefit package including Medical Insurance, Life Insurance, Long Term Disability, 401 (k) Plan, Employee Assistance Program, Paid Vacation and Paid Holidays.

Electric Power Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Affirmative Action employer that values diversity at all levels. We consider candidates for all positions on the basis of qualifications and without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, protected veteran status, disability and any other legally protected status. Minorities, women, veterans and individuals with disabilities are encouraged to apply. We are an EEO/AA employer.

Electric Power Systems, Inc. is a smoke free and drug free company.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $55,000.00 - $65,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Electrical Engineering: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Alaska (Required)
Language:
English (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://www.epsinc.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",3.9,"Electric Power Systems, Inc
3.9",Alaska,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
50,Sr. Product Design Engineer,$74k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are seeking a Sr. Product Design Engineer

On any given day, you may be called on to:

Create, modify, and evaluate complex component and system definition by implementing and integrating design solutions.
Independently determine or gather product requirements based on client needs.
Utilize three‐dimensional computer‐aided design (CAD) software to develop and propose mechanical designs and perform mass property calculations and complex tolerance and interference analyses.
Gather, analyze, and present data and results to improve designs.
Sandia's “Design Engineering Group” consists of multiple mechanical design departments that provide design engineering services using Computer Aided Design (CAD) software such as PTC Creo and other 3D modeling tools. We partner with engineering teams across the lab to produce innovative design solutions based on high‐quality CAD models and drawings. We ensure fit, form, and function using Geometric Dimensioning and Tolerancing (GD&T), while ensuring manufacturability and maintainability of designs. We determine the physical characteristics of the product including: geometric form, interface features, manufacturing specifications, processes, and assembly instructions. We communicate design options and recommended approaches to product development teams, stakeholders, and manufacturing partners. We apply technical judgment based upon engineering principles in the design and development of innovative products in support of our Nation’s security programs.
Bachelor’s Degree in Mechanical Engineering or other relevant discipline, plus 5 years of relevant exempt engineering experience. Or, Associate Degree in relevant discipline plus 18 years of relevant mechanical design experience. Or, equivalent combination of education plus experience.
Experience using CAD software for complex 3D solid modeling and mechanical drawing generation.
Experience using PTC‐Creo software for mechanical engineering and design.
Demonstrated ability in applying mechanical engineering design principles to formulate design concepts and meet product requirements.
Independently apply principles of tolerance analysis and geometric dimensioning and tolerancing (GD&T) based on experience, training, or certification such as ASME GDTP technologist level.
Demonstrated ability to perform analysis and calculations (stress, thermal, material properties, Etc.) to ensure that requirements are met and to optimize designs.
Experience using a product data management system to manage CAD files. Application of manufacturing methods for mechanical hardware. Application of Design for Manufacturing and Assembly principles.
Demonstrated successful teamwork, excellent communication skills (oral and written), and consistent demonstration of good behaviors.
Working knowledge of Microsoft Oﬃce Products.
Knowledge and understanding of the NW engineering systems and the NNSA product realization process. Demonstrated ability to work independently and in a diverse team environment.
Active Security Clearance.
Complete tolerance analysis using CETOL (or equivalent) software for 3D tolerance analysis.",3.0,"Akima Infrastructure Services, LLC
3.0","Albuquerque, NM",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Contract,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
51,"Electrical Engineer II - Anchorage, Alaska",-1,"Electrical Engineer II*
Company: Electric Power Systems, Inc.

Location: Anchorage, AK

Base Pay: $55,000 – $65,000 / Year DOE

Employee Type: Full Time Position

Job Type: Engineering

Req’d Education: BSEE Degree

Req’d Experience: 1+ Year required

Req’d Travel: Yes

Contact: Melanie Coar

Description:

Electric Power Systems, Inc is a unique company offering a wide range of experience and education in the area of power system operations, design, consultation and studies. We provide extensive services from planning studies, design and construction, to periodic testing and maintenance. We are currently seeking a skilled Electrical Engineer to join our Anchorage team.

Responsibilities:

This person will be responsible for the support and performance of distribution line design and planning, including overhead and underground line extensions and rebuilds, structure and guying strength calculations, clearance reviews, right-of-way requirement determinations, one-lines, protective device coordination, short circuit calculations, and operation of system modelling and planning software. The person will be responsible for developing means and methods of tracking project design status and data requests, design coordination, design progress submissions to client, and incorporating and responding to comments from clients.

Benefits:

Electric Power Systems offers a great benefit package including Medical Insurance, Life Insurance, Long Term Disability, 401 (k) Plan, Employee Assistance Program, Paid Vacation and Paid Holidays.

Electric Power Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Affirmative Action employer that values diversity at all levels. We consider candidates for all positions on the basis of qualifications and without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, protected veteran status, disability and any other legally protected status. Minorities, women, veterans and individuals with disabilities are encouraged to apply. We are an EEO/AA employer.

Electric Power Systems, Inc. is a smoke free and drug free company.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $55,000.00 - $65,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
Electrical Engineering: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Alaska (Required)
Language:
English (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://www.epsinc.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",3.9,"Electric Power Systems, Inc
3.9",Alaska,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
52,Senior Data Engineer,-1,"At Tend, we’re combining top-notch care with soothing and safe environments, elevated hospitality, consumer-grade technology, and curated products to redefine going to the dentist as a whole-you wellness experience.

Reimagining dentistry takes a unique and diverse team, all working together through commitment, collaboration, and creativity to create the world’s first dental wellness experience. Join the team that makes going to the dentist an experience people look forward to.

We’re looking to add a Senior Data Engineer to our team who is experienced in creating SQL databases for a variety of applications and business uses. You’ll work across teams and use cutting edge tech to solve interesting, large-scale problems. Creating at a rapid pace you’ll make a direct and lasting impact anywhere that technology powers our business.
About the Role*
Design, implement and maintain reporting databases, data warehouse and OLAP data structures
Design, develop, test, deliver, and implement SQL solutions within ETL processes.
Manage day to day operations of multiple Microsoft SQL Server/Postgres databases.
Optimize databases for performance and scalability.
Develop, implement and optimize stored procedures and functions using T-SQL
Analyze, define, and document system requirements for data, workflow, logical processes, interfaces with other systems, internal and external checks and controls, and outputs.
Responsible for problem resolution, database configuration, capacity planning, performance tuning and optimizations.
Create and maintain database master plans, data dictionaries and disaster recovery documentation
Consults with internal and external clients to prototype, refine, test, and debug databases and obtain client approval.
Writes and maintains documentation to describe program development, logic, coding, testing, changes, and corrections.
Design, build, and deploy BI solutions (Looker)
Responsible for on-call emergency response during database failure.
Develops and maintains professional relationships
Promotes good working relationships among staff and between other disciplines and departments. Assumes individual accountability for own conduct and maintenance of professional attitude and appearance.
Approaches change in a positive manner, motivate staff to work as a team, accept constructive criticism and learn from it.
Must be able to apply principles of critical thinking to a variety of practical and emergent situations and accurately follow standardized procedures that may call for deviations.
Must be able to apply sound judgment beyond a specific set of instructions and apply knowledge to different factual situations.
Must be able to work under stress on a regular or continuous basis.
About You*
5+ years of experience with MSSQL/TSQL/BI
3+ years or more ETL concept exp
Bachelor’s degree.
Knowledge of dimensional and relational database models
Experience with web services (Both REST and SOAP).
Some programming experience.
Experience with MSSQL and/or Postgres
Our Goodie Bags are Pretty Impressive! *
Our comprehensive benefits & perks program will make you grin. Employer-sponsored healthcare coverage, 401(k) with an employer match, generous paid time off, a pre-tax commuter benefit, and much more!
Keeping the Tend Community Safe *
We’ve always been committed to providing the highest quality of care for our team and members. During this time, we are taking extra precautions to promote the health and safety of those who work and receive treatment at our studios. From enhanced PPE to sterilized equipment and staggered visit times with on-site temperature checks, we prioritize your health every step. For more information on how we’re making our dental visits safer, please visit: https://www.hellotend.com/notice
EEO Statement*
We are committed to promoting a work environment in which differences are respected, employees are treated fairly and individual contributions are valued and rewarded. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.

This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $102,859.00 - $130,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Application Question:
Will you now, or in the future, require sponsorship for employment visa status (e.g. H-1B visa status)?
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.5,"Tend
3.5","Nashville, TN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
53,Sr Optical Engineer,$108k-$172k (Glassdoor Est.),"Acacia Communications is an optical networking technology company that empowers cloud and content providers to connect at the speed of light enabling them to meet the rapidly increasing consumer demands for data.

As a key leader for Acacia’s optical systems group, The Senior Optics Engineer is an expert in optical communications measurements, concepts, and equipment for characterization of optical communications systems.

Key Essential Functions

Lead efforts for bring-up, performance optimization, and design verification testing of coherent transceivers
Lead design of subsystems such as optical amplifiers and modulator control loops, and/or contribute to our digital signal processing development
Lead DSP parameter optimization of ASIC designed for the most advanced coherent optical communications
Lead collaboration with photonics integrated circuit team to produce the most compact pluggable coherent optical modules
Lead design and implementation of the first L-band coherent optical modules
Advise on efforts of evaluation of fiber nonlinear penalty in the transmission systems and its mitigation method
Provide accurate and cost-effective calibration of coherent transceivers and its transfer to Operations
Drive debug activities to improve product yield and to shorten time to successful field deployment
Collaborate with colleagues in the HW, SW, DSP, and Operations groups

Other Duties

Other essential duties as assigned

Minimum Qualifications, Experience, Skills, Education and Certifications

MSEE with 6+ years of hands on experience in an optical communications lab required PhD in physics or electrical engineering preferred
Experience with measurements, concepts, and equipment for characterization of optical communications systems such as: BER measurements, WDM transmission measurements, OSNR, dispersion, PMD, optical spectrum analyzers, and real-time and sampling oscilloscopes
Hands on experience with bring-up, debugging, calibration, and design verification testing of (coherent) transceiver line cards or modules
A solid understanding of transceiver HW, FW, and SW
Deep understanding on optical amplifier and dense wavelength division multiplexing (DWDM) systems/networks
Ability to construct and run optical recirculating loop test bed
Full automation of test equipment and coherent transceivers
Solid knowledge on coherent transmitter/receiver architecture, QAM modulation, coherent reception, digital signal processing, RF electronics such as oscillators and high-speed amplifiers, and lab automation with e.g. LabVIEW

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status.

IND17",3.9,"Acacia Communications
3.9","Maynard, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Telecommunications Manufacturing,Telecommunications,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
54,Senior Systems Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE),$66k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Systems Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Job Description:
Title: Senior Systems Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Location: Remote Eligible

Vertica believes that each of us knows the work environment that makes us the most productive. Thats why we provide our employees with the ability to work how and where they will be the most successful. We enable a flexible approach to work location, meaning for roles where it makes sense, you can work from the office or from home, or a combination of both, but you make that choice including where you choose to live. Vertica invests in the best technologies and provides flexible benefits and collaborative work environments to empower employees to work productively in the setting that meets their personal needs. Thats why were so proud to have a highly productive and engaged team in every function of the company.

About your role
Youll be part of the team that enables the database to scale larger without compromising on consistency. The ability to scale-out the database can lead to higher query throughput and faster single query performance.
You will help design and implement innovative features to efficiently maintain consistency even in the face of frequent updates made to a database that is comprised of very many nodes. To accomplish this, youll leverage your knowledge of distributed systems, networking, and systems level programming.
Its an exciting time to join the team. The amount of data stored and analyzed is growing fast, as is the number of transactions and queries processed per second. In response our engineers are constantly thinking of new ways to scale larger.
Required skills
C/C++ or Java
Proficient with multi-threaded applications
Customer focused with the ability to work in a cross-functional team with QA, documentation and others
Advanced knowledge of algorithms and data structures
Excellent communication
Desired skills
Distributed systems
Database internals
Willingness and ability to mentor interns and junior team members
SQL

About our team
The best ideas often come from fresh perspectives. At Vertica, our open-minded, diverse and inclusive team is always learning from each other. We approach intellectually challenging work with a ""get it done"" attitude. Vertica Engineers are given significant latitude and support to pursue what they are passionate about to make Vertica an even better place. If you are excited about building great technology with a proactive team, you will find yourself in good company at Vertica. Welcome to the family.
About our product
Vertica is a recognized leader in analytics powering some of the worlds most data driven organizations like Uber, Wayfair, Intuit, Cerner, and more. Our columnar, MPP, distributed database delivers unprecedented speed, petabyte scale, with analytics and machine learning functions built into the core.
We believe the future belongs to the fast. Join us for the ride!

#LI-GC2

#DiceGC

Job:

Engineering

Micro Focus is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Prospective employees will receive consideration without discrimination because of race, colour, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, marital or veteran status, sexual orientation, genetic information, citizenship or any other legally protected status",3.3,"Micro Focus
3.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
55,Experienced Epitaxy Production Engineer,$39k-$63k (Glassdoor Est.),"Responsibilities: *
Manage, schedule, plan and monitor MOCVD systems for LED productio
Comprehensive data analysis in a timely fashion
Focus on improving yield, reproducibility and utilization rate.
Address process drift and resolve issues in a timely manner.
Responsible for ensuring the quality of manufacturing process.
Transfer new developments to LED production.
Minimum Requirements: *
BS/MS in Materials Science, Chemical Engineering or Physics
Strong background in semiconductor material science and device physics
1-3 years hands-on experience with established track record in III-nitride epi growth
US Citizen or Permanent Resident
Skill Requirements: *
1-3 years of hands on experience with MOCVD, MBE and other vapor phase deposition techniques
Knowledge in material characterization and metrology equipment
Must be organized, detailed, and thorough
Excellent written and oral communication skills
Ability to summarize data and prepare reports
EEO Statement: *
Sensor Electronic Technology, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will be provided equal consideration without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, genetic information, military status, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or protected veteran status in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.

Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $50,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available:
No: Not providing sponsorship for this job
Company's website:
s-et.com
Work Remotely:
No",3.1,"Sensor Electronic Technology, Inc
3.1","Columbia, SC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
56,Data Engineer,$58k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you passionate about Data and Cloud Technology? Do you enjoy working with Python, ETL Frameworks, and BI Reporting? Are you intrigued by Investments and Finance? Do you want to join an Innovative Team with a start-up mindset and fortune 100 stability? If Yes, there’s a place at Liberty Mutual Investments for you!

About the job:

The Data Engineer will help build technology to enable Back and Middle Office Investment functions (trade flows, accounting, reconciliation, reporting, and automated batch scheduling workflows) for integration with the investments Accounting Book of Record. Knowledge of investment financial data to serve application integration to trading platform and reporting is strongly desired. Prior experience working on Agile scrum teams in a scaled framework is preferred.

You will possess a hardworking “can-do” mindset with focus on the collective success of the scrum team to iteratively deliver high quality products to enable the investments business.

Collaborates with the Product Owner, Scrum Master, Subject Matter Experts and Development team to define and analyze user stories tracked in Jira.

Collaborate in design, development and implementation of software solutions for LMI Tech using modern technology stack.

Demonstrates solutions and articulates business value to LMI business partners at sprint showcases.

Desired skills:

Bachelor’s degree in technical discipline, or equivalent professional experience.

Minimum 3-5 years' experience as Data Engineer.

Expertise in MS SQL Server (Programming views, stored procedures, and functions).

Expertise in Python (ETL tools- Pandas/NumPy, Python unit testing etc.).

Experience with Cloud platform technologies (AWS/Azure).

Experience with Data Warehousing, Dimensional Modeling (Kimball etc.), and Data Extraction Utilities.

Experience with business intelligence tools and reporting solution (PowerBI, Tableau etc.)

Experience with Financial Systems and reporting (Investments accounting/General Ledger)

Preferred skills:

Experience in integrating large scale financial investment/ERP systems (SimCorp Dimension or similar platform) is a plus.

Experience with CI/CD pipeline, and DevOps.

Experience with REST API.

Experience with Git/Bitbucket.

Experience in Agile software development practices (story sizing, sprint planning, retrospectives).

Experience with automated testing software (Selenium, Ranorex, Tosca).

Benefits: We value your hard work, integrity and commitment to positive change. In return for your service, it’s our privilege to offer you benefits and rewards that support your life and well-being. To learn more about our benefit offerings please visit: https://LMI.co/BenefitsOverview:

At Liberty Mutual, we give motivated, accomplished professionals the opportunity to help us redefine what insurance means; to work for a global leader with a deep sense of humanity and a focus on improving and protecting everyday lives. We create an inspired, collaborative environment, where people can take ownership of their work; push breakthrough ideas; and feel confident that their contributions will be valued and their growth championed.

We’re dedicated to doing the right thing for our employees, because we know that their fulfillment and success leads us to great places. Life. Happiness. Innovation. Impact. Advancement. Whatever their pursuit, talented people find their path at Liberty Mutual.",3.5,"Liberty Mutual Insurance
3.5","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1912,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
57,Principal Software Engineer,$70k-$142k (Glassdoor Est.),"Secure our Nation, Ignite your Future

Become an integral part of a diverse team while working at an Industry Leading Organization, where our employees come first. At ManTech International Corporation, you’ll help protect our national security while working on innovative projects that offer opportunities for advancement.
Currently, ManTech is seeking a motivated, career and customer-oriented CNO Developer to join our team in the Hanover , MD .
Responsibility include, but are not limited too:
Expert knowledge of multiple programming languages such as C/C++, assembly (e.g. x86, ARM, MIPS), Python, or PERL.
Familiar with multiple software development methodologies (e.g. Scrum, TDD, Waterfall).
Expert level knowledge of security concepts, networks, device drivers, & system internals are applied in daily tasks.
Expert knowledge in at least one technology area (e.g. Windows, Unix, Mobile, Network devices).
Communicates status with leadership and customers. Contributes to the completion of milestones associated with specific projects.
Provides solutions to a variety of complex technical problems.
Determines computer user needs; analyzes system capabilities to resolve problems on program intent, output requirements, input data acquisition, programming.
Ensures software standards are met. Leads the design, development, documenting, testing and debugging of applications software and systems that contain logical and mathematical solutions.
Able to lead a project developing hardware or software based CNO capabilities providing direction to other CNO developers.
Plans and conducts assignments, generally involving the larger and more important projects or more than one project.

Required:

Seven to nine years of relevant work experience.
Proficient C programming skills
Software Analysis/Reverse Engineering experience
Embedded systems development experience
Understand assembly programming concepts
Bachelors Degree

Clearance Required:

TS/SCI with Polygraph

Desired:

Experience working with networking (TCP/IP)
Python experience
Unit Test experience
Experience using Jenkins Continuous Integration Server

ManTech International Corporation, as well as its subsidiaries proactively fulfills its role as an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, national origin, marital status, physical or mental disability, status as a Disabled Veteran, Recently Separated Veteran, Active Duty Wartime or Campaign Badge Veteran, Armed Forces Services Medal, or any other characteristic protected by law.

If you require a reasonable accommodation to apply for a position with ManTech through its online applicant system, please contact ManTech's Corporate EEO Department at (703) 218-6000. ManTech is an affirmative action/equal opportunity employer - minorities, females, disabled and protected veterans are urged to apply. ManTech's utilization of any external recruitment or job placement agency is predicated upon its full compliance with our equal opportunity/affirmative action policies. ManTech does not accept resumes from unsolicited recruiting firms. We pay no fees for unsolicited services.

If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran, you have the right to request an accommodation if you are unable or limited in your ability to use or access http://www.mantech.com/careers/Pages/careers.aspx as a result of your disability. To request an accommodation please click careers@mantech.com and provide your name and contact information.",4.2,"ManTech International Corporation
4.2","Hanover, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1968,Company - Public,Research & Development,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
58,IT Engineer III,$49k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"Staff in IT Engineering are responsible for researching, designing, developing, documenting, testing and deploying new technologies in order to enhance credit union operations. They develop and apply models, processes, tools, standards, road maps and methodologies to support the organization’s technical infrastructure as it relates to systems, networks, servers, storage, databases, and telecommunications. They ensure that new systems are implemented with adequate capacity and appropriate business continuity and disaster recovery capabilities.

Advanced IT professional providing technical leadership in multiple areas of the organization’s technical infrastructure and effectively contributing to technology innovation.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

Serves as a key technical resource and expert for multiple areas of the technical infrastructure. Provides training and documentation for day-to-day support teams on backups, performance monitoring/tuning, proactive capacity planning, Disaster Recovery, granting user privileges/access, hardware/server/application/service monitoring, patching/updating, and group policy administration.

Creates technical blueprints, translating logical architecture into physical specifications. Directs and oversees the implementation effort.

Troubleshoots most problems within assigned area(s), providing fault isolation and resolution that may be complicated by technology interdependency. Analyzes cross-technology/platform issues and addresses problems factoring in an understanding of the current and future architecture.

Leads the evaluation of new technologies relative to their domain(s). Proposes technology investments supported by a thorough technical analysis and business case.

Serves as a leading participant in industry forums, bringing new technical information into the organization and disseminating it to appropriate IT colleagues.

Specifies the monitoring points to assess performance of technologies in their domain(s). Recommends the necessary actions to ensure optimal performance and reliability.

Develops disaster recovery and contingency goals for their areas of expertise.

Provides guidance and technical coaching to less experienced staff.

Provides input to RFI and RFP process related to their areas of expertise.

Interacts with major providers at the technical expert level to address mission critical issues.

Minimum formal education required for this position:

BS in a technical field or equivalent

Preferred Education:

Post-graduate classes beneficial

Minimum work experience:

8+ years of relevant experience (networking, security, systems administration, Disaster Recovery, Citrix server administration, storage technology, server management, databases, etc.)

Technical or specialized knowledge/skills:
Must be able to function as a key resource and expert within the company for multiple technical areas. Expert in implementing efficient procedures for backups, performance monitoring/tuning, proactive capacity planning, Disaster Recovery, granting user privileges/access, hardware/server/application/service monitoring, patching/updating, and group policy administration.
Strong understanding of IT systems/data security as it relates to financial institutions or other industries that must comply with federal regulations
Ability to apply seasoned expertise in multiple technologies to address interoperability issues.
Must demonstrate a good understanding of new technologies and their applicability relative to assigned domain(s).
Must demonstrate a strong understanding of the current and future technology architecture, including the inter-operability of technologies.
Ability to provide guidance and training to other IT colleagues in their areas of expertise.
Understands business trends, strategies and the direction technology must take to support the business.
Strong communication skills (written, verbal, and listening) with specific ability to translate technical details to a non-technical audience.
Excellent analytical skills.
Proficiency with Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Microsoft Project, and Visio.
Certifications Required:

None required.

CCNA/CCNP/CCIE, MCSA/MCSE/MCSM, CISSP, CCA/CCEE/CCIA, and/or VCP preferred

Environmental, physical and psychological requirements:
Must be able to sit or stand for prolonged periods of time in a climate controlled environment. Must be able to use fingers, hands, wrists for repetitive tasks such as typing, using a mouse, handling paper, and operating a telephone. Demands for visual and auditory acuity are typical of an office environment. Must be able to interact via email, telephone, or in person with diplomacy, tact, and courtesy with all members under varying circumstances. Must be able to lift up to 40 lbs.
Starting Salary Range: $86,000+",3.7,"Ent Credit Union
3.7","Colorado Springs, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1957,Other Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
59,"Specialist V/VI, Information Technology (Systems Engineer)",$45k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Details

Requisition Number S456P
Home Org Name Office of Information Technology Ad
Division Name Chief InfoOffice and InfoTechnology
Position Title Specialist V/VI, Information Technology (Systems Engineer)
Job Class Code MA14 E/F
Appointment Status Full-time
Part-time FTE
Limited Term No
Limited Term Length
Job Summary

The Office of Information Technology Enterprise Systems group is seeking applicants for a System Engineer Generalist. The System Engineer Generalist will assist in the day to day operations and maintenance of OIT’s virtual server and storage infrastructure providing support to internal and external customers related to services provided by the Enterprise Systems group. This position will maintain security patches utilizing best practices for all assigned systems, provide troubleshooting and problem resolution as well as assist in planning and execution of software and firmware upgrades and be willing to take on new task and responsibilities as needed to support the infrastructure team. In addition, this position will work closely with both IT personnel and end-users from several different disciplines and backgrounds. After-hours and on-call responsibilities should be expected.

Essential Functions

As a member of the ERP Systems Team, this Specialist will, under limited supervision, perform the duties listed below:
Administers and supports deployed University applications and systems including, Banner, Automic Workload Automation Suite (Appworx), Workflow, Luminis, etc. Documents and deploys systems and their integration points. Reviews and performs system testing.
Implements and troubleshoots configuration changes, systems, and applications to identify and correct service interruptions and other operational problems. Monitors University systems to ensure service uptime and availability
Creates technical solutions to automate, monitor, test, and deploy applications. Designs methods and procedures for collecting, organizing, interpreting, and classifying system and log data for security, performance, and capacity planning needs.
Maintains established backup and disaster recovery processes and procedures. Performs regular tests of the high availability, backup, and disaster recovery processes.
Deploys new technologies and performs system integration testing.
Provides ongoing technical assistance to customers regarding systems and applications. Makes recommendations to stakeholders to increase efficiencies in systems.
May provide on-call support for designated systems or services.
May perform other related duties as assigned by the IT Manager.
Education Level Bachelor’s degree from an accredited institution
Field of Study
Years of Experience Four (4) or more of experience in software support to include the experience below
Area of Experience
A working knowledge of one or more of the following: Automic Workload Automation Suite (Appworx), Banner, Workflow, Linux, Tomcat, shell scripting, SQL, Oracle Database, SQL Developer, web services/APIs, or F5 Load Balancers.
Experience working in software and web server administration, integration skills, and networking and database fundamentals.
The Specialist V starting salaries are typically between $64,000 and $75,000.

Requirements for Additional Job Levels

The Specialist VI position requires a Bachelor’s degree and seven (7) or more years of applicable experience. The starting salaries for this level are typically between $73,000 and $84,000.

Education Level
Field of Study
Years of Experience
Area of Experience
Requirements for Additional Job Levels
Minimum Skills and Abilities
Minimum Technology Skills
Minimum License and Certifications
Desired Qualifications
Salary Grade 35
Salary Range $51,900 - $99,600
Job Category Information Systems/Technology
Working Hours if Non-Traditional
List any hazardous conditions or physical demands required by this position
Posting Date 10/07/2020
Closing Date
EEO Statement

AUBURN UNIVERSITY IS AN AFFIRMATIVE ACTION/EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER. It is our policy to provide equal employment opportunities for all individuals without regard to race, sex, religion, color, national origin, age, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other classification protected by applicable law.

Special Instructions to Applicants

Auburn University is one of the nation’s premier public land-grant institutions. In 2020, it was ranked 44th among public universities by U.S. News and World Report. Auburn maintains high levels of research activity and high standards for teaching excellence, offering Bachelor’s, Master’s, Educational Specialist, and Doctor’s degrees in agriculture and engineering, the professions, and the arts and sciences. Its 2019 enrollment of 30,460 students includes 24,594 undergraduates and 5,866 graduate and professional students. Organized into twelve academic colleges and schools, Auburn’s 1,643 instructional faculty members—87% of whom are employed full-time—offer more than 200 educational programs. The University is nationally recognized for its commitment to academic excellence, its positive work environment, its student engagement, and its beautiful campus.

Auburn residents enjoy a thriving community, recognized as one of the “best small towns in America,” with moderate climate and easy access to major cities or to beach and mountain recreational facilities. Situated along the rapidly developing I-85 corridor between Atlanta, Georgia, and Montgomery, Alabama, the combined Auburn-Opelika-Columbus statistical area has a population of over 500,000, with excellent public school systems and regional medical centers.

Auburn University is committed to providing a comprehensive employee benefits package that attracts and retains talent to further the University’s mission and contributes to the personal and financial well-being of employees and their families. Employee Benefits include: Health Insurance, Dental Insurance, Vision Care, Cancer Insurance, Life Insurance/Personal Accident Coverage, Disability Group & Supplemental Plans, Flexible Spending Account Plan, and Mandatory and Voluntary Retirement Plans, Auburn University Federal Credit Union, Bookstore Discounts, Tiger Perks discounts on dining, shopping and entertainment, Travel Assistance (Domestic and International), and Educational Improvements for Employees and Dependents.

Quick Link for Internal Postings http://www.auemployment.com/postings/19728",4.5,"Auburn University
4.5","Auburn, AL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1885,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
60,Telecom Provisioning Engineer,$39k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary*
The Provisioning Engineer I (PE) provides a combination of customer management and operational support related services to client projects involving advanced and core IP technologies. Provisioning Engineers are responsible for the delivery of provisioning and order management services which encompass one or more of the following areas: coordinating all aspects of a service order, interconnection and/or transport request; conduct order planning and tracking, perform turn-up (setting up port, configuring router and testing). Provisioning Engineers manage the customer experience as they move through the activation of their network service. They ensure timely communication with all stakeholders.
Responsibilities and Duties*
Lend high quality support to Vertek Projects as required through performance of one or more of the following functions and duties:
The PE may be required to provide training and technical support to clients at customer sites.
Coordinate telecommunications service delivery related duties as required.
Support projects as required by tracking new service and transport orders encompassing a range of technologies from legacy to emerging/advanced.
Interface with multiple parties (customers, vendors, carriers or adjoining disciplines) to ensure smooth flow of communication between all stakeholders in support of project objectives.
Serve as single-point of contact for the end customer on provisioning projects.
Manage the delivery of QA related services as needed, serving as a checks and balance to ensure the integrity of client / project information.
Research and validate customer data to fulfill project deliverables in both internal and external systems.
Serve as a liaison with other organizational teams and functions as required (i.e. sales, provisioning, billing, customer care, etc.)
Perform data entry into internal and external databases as required.
Deliver project documentation, including technical diagrams and configurations.
Maintain regular contact and communication with the customer as assigned to attain necessary information or provide updates on progress to other team members.
Serve as a point of escalation for others as required. Use judgment in determining escalation requirements to internal management as needed.
Qualifications and Skills*
CCNA or CCDA certification Required
PREFERRED TECHNICAL QUALIFICATIONS*
Core IP technology (addressing, routing, etc.)
VPN / MPLS / SD-WAN / Cloud technologies working knowledge
Working knowledge or firewall, security and CoS
Data and/or Voice Expertise (preferably both)
Telecommunications project management
Customer Service Skills
Compensation and Benefits*
Competitive base compensation
Full benefits package including medical, dental, FSA, and 401(k)
Job Type: Full-time, on-site*
Job Type: Full-time

Vertek Corporation is committed to the policy of equal employment opportunity and to provide all employees with the work environment necessary to enable them to advance on merit as far as their talents and skills will take them, without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, status as a protected class of veteran, or any other legally protected status.

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
relevant: 1 year (Preferred)
License:
CCNA or CCDA (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
Will you now or in the future require Vertek Corporation to commence (“sponsor”) an immigration case in order to employ you (for example, H-1B or other employment-based immigration case)? This is sometimes called “sponsorship” for an employment-based visa status.?
Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Professional development assistance",2.9,"Vertek Corporation
2.9","Colchester, VT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,"Cable, Internet & Telephone Providers",Telecommunications,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
61,Senior Data Analyst,$83k-$141k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you want to innovate customer experiences and make business decisions smarter through data? Are you ready to join a collaborative and motivated team diving into cutting edge big data technology? As an Senior Data Analyst on the Single View of the Customer (SVOC) team, you’ll thrive in a fast-paced innovative culture that turns data into information, and uses that information to drive action. You will have the opportunity to interact with all our SVOC scrum teams, ensuring that we are incorporating new technologies seamlessly, all while providing value to our customers. This opportunity also allows you to dive in to complex technologies, and work with a very forward-thinking group of peers!

Familiar, but never leveraged big data technologies? No worries! When you first join our SVOC team, you will have the opportunity to come up to speed on the cutting-edge technologies we use to develop SVOC!

Basic Qualifications:

o Significant experience in facilitating the discovery process with functional stakeholders to identify requirements and expected outcomes.
o Experience in developing test plans and scenarios to ensure the highest quality deliverables
o Strong SQL, data mapping, and data profiling skills
o Working knowledge of Big Data and the Hadoop Ecosystem
o Outstanding time management skills and attention to detail
o Excellent verbal/written communication skills, including communicating technical issues to non-technical audiences
o Strong presentation skills. Should be comfortable with presenting to all levels of management
o A Bachelor's degree in Information Technology, related field (business, finance, mathematics, computer science), or equivalent professional experience is required

Preferred Qualifications:

o Understanding and experience with Web Services and APIs
o Experience in querying NoSQL databases
o Knowledge and experience working in an Agile environment
o Exposure to QLIK or other data visualization tools
o Experience with providing Production Support

Note: The safety of our associates, both current and future, is GEICO’s highest priority. At this time, most of our associates are working remotely due to the current COVID-19 pandemic. Candidates who are selected for this position will be trained remotely and must be able to work from home in a designated work area. Once GEICO determines it is safe for associates to return to the office, candidates may be required to work in our Chevy Chase, MD office.

Qualifications

About GEICO:

For more than 75 years, GEICO has stood out from the rest of the insurance industry! We are one of the nation's largest and fastest-growing auto insurers thanks to our low rates, outstanding service and clever marketing. We're an industry leader employing thousands of dedicated and hard-working associates. As a wholly owned subsidiary of Berkshire Hathaway, we offer associates training and career advancement in a financially stable and rewarding workplace.

As a full-time Senior Data Analyst, you’ll enjoy our Total Rewards Program* to help secure your financial future and preserve your health and well-being, including:

• Premier Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance with no waiting period**
• Paid Vacation, Sick and Parental Leave
• 401(k) Plan with Profit Sharing
• Tuition Reimbursement
• Paid Training and Licensures
Benefits may be different by location. Benefit eligibility requirements vary and may include length of service.
*Coverage begins with the pay period after hire date. Must enroll in New Hire Benefits within 30 days of the date of hire for coverage to take effect.",3.4,"GEICO
3.4","Chevy Chase, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1936,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
62,Software Engineer - Adobe Multi Solutions - Remote,$37k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"Pay Range: $78,312 - $97,107 annually

Applicants for this position can work remotely from their home! Applicants must live in Nebraska, Kansas, Iowa or Texas however due to store locations and tax purposes.

At NFM, we’ve been hiring friends since 1937—people who share our passion for helping customers feel right at home. If you share our vision, we invite you to be one of us!

People love working here! Glassdoor ranked Nebraska Furniture Mart in the top 50 Best Places to Work in the U.S. and here are a few reasons why:

A FUN, stable work environment, with no lay-offs in our history
A safe place to work and shop
A path to the career of your dreams (career development opportunities)
A culture that encourages volunteering and serving our communities

Job Description: Your Piece of the Puzzle

NFM’s Adobe Multi-Solution Engineer is responsible to be the subject matter expert for Adobe Campaign Standard and other Adobe Experience Cloud Products and Services such as Launch and Analytics. The primary responsibility will be to translate business requirements for these tools into custom implementations by using a combination of custom JavaScript, data layer objects, processing rules, report suite configurations and technical workflows.

Job Duties: A Day in the Life

Plan: Gather and understand unique business requirements and implement the desired solutions
Research: Proactively identify, analyze, and position opportunities to improve digital analytics front-end implementation based on internal and external data
Collaborate: Coordinate final project quality analysis, reporting, transferring of reporting knowledge, provide close-loop communication within the organization including creating senior executive dashboard
Create: Perform extensive testing, create queries to extract and validate segment data and sizing or perform quality analysis testing to validate project test data
Design: Setup new SProps and eVar through Adobe Analytics
Optimize: Act as the owner of Adobe Launch and coordinate with the web-dev team to realize tagging

Your work will directly impact our ability to help people create a lifestyle they love, for the people they love—because that’s what we love.

Benefits: What’s in It for You?

As a full-time member of our NFM Family, you will enjoy:

Competitive pay
Health, dental, vision and life Insurance
Paid holiday and paid time off
Staff discount on merchandise
(Collectively, NFM staff has saved almost $2 million on purchases in the last 12 months)
Tuition reimbursement
Paid training
401(k) with company matching
Short and long-term disability
Employee assistance program
Career development and advancement opportunities
Community volunteer opportunities

NFM is an Equal Opportunity Employer.

Experience
Required
• Bachelors’ Degree in Computer Information Systems, related field required or equivalent experience
• 1+ year of hands on Adobe Campaign Standard experience or 3+ years of marketing campaign development experience on a tool equivalent to Adobe Campaign Standard (Salesforce Marketing Cloud, Cheetahmail, …)
• At least 2 years of experience in software development life cycle
• At least 1 year of experience in translating functional/non-functional requirements to system requirements
• Expertise and Experience in SQL (Oracle / SQL Server / PostgreSQL)
• Experience working with/creating APIs
• Strong understanding of tag management systems and platforms (Adobe DTM/Launch, GTM, Tealium, Ensighten, etc…)
• Excellent understanding of analytics and tag management best practices, including workflows and planning
• Outstanding project management skills with proven experience managing end-to-end projects including managing budget, timelines/milestones, multiple partners and deliverables
• Demonstrated ability to manage simultaneous projects in a fast-paced environment
• Estimation abilities in scoping work in a highly complex environment
• Must be able to work independently and collaboratively (team oriented) with an enthusiastic attitude
• Strong interpersonal, communication and influencing skills
• Problem analysis and problem resolution at both a strategic and a functional level
• Ability to work nights, weekends and/or early morning hours based on business needs
• Pre-employment screening includes, but isn’t limited to, drug screen and criminal background check
Preferred
• Proficient in Adobe Launch
• Experience migrating Tag Management Systems
• Experience with on-demand reporting/Analysis/business intelligence tools, including Tableau, etc…
• Experience with Commerce Cloud
• Experience with Adobe Campaign, Adobe Target, or other Adobe Solutions (Audience Manager, AEM)
• Experience with Agile development philosophy, practices, and tools
• The right mix of experience in Marketing and Technology is highly desirable
• Adobe Analytics Certification – Certified Expert, Business Practitioner; Certified Expert, Technical Architect
• 2 years of technical workflow development experience in Adobe Campaign Standard and 4 years in a related tool (Salesforce Marketing Cloud, Cheetahmail, …)
• 3+ years’ experience with Web Analytics Tools
• 2 years+ experience in JavaScript and Various JavaScript libraries and Experience in Workflow (Import, export, maintenance, data extraction)
Education
Preferred
Bachelor's Degree or better in Computer Science or related field",3.3,"Nebraska Furniture Mart
3.3","Omaha, NE",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1937,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Home Furniture & Housewares Stores,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
63,Senior Software Systems Engineer,$78k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"Travel Required: 10-25%
Requisition Type: Regular

General Dynamics Information Technology – Federal Civilian Division is looking for Senior Software System Engineer to join our team to support the United States Army Medical Material Development Activity (USAMMDA). This position is based in Ft. Detrick – Frederick, Maryland. The Senior Software System Engineer provides expertise to support of the following tasks in the assigned product in support of the Warfighter Health, Performance and Evacuation (WHPE) Product Management Organization (PMO).

For all identified medical information and acquisition devices, conduct a systems analysis to include communications interface, data modeling, systems security, information assurance, patient privacy, and program assessment to support integration planning and systems program management.
Develop documentation and implementing systems engineering, acquisition, and support strategies for assigned information technology tele-medicine, and MEDEVAC medical equipment products.
Develop systems engineering, program, and acquisition documentation in support of major acquisition decisions for assigned information technology tele-medicine, and MEDEVAC medical equipment products, as required.
Develop and implement a system engineering management process to guide the development and management of a requirements-driven architecture through the entire system engineering life cycle for assigned information technology tele-medicine, and MEDEVAC medical equipment products.
Develop and manage a test program that is consistent and aligns with the Program-wide Test and Evaluation Master Plan for assigned information technology tele-medicine, and MEDEVAC medical equipment products.
Compile and document plans, processes, test objectives, test results, and other documentation as required for assigned information technology tele-medicine, and MEDEVAC medical equipment products.
Coordinate with required external program offices, to include but not limited to, Telemedicine Advanced Technology Research Center (TATRC), Medical Communications for Combat Casualty Care (MC4), United States Army Medical Information Technology Center (USAMITC), and Defense Health Information Management System (DHIMS) to establish required systems integration, communication and security between all key components and sub-components.
Manage configuration control, ensure successful integration and interoperability, and champion lifecycle management of the tele-medicine and MEDEVAC medical equipment products by building integrated product team partnerships with other DoD organizations.
Participate in the engineering requirements generation process with the Army Medical Department Center and School (AMEDD C&S), Health Readiness Center of Excellence (HRCoE), Capability Development Integration Directorate (CDID) for assigned information technology tele-medicine, and MEDEVAC medical equipment products, as required.
Conduct internal project requirements analysis for assigned information technology tele-medicine, and MEDEVAC medical equipment products to derive lower level requirements and system specifications with traceability from system specifications, through lower-level requirements, to the end user requirements represented in the CDID published requirements.
Perform logistical analysis and analyze materiel fielding as part of medical logistics project management.
Develop and implement the logistical strategic planning process for the provisioning of the subsystems that make up the Mission Equipment (ME).
Provide direct support of uniformed soldiers during test, evaluation, training exercises and warfighter assessments. This includes all levels of review and oversight of tele-medicine, and MEDEVAC medical equipment and other supported systems on the ground and in the air.
Participates in special projects as required.

REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelors of Science degree in Software Engineering, Computer Engineering, or Information Technology or the equivalent combination of education, professional training, or work experience.
5+ years of related experience and knowledge of medical devices. At least 1 years' experience as a product manager or product life cycle management. Experience in change management.
Excellent oral and written communications skills required.
Moderate Travel is required (10-25%) throughout CONUS and potentially OCONUS.
Must be a U.S. citizen and have a Secret Clearance.

#GDITPriority

#MilitaryHealthGDITJobs

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Fort Detrick, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
64,Data Engineer,$48k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Join the nation’s leader in second-look finance servicing as our Data Engineer!

Summary:

As a Data Engineer, your primary role will be to build and optimize foundational data marts, which will support reporting and analysis across the Risk Department, and other areas in the organization. This will include building data pipeline architecture, data flows, data transformations and clear documentation. At Genesis, you’ll join our Risk analytics team and partner with data owners and users to build, problem-solve and optimize key data structures. We are transitioning our data warehouse and analytics to Azure cloud and databricks analytics platform. Join us in this adventure!

Responsibilities:

As our Data Engineer you will:

Create and manage large, complex data sets that meet business requirements and serve as the foundation behind analytics and management reporting, informing critical decision making across the organization.
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture, including optimal extraction, transformation and loading of data, leveraging databricks note books, Apache Spark (SQL, Python, Scala) and other Microsoft Azure or open source tools as required.
Maintain high quality documentation about data structures in shared data governance tool for the business to access.
Collaborate with data owners, data stewards, analysts, software developers and DBAs.
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Work with stakeholders to interpret, research and resolve data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs.
Qualifications:

Requirements:

A minimum of 2 years of experience in a Data Engineer role.
Experience with the following tools: SQL or relational databases, Python, data pipeline management such as SSIS, Azure Data Factory or Apache Spark for batch and streaming.
Experience building and optimizing ‘big data’ data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Experience performing root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.
Strong communication skills – verbal and written.
Ability to work in a fast-paced environment with a focus on continuous improvement.
Results Focus: Self-starter with ability to work independently and collaboratively in a cross-functional team.
Strong organizational skills.
Extreme attention to detail, strong analytical, quantitative, problem solving and conceptual skills.

Preferred Requirement:

Ideally this candidate has experience with the following tools: Apache Spark, databricks, Hadoop or comparable tool
5+ years of experience in a Data Engineer role.

What’s In It For You:

Robust health insurance including individual and family Medical, Dental and Vision insurance
Peace of mind with Life and AD&D Insurance
Protect yourself with company paid Long-Term Disability
Save on taxes with Flexible Spending Accounts
Relax and recharge with Paid Time Off (PTO) Program
Financial health with 401k plus employer match up to 4%
6 paid holidays per year plus 1 paid floating holiday to use at your convenience
We invest in your future through Tuition Reimbursement and ongoing Learning & Development
Take care of your well-being through Wellness perks

About Genesis

Genesis Financial Solutions is one of the nation’s largest non-prime credit card servicing businesses. We serve almost 3 million consumers through two channels: Private Label Credit Card Servicing and direct-to-consumer MasterCard options that we service on behalf of our issuing bank partners. We specialize in second-look finance servicing for consumers who are turned down by a prime lender, yet are just slightly below the prime threshold. We are a company of seasoned consumer finance professionals who believe that everyone deserves the opportunity for both quality credit financing, and the chance to rebuild their credit. With our help, non-prime consumers can buy quality products and services without depleting their savings account.

Genesis Financial Solutions is an equal opportunity employer (EEO).",3.3,"Genesis Financial Solutions, Inc.
3.3","Beaverton, OR",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
65,Data Engineer,-1,"The Role:

As the Data Engineer, you will be part of making insights accessible and timely by working closely with our data modelers to populate our data warehouse. In your daily work, you'll be responsible for working with another data engineer in optimizing data sourcing and transformation that create an efficient, effective data organization. You will focus on executing the data warehouse strategy to ensure resiliency, fault tolerance, and scalability, while also establishing best practices. You will also take a hands-on approach to collaborating with analysts and business intelligence to optimize the sourcing and consistency of KPIs, which will ultimately drive informed business decisions across the organization.

Why You'll Love This Role:

This is a rare opportunity to make an impact on how Newsela thinks about data during a critical time in the company's evolution. You will work closely with the Manager of Data Warehouse and other key stakeholders to optimize the most critical enterprise-wide KPIs that drive business growth and engagement. Using cutting-edge cloud technology, your work will combine deep analytics with analysis of user behavior, and will serve as the backbone of business intelligence and decision-making for Sales, Marketing, Product, and Customer Success. These insights will also be leveraged for C-level and Board reporting across Newsela. You will be joining a growing team of Data experts, and will help build the foundation for a product that's helping transform K-12 education.

Why We'll Love You:

You have 4+ years of demonstrated success in sourcing, transforming, and optimizing data from divergent sources. No management experience necessary but a passion for mentoring and learning leadership qualities is desirable. You are an expert in creating an ETL/ELT foundation leveraging best practices for continuous improvement, in addition to possessing expert SQL, DDL, and DML knowledge. You are highly skilled in scheduling, dependency management, and optimization. You are highly advanced with Python or other scripting languages in order to help data analysts and data scientists, among other partners, optimize data models. You will have an acute understanding of data warehouse modeling techniques and some experience using cloud-based data warehouse technologies. Through your work in data engineering, you have expanded and improved either the data warehouse set, utilization, and/or business performance. You do all this, while also contributing to an engaging data team culture

About Newsela:

One of the fastest growing tech companies in K-12 education, Newsela was founded on the principle that while every child learns differently, they all deserve a rich learning experience that ignites a love of learning. We built our platform based on learning science research to deliver the most engaging, authentic content to modernize how teaching happens in the classroom. Along with interactive assessments and tools, we provide teachers with digital content at five reading levels -- from +100 of the best sources -- that is relevant to the diverse backgrounds and interests of their students. Since we started in 2013, we've established a presence in 90% of U.S. K-12 schools and over 2.5M teachers and 37M students have registered with Newsela.",4.0,"Newsela
4.0",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
66,Senior Systems Software Engineer Database Operations at Vertica (US - REMOTE),$88k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Systems Software Engineer Database Operations at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Job Description:
Title: Senior Systems Software Engineer Database Operations at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Location: Remote Eligible

Vertica believes that each of us knows the work environment that makes us the most productive. Thats why we provide our employees with the ability to work how and where they will be the most successful. We enable a flexible approach to work location, meaning for roles where it makes sense, you can work from the office or from home, or a combination of both, but you make that choice including where you choose to live. Vertica invests in the best technologies and provides flexible benefits and collaborative work environments to empower employees to work productively in the setting that meets their personal needs. Thats why were so proud to have a highly productive and engaged team in every function of the company.

About your role
The Vertica Ecosystem Team is looking for an experienced software engineer and python expert to help us take our Big Data Analytics Platform to the next level.

Our team is responsible for the components that enable deployment and operation of our distributed database: installation, upgrade, orchestration, administration, configuration, and diagnostics. Our users experience these parts of the product first and rely on these components during critical points in their deployments lifetime. In this role you will make contributions that impact Verticas entire customer base and help us expand to new customers who want to deploy in novel ways.

We need a self-directed engineer who is capable of solving problems in diverse areas, including:
Distributed systems
Systems programming
Networking
Operating system integration
The candidates responsibilities will include:
Design and implement features in the Vertica Analytics Platform to improve distributed database installation, upgrade, orchestration, administration, configuration, and diagnostics
Define requirements for new features in collaboration with Product Managers, Support Engineers, and customers
Diagnose, debug, and resolve product issues discovered during the development process and coming from customers
Influence the design of other in-database features based on their interaction with the deployment mechanisms
Provide technical leadership and support for junior members of the team by conducting thorough design and code reviews
The recommended requirements the candidate should meet are:
Bachelor, Masters, or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering, or related field
At least 4 years of experience working full time as a software engineer
Strong understanding of data structures, algorithms, and software engineering practices for sustainable development
Strong working knowledge of python3
Experience writing software for Linux and working on the command line
Familiarity with popular cloud deployment, provisioning and infrastructure-as-code tools

About our team
The best ideas often come from fresh perspectives. At Vertica, our open-minded, diverse and inclusive team is always learning from each other. We approach intellectually challenging work with a ""get it done"" attitude. Vertica Engineers are given significant latitude and support to pursue what they are passionate about to make Vertica an even better place. If you are excited about building great technology with a proactive team, you will find yourself in good company at Vertica. Welcome to the family.
About our product
Vertica is a recognized leader in analytics powering some of the worlds most data driven organizations like Uber, Wayfair, Intuit, Cerner, and more. Our columnar, MPP, distributed database delivers unprecedented speed, petabyte scale, with analytics and machine learning functions built into the core.
We believe the future belongs to the fast. Join us for the ride!

#LI-GC2
#DiceGC

Job:

Engineering

Micro Focus is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Prospective employees will receive consideration without discrimination because of race, colour, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, marital or veteran status, sexual orientation, genetic information, citizenship or any other legally protected status",3.3,"Micro Focus
3.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
67,Project Engineer and Senior Project Engineer,-1,"Duties may include:

assume responsibility for completion of detail phases of assigned projects under direction of project and cognizant engineering; provide detailed solutions to assigned engineering problems; make engineering and design calculations applying basic engineering principles, theories and concepts; prepare technical reports and other technical documents such as procedures and operation and maintenance manuals; prepare cost estimates related to assigned technical projects; prepare engineered work packages under supervision for construction or modification of equipment and facilities; analyze specific equipment or system failures of limited scope and recommend repairs, modifications, or appropriate corrective actions through application of basic engineering principles; provide general functional requirements to perform basic design of new equipment/systems or modification of existing equipment/systems; provide engineering support to other groups; make technical presentations.

Knowledge shall include an understanding of engineering principles, theories, and concepts and microcomputer applications; ability to deliver oral presentations to convey technical findings and recommendations; ability to write clear, concise, and organized memos and reports.

· DOE experience preferred.

· Sound communication skills to effectively interface with internal and external customers.

· Able to work well in the field and take ownership of assigned system equipment mechanical and electrical control systems.

· Able to work with groups to provide overlapping support to other engineers while possibly working on several assigned tasks.

· Able to clearly communicate technical information to non-technical personnel both verbally as well as in writing.

· Able to expand skill set beyond own discipline to include understanding of control systems, interfaces with other electrical, mechanical, and structural systems.

· Able to work in an industrial and construction site environment including walking over uneven surfaces, in the underground mine, and over long distances with periods of standing.
Project Engineer*
In addition to the respective design, systems, or programs engineering discipline qualifications stated above, a Project Engineer shall possess the following qualifications:

1) 10 or more years professional experience including Construction Engineering, Project Engineering, and Project Management in the Nuclear Industry

2) Engineering experience at both construction projects and operating nuclear facilities

3) Project Engineering experience with both mid to small size projects

4) Knowledge and experience with delivery of engineering basis documents and detailed engineering specifications and drawings, including the full range of documents for equipment procurements.

5) Demonstrated experience leading and managing a large engineering workforce, including matrixed resources or Architect Engineering firms.

General duties for a project engineer include:

1) Promote a nuclear safety culture; personally exhibits safe behaviors; understands safety requirements and ensures their incorporation into project plans

2) Develop project scope

3) Perform project planning

4) Prepare cost estimates

5) Develop schedule

6) Assist Project Engineering Manager or Senior Project Engineer with maintaining project schedule by monitoring schedule progress, coordinating engineering activities to support the schedule, identifying issues to management and recommending actions; actively participates in problem solving

7) Assist the Project Engineering Manager in controlling project costs by identifying any potential changes to scope, schedule, or cost; evaluates changes and recommends actions to mitigate impacts; reviews proposed changes for adherence to project plan requirements; and, seeks management’s approval before implementing changes

8) Assist the Project Engineering Manager with maintaining a high level of quality by adherence to procedures

9) Confirm project deliverables meet requirements through design review, testing and inspection

10) Maintain project records and data

11) Represent project team at meetings and in interfacing with other organizations
Senior Project Engineer*
In addition to the respective engineering discipline stated above, the Senior Project Engineer shall possess the following qualifications:

1) 20 or more year’s professional experience including Construction Engineering, Project Engineering, and Project Management in the Nuclear Industry

2) Engineering experience at both construction projects and operating nuclear facilities

3) Project Engineering experience with both large and smaller projects

4) Knowledge and experience with delivery of engineering basis documents and detailed engineering specifications and drawings, including the full range of documents for equipment procurements.

5) Demonstrated experience leading and managing a large engineering workforce, including matrixed resources or Architect Engineering firms.

General duties for a Senior Project Engineer may include:

1) Promote a nuclear safety culture; personally exhibits safe behaviors; understands safety requirements and ensures their incorporation into project plans

2) Develop project scope

3) Perform project planning

4) Prepare cost estimates

5) Develop schedules related to projects assigned

6) Assist Project Engineering Manager with maintaining project schedule by monitoring schedule progresses, coordinating engineering activities to support the schedule, identifying issues to management and recommending actions; actively participates in problem solving

7) Assist the Project Engineering Manager in controlling project costs by identifying any potential changes to scope, schedule, or cost; evaluates changes and recommends actions to mitigate impacts; reviews proposed changes for adherence to project plan requirements; and, seeks management’s approval before implementing changes

8) Assist the Project Engineering Manager with maintaining a high level of quality by adherence to procedures

9) Confirm project deliverables meet requirements through design review, testing and inspection

10) Maintain project records and data

11) Represent project team at meetings and in interfacing with other organizations

Other / Special Considerations

1) Experience with DOE, and commercial nuclear industries are desired.

2) Bachelor of Science in engineering, Bachelors in engineering, or Bachelor of Science, in a related engineering discipline.

3) Experience with Nuclear Quality Assurance programs and Configuration Management programs.

4) Experience with field walkdowns for design efforts.

Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
10 hour shift
Experience:
to 20 yrs of Construction / Project Management: 10 years (Required)
to 20 yrs of Construction Project / Nuclear Facility: 10 years (Preferred)
to 20 yrs of Project Engineering: 10 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Pinnacle Specialty Group,"Carlsbad, NM",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Contract,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
68,Data Integration Engineer,$56k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Integration Engineer - Location, Orlando, FL
SUMMARY DESCRIPTION OF POSITION:
The Data Integration Engineering role is geared to develop and leverage api's to connect and move data to various cloud-based front-end (web) and back-end (ERP) and Data systems. This candidate will play a critical role in the FL integration strategy by linking multiple customer-facing systems to Master Data Management (Semarchy), CRM (Salesforce), Marketing Automation platform (Acoustic) and our Data warehouse. Candidate will design, develop, implement, and integrate information systems and software applications to meet functional and technical requirements for internal staff members and ministry constituents. He/she designs and codes API software applications, configures and tests applications, adheres to industry best practices, standardizes quality assurance procedures for software integrations. Candidate oversees testing, develops fixes, maintains, supports, and upgrades existing application code.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
The Data Integration Engineer/Developer supports and helps design and implement the integration architecture that will be used in interconnecting FamilyLife’s (FL) ecosystem
Work with other technical resources to build necessary connectivity and move data between systems in accordance with FL’s goals and objectives.
Provides technical support and collaborate with project team members and demonstrates expertise in a variety of the field's concepts, practices, and procedures.
He/She performs a variety of tasks where a wide degree of creativity and latitude is expected
Analyze functional users’ needs and then design, develop, integrate, and test software and integrations to meet those needs.
Become an expert on FL ecosystems, Master Data Management and Data Flows.
Design each integration in accordance with functional policies, procedures, and quality assurance best practices.
Ensure development projects meet business requirements and goals, fulfill end-user requirements, and identify and resolve systems issues.
Monitor and analyze effectiveness and efficiency of existing applications; develop strategies for improving, upgrading or leveraging these systems.
Lead the development of system architectures that define the interaction between systems to include the use of platforms and tools and definition of standards shared between systems.
Create a variety of models and diagrams (such as flowcharts) that instruct other developers/programmers how integrations and data flows function.
Document integrations, applications and system components as a reference for future maintenance and upgrades.
Evaluate proposals to identify potential problem areas and make appropriate recommendations.
Collaborate with analysts, designers, contractors/consultants, system owners, and other developers/programmers during system/software implementation.
Research technologies for possible placement/adoption into FL's back-office system.
Actively and intentionally, grow in his / her Christian faith.
Maintain a positive witness for Christ.
Share what God is teaching him or her.
Consistently attend and participate in team / ministry devotional times.

OTHER FUNCTIONS (Non-essential):
Perform related duties or special projects as assigned

SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES:
Contractors and consultants as necessary.

KNOWLEDGE OF:
Strong knowledge of system/software implementation and quality assurance best practices.

ABILITIES:
Ability to manage workloads and processes.
Ability to communicate ideas in both technical and user-friendly language.
Experience performing Data Integration activities.
Experience coding to Rest and SOAP API's.
Experience with Master Data Management tools and processes.
Experience connecting front end web sites to back end reporting, CRM and finance systems.
Proven ability to design and write web services/API code.
Ability to establish standards, roadmaps and lead others in their support and execution
Strong knowledge and ability to code in Nodejs, Lambda
Experience using Github, Jenkins
Coding experience using Visual Studio and C#
Ability to create micro services, API Frameworks API’s, (Rest, Json)
SQL Server, Postgres, SSIS packages
Bonus for experience with Google Big Query, AWS, Semarchy, Salesforce, Acoustic email marketing platform

EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE:
Four-year computer-related degree and 5 years equivalent work experience in software development and/or design and systems integration and management.
Strong requirements gathering, project, and process management experience.
Proven experience in systems architecture, development, implementation, integration, optimization, and sustainment of software solutions.",4.1,"FamilyLife
4.1","Orlando, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
69,PET CT Service Engineer,$41k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"Schedules and performs preventive maintenance, routine, and emergency repair of PET CT scanners, imaging devices, and other electronic equipment at CARTI facilities. Provides appropriate documentation of all maintenance work performed.
Orders parts, tools, and supplies. Provides appropriate documentation for all inventory items received, transferred or disbursed. Performs annual inventory.
Assists with installation of new imaging equipment.
Maintains work order and inventory database. Develops reports and spreadsheets from CMMS data and reviews for accuracy and completeness. Provides reports to Director of Engineering and other administrative staff as required.
Install and repairs computer and network equipment and performs software maintenance as required for service of imaging equipment.
Communicates to the Director of Engineering the anticipated need for parts and estimated costs for budget purposes.
Handles assigned responsibilities and projects in a professional manner with a minimum of supervision required.
Provide prevent at ive , routine, and emergency maintenance services on PET CT scanners and other nuclear medicine and medical imaging equipment.
EDUCATION, CERTIFICATION, LICENSURE, REGISTRATION:
High school diploma or equivalent. Preferred: an associate or college degree in a technical field.
Must maintain a valid Arkansas Driver’s License.
EXPERIENCE, KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS and ABILITIES:
Two years’ experience in performing preventive maintenance, troubleshooting, and repair of PET CT scanners. Preferred: Five years or more experience.
Vendor technical training on PET CT.
Knowledge and skills in mathematics, physics, and engineering, as required for maintenance of medical imaging devices.
In-depth knowledge of digital and analog electronics theory as required for maintenance of all electronic equipment.
Competency and knowledge in computer repair, to include: component replacement, OS install, network configuration, and basic configuration and commands.
Competency in the use of CMMS software.
Knowledge and skills in the development of MS Excel spreadsheets and MS Access databases.
Knowledge of institution and departmental policies and procedures and quality control guidelines.
Knowledge of high-voltage and radiation safety procedures.",3.8,"CARTI, Inc.
3.8","Little Rock, AR",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1976,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
70,Sr. Automation Controls Engineer,-1,"Senior Automation Controls Engineer - NC
Industrial Systems Division
Location: North Carolina
Job Type: Full Time, Direct Hire
Reports To: Department Manager, Industrial Systems
FLSA Status: Exempt STOT
DESCRIPTION
The Senior Automation Controls Engineer serves as the primary customer interface for multiple customers in the state of North Carolina. In addition to technically leading and executing projects, the Senior Automation Controls Engineer also assists with the scoping and bidding of new projects. This position interacts with clients to understand and develop automation requirements and transform them into effective control solutions. This is done through the use of software engineering techniques, use of Matrix standards, templates, and procedures, and use of good engineering judgment in making minor adaptations and modifications. The Senior Automation Controls Engineer must have strong written and verbal communication skills and must be team-oriented. The ideal candidate will have depth of experience in the following areas:
PLC: Rockwell Logix Controllers, PLC-5s, SLCs
HMI: FTView, PanelView, Wonderware
Drives: Allen-Bradley VFDs
DCS: PlantPAx
This position will be based in North Carolina and initially be a remote worker position. Based upon client growth, this position could form the basis of a permanent Matrix Technologies North Carolina office.
PRIMARY DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Perform design and engineering functions in accordance with accepted practices and company standards.
Prepare project scopes of work, preliminary design concepts, bills of material, cost estimates, and other necessary project documents.
Lead or assist in gathering field data and preparing project and functional specifications.
Coordinate the design and implementation of high-quality industrial software programs with other members of the project team in keeping with the defined project requirements.
Work with the assigned Project Manager to achieve the overall project goals and objectives.
Prepare project correspondence as required.
Maintain positive client relationships on assigned projects.
SPECIFICATIONS
Bachelor of Science Degree in any of the following: Electrical Engineering, Chemical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Computer Technology, or related field from an ABET accredited college or university.
Twelve plus years of controls, automation, and electrical troubleshooting with start-up experience.
Professional Engineering (PE) certification preferred.
Varied industrial background is a plus. Key industries include food, specialty chemical, pharmaceuticals, mining and aggregates, oil and gas, and manufacturing.
Ability to travel approximately 50% locally and 20% overnight. Current clients are within a 1.5 hour driving radius of central North Carolina.
PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel objects, tools or controls; reach with hands and arms; talk, and hear.
Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus.
This position must also be able to perform industrial field work which may include hazardous locations, ladders, and stairs.

ABOUT MATRIX
At Matrix Technologies, our core values define our culture and we live out those values in everything we do. We call this “The Matrix Way.” We strive for a culture that promotes teamwork and collaboration, engagement, and talent development. Our culture reflects what the modern workforce wants and inspires our employees to perform their best. We support our employee’s personal goals and interests with flexible work schedules and options for increased paid time off. This focus on the employee experience is why we have been named a Top Work Place by the Toledo Blade. To ensure we are providing our customers with the best solutions from the industry’s leading experts, we encourage our employees to grow professionally by offering technical and leadership training, tuition reimbursement, memberships to professional societies, and diverse experiences.
Since 1980, Matrix Technologies, Inc. and our professional team of engineering and automation experts have been the leading single source for any process, facility, or automation engineering need. We only hire the best which allows us to provide our customers with “A Better Process for Success”. Our talented staff and processes have also earned us a spot in the Control Engineering System Integrator Hall of Fame.
Matrix Technologies is a versatile, platform-independent, full-service resource for process design, automation and information system engineering. We have a commitment to our clients and it shows with 87% of our projects being repeat engagements from satisfied customers. Matrix Technologies has expertise in oil & gas, chemical, food & beverage, consumer packaged goods, pharmaceutical/biotech, aggregates, discrete manufacturing, automotive, glass, and metals.
Come see what “The Matrix Way” is all about!",4.0,"Matrix Technologies, Inc.
4.0",North Carolina,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
71,"Server Engineer, Journeyman",$79k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"Sabre Systems has an open requirement for a Server Engineer, Journeyman level supporting the E-6B Mercury Program. The selected candidate will perform tasks with little or no guidance. Requires configuring and managing servers of different operating systems, including installing, fixing issues, and upgrading while implementing enhancements to improve performance and reliability. Design, implement, and manage enterprise system technologies. Oversee and resolve server problems, network devices, storage, and client devices. Diagnose, detect, and resolve other issues. Have a thorough understanding of patching tools and security vulnerability scanning. Be able to interpret information in generated reports and come up with strategies to remove vulnerabilities. Create project plans for all system deployment and modifications and document them. Functional Duties: • Patch Systems on Windows 2016 • Write Python or PowerShell Scripts on a Windows 2016 • Manage VMs that run on a Windows10 and CENTOS7 • Develop, review, and trace program requirements documentation Qualifications Requirements: • Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or Engineering • Five (5) years of experience is required • DoD Secret Clearance or higher is required Overview Sabre Systems, Inc. is a quality driven, customer focused large business providing innovative solutions in the areas of Cyber, C4ISR, Business Intelligence and Data Analytics, and Enterprise Modernization to federal and civilian customers. Our mission is to ensure our customers have the technology, services, and expertise to overcome threats, maintain superiority, and quickly adapt to emerging obstacles. At Sabre, we're more than just a job - we're a team - and we care for and nurture our employees like family. If you want to be a part of creating and implementing enduring solutions that transform mission challenges into mission success – join Sabre! Sabre provides an excellent benefits package, which includes healthcare, paid days off, tuition reimbursement, and a 401K plan. We respect the unique perspectives that a diverse workforce of minorities, women, individuals with disabilities, and protected veterans brings not only to our company, but also to our customers. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. EOE Minorities/Females/Disability/Veterans; VEVRAA Federal Contractor Job Type: Full-time Experience: * active DoD Secret Clearacne or higher: 1 year (Required) * related Server Engineer: 5 years (Required) Education: * Bachelor's (Required) Benefits: * None Schedule: * Monday to Friday",4.8,"Sabre Systems Inc.
4.8","Patuxent River, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
72,"Lead DevOps Engineer, Cloud",-1,"Why 2nd Watch

2nd Watch is in growth mode, and we are looking for like-minded, focused team members to join us! We are looking for the most technically forward-thinking, cloud-passionate employees in the world, and strive daily to align our core values with those that we hire Elevating Each Other, Being Outcome Driven, Winning as a Team, Being Bold, Trusting Each Other, and Having FUN! these are all key elements to who we hire.

2nd Watch has a unique company culture and working environment that live and breathe success and promote pushing the envelope every day in your respective role at the company. This is what drives our teams a perpetual thirst for knowledge, and a desire to work with the best people and take on big challenges together. Getting our attention takes creativity, integrity, a desire to improve yourself and your co-workers each day, and a track record of caring about who you are affecting, both positively and negatively, while you are getting the right stuff done.

We offer roles ranging from all levels in our Sales, Managed Cloud Services, Cloud Enablement, DevOps, Product Development teams and beyond. We are looking for superstars to help raise the bar, setting industry-level standards around project management and delivery of AWS, Azure, and Google Cloud services.

About 2nd Watch

As a cloud native company, 2nd Watch has walked alongside our clients for over a decade helping them migrate to the cloud, accelerate application development, and deliver on their companys strategic goals through the blend of technology and innovation that is at our core. Our services deliver cloud native capabilities through strategic consulting, modernization services, and specialized technology practices focused on maximizing the value of public cloud through:
Business Transformation
Cloud Advisory
Datacenter Migration & Application Modernization
Optimization
Data Engineering
Compliance, Security & Business Continuity
DevOps
Managed Cloud services
With a client NPS of 85, our approach has been successful for some of the worlds leading brands and is tested, trusted, and proven to accelerate your cloud adoption.

2nd Watch is an AWS Partner Network (APN) Premier Consulting Partner, a Microsoft Azure Gold Partner, and a Google Cloud Platform Partner. The venture-backed company is headquartered in Seattle, Washington. To learn more about 2nd Watch, visit www.2ndwatch.com or call 888-317-7920.

Position Title:

DevOps Engineer, Cloud

The ideal candidate is someone who:
Operates with the highest levels of integrity
Thinks Big and takes on Big Challenges
Has a continuous thirst for knowledge and is a perpetual learner
Strives to make themselves and everyone around them better
Has a passion for technology
About you

You are a systematic thinker. You find yourself uncomfortable when things are messy or unorganized and you feel the urge to fix them. You take pride in your work and focus on the details that others often overlook. You love working closely with peers in an environment that tirelessly strives for improvement and doing the right things, the right way. You always seek to find the quickest, safest, and most repeatable processes to perform your tasks including automating everything possible. You recognize that you may not presently know everything that you need to know, yet you are confident in your abilities to learn the skills needed to fulfill any job role and are eager for the challenge. You want to gain deep, firsthand knowledge of the public cloud space including Amazon AWS, Microsoft Azure, and Google Cloud Platform. You want to join a team working to deliver a legendary customer experience.

About the amazing things that you will do

You will join a thriving DevOps culture as an operations engineer embedded on the software development team. You will spearhead operations management of developed solutions including log management, monitoring/alerting, infrastructure provisioning, system patching, configuration management, and support. As part of the product development team, you will actively participate in agile development practices working closely with engineers to maintain and enhance infrastructure management and CI/CD processes to optimize for quality, reliability, and availability. You will ensure that security, performance, and disaster preparedness are always represented in team decisions. You will gain and expand on your experience managing cloud native microservices utilizing Docker clustering technologies (ECS, Kubernetes, ).

Responsibilities:
Match infrastructure implementation / monitoring / management with software architecture
Influence software architecture to simplify / streamline operational management
Working close with the developers
Manage All Environments
Monitor running instances ensure costs are managed and optimized against performance
Configuration changes / documentation / automation of changes
Monitor / manage logs
Patch management
Security and key management
Establish and monitor operational dashboards and work queues
Monitor infrastructure / application performance & health
Shared software release duties
Developing and monitoring infrastructure automation for deployment
Code coverage metrics
Monitor build / deployment status
Must haves:
Be passionate about being challenged and hungry to continuously learn
Mid-level to Senior on typical operations front (operating system patching, systematic troubleshooting, eye for operational details, )
Must have experience and be extremely comfortable with Unix/Linux server environments
Comfortable with command line tools (Bash, Powershell, )
Working understanding of code and script development (ex: Python, )
Familiar with agile software development lifecycles
Knowledge of best practices and IT operations for always-up, always-available services
Major experience bonus point:
Docker / container cluster management (AWS ECS, Kubernetes, Vagrant, OpenShift, Apache Mesos, Deis, Mesophere DCOS, )
Docker / Microservice release orchestration including Blue Green Deployments and Canary Releases
Managing infrastructure on Amazon AWS
Managing infrastructure on Microsoft Azure
Continuous Integration / Continuous Delivery software release management and automation
Infrastructure as Code i.e., Terraform and Cloud Formation
Minor experience bonus:
MS SQL and/or MySQL administration / optimization
NoSQL and caching tools such as MemCache / Redis
GIT / Source Control tools (i.e., GitHub, Bit Bucket, TFS, )
Automation / configuration management using either Puppet, Chef or equivalent
Powered by JazzHR",3.8,"2nd Watch, Inc.
3.8",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
73,Biomedical Engineer (Occupational Therapy),$43k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"Travel Required: 10-25%
Public Trust: NACI (T1)
Requisition Type: Regular

GDIT's military health team is HIRING is a Biomedical Engineer to join our team to support the Department of Army. This position is based in Frederick, Maryland.

The Biomedical Engineer will support the Warfighter Health, Performance and Evacuation (WHPE) Product Management Organization (PMO) at the U.S. Army Medical Materiel Development Activity (USAMMDA).

This task will require moderate (10-25%) travel to locations throughout the United States, as well as OCONUS locations TBD.

What You'll Be Doing:

Supporting one of three assemblages, and their respective contents, that compose the Holistic Health and Fitness (H2F) system - the Medical Equipment Set (MES) Occupational Therapy (MES-OT).
Conducting a systems analysis for all identified devices and assemblages (sets), to include communications interface, data modeling, systems security, information assurance, patient privacy, and program assessment to support integration planning and systems program management.
Developing documentation and implementing systems engineering, acquisition, and support strategies for assigned H2F products.
Developing systems engineering, program, and acquisition documentation in support of major acquisition decisions for assigned products and assemblages, as required.
Developing and implementing a system engineering management process through the entire system engineering life cycle for assigned H2F products.
Developing and managing a test program that is consistent and aligns with the Program-wide Test and Evaluation Master Plan for assigned products and assemblages.
Compiling and documenting plans, processes, test objectives, test results, and other documentation as required for assigned H2F products.
Coordinating with required external program offices to establish required systems integration, communication and security between all key components and sub-components to effectively satisfy program requirements.
Managing configuration control, ensure successful integration and interoperability, and champion life-cycle management of the H2F products by building integrated product team partnerships with other DoD organizations.
Conducting internal project requirements analysis for assigned H2F products to derive lower level requirements and system specifications with traceability from system specifications, through lower-level requirements, to the end user requirements represented in the CDID published requirements.
Preparing contract documentation to include but not limited to market research, acquisition strategy, independent government cost estimate, performance work statement, purchase request, justification & approval on contracts.
Supporting and consulting with product management staff, OTSG consultants, requirements generators, and regulatory support to meet H2F program objectives
Providing direct support of uniformed soldiers during test, evaluation, fielding, training exercises and warfighter assessments. This includes all levels of review and oversight of H2F and other supported systems as required.
Participating in discussions to analyze and interpret medical equipment to trend current practices to ensure inclusion of the most appropriate equipment and supplies in various medical unit assemblage publications
Participating in various discussions involving new or replacement medical equipment to ensure proper parallel planning and sharing of information for timely development, review, and publication of medical equipment configuration and unit assemblage and Set, Kit and Outfit (SKO) documents.
Participating in special projects as required.

REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelor’s Degree in engineering or related discipline, or the equivalent combination of education, professional training, or work experience.
5+ years of related experience.
Have capability of applying subject matter expertise in the areas of Biomedical Engineering for developing, procuring, packing, marking and fielding products.
Must have experience with Microsoft Office, to include MS Outlook, MS Project, MS PowerPoint, MS Excel and MS Word.
Excellent oral and written communications skills.
Must be U.S. citizen and be able to obtain a T1.

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

A level of familiarity with Fitness and Rehabilitation Sciences, Network Engineering and Risk Management Framework (RMF) requirements, desired.

#militaryhealthgditjobs

#gditpriority

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Frederick, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
74,Biomedical Engineer (Performance Nutrition),$43k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"Travel Required: 10-25%
Public Trust: NACI (T1)
Requisition Type: Regular

GDIT's military health team is HIRING is a Biomedical Engineer to join our team to support the Department of Army. This position is based in Frederick, Maryland.

The Biomedical Engineer will support the Warfighter Health, Performance and Evacuation (WHPE) Product Management Organization (PMO) at the U.S. Army Medical Materiel Development Activity (USAMMDA).

This task will require moderate (10-25%) travel to locations throughout the United States, as well as OCONUS locations TBD.

What You'll Be Doing:

Supporting one of three assemblages, and their respective contents, that compose the Holistic Health and Fitness (H2F) system - the Medical Equipment Set (MES) Performance Nutrition [which is referred to as the Registered Dietitian (RD) Support (MES-RD)].
Conducting a systems analysis for all identified devices and assemblages (sets), to include communications interface, data modeling, systems security, information assurance, patient privacy, and program assessment to support integration planning and systems program management.
Developing documentation and implementing systems engineering, acquisition, and support strategies for assigned H2F products.
Developing systems engineering, program, and acquisition documentation in support of major acquisition decisions for assigned products and assemblages, as required.
Developing and implementing a system engineering management process through the entire system engineering life cycle for assigned H2F products.
Developing and managing a test program that is consistent and aligns with the Program-wide Test and Evaluation Master Plan for assigned products and assemblages.
Compiling and documenting plans, processes, test objectives, test results, and other documentation as required for assigned H2F products.
Coordinating with required external program offices to establish required systems integration, communication and security between all key components and sub-components to effectively satisfy program requirements.
Managing configuration control, ensuring successful integration and interoperability, and champion life-cycle management of the H2F products by building integrated product team partnerships with other DoD organizations.
Conducting internal project requirements analysis for assigned H2F products to derive lower level requirements and system specifications with traceability from system specifications, through lower-level requirements, to the end user requirements represented in the CDID published requirements.
Preparing contract documentation to include but not limited to market research, acquisition strategy, independent government cost estimate, performance work statement, purchase request, justification & approval on contracts.
Supporting and consulting with product management staff, OTSG consultants, requirements generators, and regulatory support to meet H2F program objectives
Providing direct support of uniformed soldiers during test, evaluation, fielding, training exercises and warfighter assessments. This includes all levels of review and oversight of H2F and other supported systems as required.
Participating in discussions to analyze and interpret medical equipment to trend current practices to ensure inclusion of the most appropriate equipment and supplies in various medical unit assemblage publications
Participating in various discussions involving new or replacement medical equipment to ensure proper parallel planning and sharing of information for timely development, review, and publication of medical equipment configuration and unit assemblage and Set, Kit and Outfit (SKO) documents.
Participating in special projects as required.

REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelor’s Degree in engineering or related discipline, or the equivalent combination of education, professional training, or work experience.
5+ years of related experience.
Have capability of applying subject matter expertise in the areas of Biomedical Engineering for developing, procuring, packing, marking, storing, and fielding products.
Must have experience with Microsoft Office, to include MS Outlook, MS Project, MS PowerPoint, MS Excel and MS Word.
Excellent oral and written communications skills required.
Must be U.S. citizen and be able to obtain a T1.

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

Possess a level of familiarity with Fitness and Rehabilitation Sciences, Network Engineering and DOD Risk Management Framework (RMF) requirements.

#militaryhealthgditjobs

#gditpriority

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Frederick, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
75,Biomedical Engineer (Physical Therapy),$43k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"Travel Required: 10-25%
Public Trust: NACI (T1)
Requisition Type: Regular

GDIT's military health team is HIRING is a Biomedical Engineer to join our team to support the Department of Army. This position is based in Frederick, Maryland.

The Biomedical Engineer will support the Warfighter Health, Performance and Evacuation (WHPE) Product Management Organization (PMO) at the U.S. Army Medical Materiel Development Activity (USAMMDA).

This task will require moderate (10-25%) travel to locations throughout the United States, as well as OCONUS locations TBD.

What You'll Be Doing:

Supporting one of three assemblages, and their respective contents, that compose the Holistic Health and Fitness (H2F) system - the Medical Equipment Set (MES) Physical Therapy (MES-PT).
Conducting a systems analysis for all identified devices and assemblages (sets), to include communications interface, data modeling, systems security, information assurance, patient privacy, and program assessment to support integration planning and systems program management.
Developing documentation and implementing systems engineering, acquisition, and support strategies for assigned H2F products.
Developing systems engineering, program, and acquisition documentation in support of major acquisition decisions for assigned products and assemblages, as required.
Developing and implementing a system engineering management process through the entire system engineering life cycle for assigned H2F products.
Developing and managing a test program that is consistent and aligns with the Program-wide Test and Evaluation Master Plan for assigned products and assemblages.
Compiling and documenting plans, processes, test objectives, test results, and other documentation as required for assigned H2F products.
Coordinating with required external program offices to establish required systems integration, communication and security between all key components and sub-components to effectively satisfy program requirements.
Managing configuration control, ensure successful integration and interoperability, and champion life-cycle management of the H2F products by building integrated product team partnerships with other DoD organizations.
Conducting internal project requirements analysis for assigned H2F products to derive lower level requirements and system specifications with traceability from system specifications, through lower-level requirements, to the end user requirements represented in the CDID published requirements.
Preparing contract documentation to include but not limited to market research, acquisition strategy, independent government cost estimate, performance work statement, purchase request, justification & approval on contracts.
Supporting and consulting with product management staff, OTSG consultants, requirements generators, and regulatory support to meet H2F program objectives
Providing direct support of uniformed soldiers during test, evaluation, fielding, training exercises and warfighter assessments. This includes all levels of review and oversight of H2F and other supported systems as required.
Participating in discussions to analyze and interpret medical equipment to trend current practices to ensure inclusion of the most appropriate equipment and supplies in various medical unit assemblage publications
Participating in various discussions involving new or replacement medical equipment to ensure proper parallel planning and sharing of information for timely development, review, and publication of medical equipment configuration and unit assemblage and Set, Kit and Outfit (SKO) documents.
Participating in special projects as required.

REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelor’s Degree in engineering or related discipline, or the equivalent combination of education, professional training, or work experience.
5+ years of related experience.
Have capability of applying subject matter expertise in the areas of Biomedical Engineering for developing, procuring, packing, marking, storing, and fielding products.
Experience as a logistics planner or in performance based logistics with the Army with an understanding of the system function and effect on the defense supply system.
Must have experience with Microsoft Office, to include MS Outlook, MS Project, MS PowerPoint, MS Excel and MS Word.
Excellent oral and written communications skills required.
Must be U.S. citizen and be able to obtain a T1.

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

Possess a level of familiarity with Fitness and Rehabilitation Sciences, Network Engineering and DOD Risk Management Framework (RMF) requirements.

#militaryhealthgditjobs

#gditpriority

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Frederick, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
76,Senior 3D Vision & Signal Processing Engineer,$55k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior 3D Vision & Signal Processing Engineer

Springfield, VA

No Clearance Requirement

Rail Technologies

Job Description

ENSCO’s Applied Technology and Engineering (ATE) Division designs, develops, and manufactures precision, high speed, real-time inspection systems for the national and international transportation market. Here at ATE, we believe innovation is the key to our success and growth, so we work diligently to advance our technologies and to incorporate state of the art academic research methods. We are encouraged to apply for internal and external research grants and to develop and improve our solutions to better serve customer needs. In addition, we also believe in the importance of a healthy work-life balance and provide competitive compensation and benefits.

We are presently seeking a skilled computer vision engineer with a background in 3D computer vision and point cloud processing who has a strong understanding of signal processing to join our engineering staff and work with software, electrical, and computer vision engineers in the design, development, and support of our track inspection and computer vision oriented applications and products.

Responsibilities will include:
• Design, develop, and test 3D vision and point cloud processing algorithms for railroad and transportation applications.
• Provide signal processing solutions for incorporating sensors into new inspection technologies
• Perform software design, coding, integration and testing for the development of real-time and large-scale measurement and analysis systems.
• Model system performance and response.
• Develop detailed technical specifications.
• Provide accurate time estimates for design and development work.
• Create and maintain detailed technical documentation for internal and customer use.
• Support existing products through system and software changes, improvements, testing and release.
• Conduct field tests and provide customer support/troubleshooting

Want to learn more about working for ENSCO Rail?
Click the below link or copy/paste in your browser to view the ENSCO Rail Careers & Culture Handbook:
https://bit.ly/2Opq1sw

Qualifications Required (Skills)

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, or related fields.
3 years’ relevant work experience.
Solid knowledge of 3D vision and point cloud processing.
Background knowledge of signal processing techniques.
Hands-on experience with 3D sensor interface and data formats.
Hands-on experience with 3D point filtering, feature extraction, and registration; 3D object segmentation, recognition, surface reconstruction, and visualization.
Proficiency in developing real-time software applications, using C++, for large scale computation.
Proficiency in algorithm prototyping and system modeling with MATLAB, Python, or other software.
Ability to perform system research, design, and analysis functions.
Ability to work independently and be self-motivated.
Excellent time management skills.
Excellent written and oral communications skills
Ability to climb a ladder 15 feet high to gain access to railway cars
Ability and willingness to travel up to 10% of the time

The selected candidate may be required to submit to fingerprinting, drug screening, and additional background investigations in connection with this position.

Wearing safety equipment (hardhat, steel-toe boots, protective vest and protective eyeglasses) when working on railroad properties is also a requirement. ENSCO will provide all necessary safety equipment.

Qualifications Desired

Master’s or PhD degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, or related fields
Experience developing 3D vision algorithm and software for railway or transportation related inspection applications
Experience in digital signal processing and filter design
Experience with GUI design and multi-thread programming in Qt
Competent knowledge and experience in applying and utilizing open source libraries and tools.
Competent knowledge and experience in distributed and scalable software design and development.
Experience with vision algorithm development and implementation on a GPU.
#LI-DM1

Req ID

1917BR

Internal Position Title

Software Engineer III

Employment Status

Regular Full-time

General Education/Years of Experience

BS or equiv; min 3 yrs relevant exp

U.S. Citizenship

No

Background Check Type

7 year

Drug Screen Type

None

Export Control and Licensing

This position may involve access to technology or technical data that is controlled under U.S. export control laws and regulations and the release of which to a foreign national may require an export license from the U.S. Government.

Contract Award Contingency

No

Recruiter

Deborah Morse

Division Description

ENSCO’s ATE Division is recognized globally as a leading provider of railway infrastructure inspection technology. Our products and services are provided to governments and railways in more than 12 countries on five continents. ENSCO work helps prevent train derailments and has a significant impact on the protection of human life, the environment and the economy.

Our team of more than 145 staff supports leading-edge technology projects in many exciting areas:
Sensor systems integration: inertial, positioning (GPS/RFID), laser scanners, imaging (line scan, area scan, thermal), ultrasonic, ground penetrating radar, LIDAR
Autonomous deployment of sensors, positioning systems and wireless communications on active rail cars to inspect railways
Machine vision algorithm development to detect conditions traditionally inspected by humans
Enterprise web-based data management systems to display, report and conduct big data analytics

ENSCO’s ATE Division is an exciting place to work and grow with many key benefits for technical staff, including:

“Innovation Fridays:” Staff is given time to create and experiment with new processes, best practices, and technologies in their field.
Involvement in all levels of the design and development process: Significant experience is gained that is not always available at larger companies that typically reserve serious engineering tasks for more seasoned staff.
Direct exposure to customer management, financial management and business development.

Working in ENSCO’s Rail Division provides a means to acquire a wide range of practical skills and experience in a short period of time, work on exciting and ground-breaking technology projects that impact transportation safety and offers domestic and international travel opportunities if desired.

ENSCO provides a stimulating, collaborative, multi-discipline environment with coworkers from diverse technical and cultural backgrounds working together to make the world a safer place. Come join a stable and growing company and experience the reward of seeing the results of your work make a real impact on solving some of the world’s most challenging problems.

Strength in Diversity

ENSCO, Inc. and its wholly owned U.S. subsidiaries are equal opportunity/affirmative action employers, committed to diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status, or any other protected characteristic under state or local law.",3.6,"ENSCO, Inc.
3.6","Springfield, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1969,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
77,Data Acquisition Engineer (SCADA/Web Backend),-1,"GameChange Solar is one of the fastest growing, most dynamic companies in the rapidly growing solar industry. We have top quality solar racking and tracker products that generate the most amount of energy, are the fastest to install, and the most cost effective.

The Data Acquisition Engineer will work in development to improve our framework for data acquisition and control of our fleet of 100's of MW of solar trackers. They will also develop tools for data processing and visualization to provide for new features for our products. This is an exciting opportunity for an engineer with experience in web design and SCADA who has solid communication skills.We offer a solid base with significant bonus upside for exceptional performance.

Roles and responsibilities include but will not be limited to:

· Develop a system for local SCADA interfacing

· Configure software suites to meet our system needs

· Develop custom applications to perform data acquisition and reporting

· Create user-friendly HMIs

· Work with engineering team to design and develop our back end for data acquisition and control

· Use machine learning techniques to improve system performance

Skills and Education:

· Experience with networks and SCADA

· Experience with backend web design

· Python, Google VM, Linux, Javascript/css/html Node, React, LabView

· Experience with Modbus, TCP, SSH, SFTP

· Knowledge of NEC, NERC, CIP, industry protocols (IEC-61850, DNP, Modbus, OPC), Ethernet systems, protocol analyzers, and industry SCADA practices

· Experience with SCADA integration software such as Kepware, Aggregate, Zenon

· Bachelor's Degree in Electrical Engineering with preferred emphasis in software, integration and automation, and industrial controls

· 2+ years experience in SCADA, industrial controls, or backend web design

· Strong Communication skills: Mastery of written and spoken English required

Salary DOE

Business Casual attire when in office setting.

PPE and GCS attire for onsite visits.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
SCADA: 2 years (Preferred)
Networks: 2 years (Required)
Backend Web Design: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
List a brief description of what we make
Company's website:
gamechangesolar.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.7,"GameChange Solar
2.7","Norwalk, CT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
78,Data Engineer,-1,"You can make a salary. Or you can make a difference. Or you can work as a Data Engineer at Herman Miller and make both.

About this Opportunity
As a Data Engineer, you'll move and integrate data across multiple disparate systems. You will clean, normalize, and aggregate Herman Miller corporate reporting and analytics. You'll also provide support to functional areas by acting as expert in tools and methods for accessing, analyzing, and reporting corporate data.

What You'll Do
You'll have opportunities to speak up, solve problems, lead others, and be an owner every day as you...
Assist end users in reporting and analysis tools.
Collaborate with Analytics and Business Teams to improve data models that feed business intelligence tools, increase data accessibility, and foster data-driven decision making across the organization.
Define company data assets (data models).
Design data integrations and data quality framework.
Develop and maintain scalable data pipelines and build out new API integrations to support continuing increases in data volume and complexity.
Implement processes and systems to monitor data quality, ensuring production data is always accurate and available for the key stakeholders and business processes that depend on it.
Perform data analysis to troubleshoot data-related issues and assist in the resolution of data issues.
Work closely with a team of Application Developers, Architects, and Analysts.
Work closely with all Business Units and Software teams to develop strategy for long-term data platform architecture.
Write unit/integration tests and document work.
Perform additional responsibilities as requested to achieve business objectives.
Sound Like You?
You might be just who we’re looking for if you have...
A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related technical field.
Fully proficient retail and online retail data engineering abilities, typically gained through five years of working with Python/Java, SQL, working schema design, and dimensional data modeling.
At least five years of experience, or and equivalent combination of education and experience.
Experience designing, building, and maintaining data processing systems.
Experience working with cloud services and cloud data warehouses.
Experience with Snowflake, Matillion, Tableau, Business Objectives, and Net Suite (desirable).
The ability to manage and communicate data warehouse plans to internal clients.
Expert knowledge of best practices and IT operations in an always-up, always-available service.
Experience with or knowledge of Agile Software Development methodologies.
Advanced problem-solving and troubleshooting skills with the ability to identify and solve complex business needs.
The ability to be process-oriented with great documentation skills.
Excellent oral and written communication skills with a keen sense of customer service.
The ability to perform all essential job functions of the position with or without accommodations.
Who We Are
At Herman Miller, our unique culture represents the collective attitudes, ideas, and experiences of the people who work here. We focus on protecting the environment, impacting our communities, exceeding the expectations of our customers through high quality products, and championing diversity in all areas of the business, and together we are on a journey toward a better world. We support the well-being of our employees in and outside of work by providing a variety of opportunities including award-winning work-life integration resources, development programs, complex health and wellness offerings, and much more.

Herman Miller is a globally recognized provider of furnishings and related technologies and services. Headquartered in West Michigan, we have relied on innovative design for over 100 years to solve problems for people wherever they work, live, learn, and heal.

Herman Miller is committed to diversity and inclusion. We are an equal opportunity employer including veterans and people with disabilities.

Apply Now!",3.8,"Herman Miller
3.8",United States,-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1905,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
79,Stability and Control Engineer - ERC,-1,"Job Description:

Stability and Control Engineer

The Stability and Control Engineer shall support the Air Force Seek Eagle Evaluation of Compatibility and Technical Advisory process by contributing to evaluating aircraft/store configurations to determine aircraft dynamic response and stability characteristics. The work performed will be in direct support to the Air Force Seek Eagle Office. The ideal candidate will be a strong team player with excellent communication skills accustomed to stability and control theory for aircraft. This position will require collaborative work as part of a larger team.

Must be able to work directly with contractor and Government personnel in a mixed badge environment to accomplish aircraft/weapons compatibility certifications.

Responsibilities:

Create, modify, and run computer simulation programs to perform linear, non-linear and stability and control analysis of aircraft structures

Conduct analyses, research data, run and edit computer simulation programs, and write justification to support flight certification recommendations

Plan and monitor flight tests, reduce flight test data, and integrate wind tunnel and flight test data to determine dynamic response and dynamic stability flight limits

Produce and maintain simulation algorithms and codes developed specifically for aircraft stability and control simulations including MATLAB, SIMULINK, and KESTRAL software

Document analyses and write justifications to support aircraft-store compatibility recommendations

Primary Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities

Working experience, internships or graduate research projects that provided experience in aircraft stability and control or aircraft flight dynamics

Advanced thinking and problem solving ability

Excellent interpersonal skills

Excellent written and oral communication skills

Very good attention to detail and a candidate who takes ownership and pride in all work

Strong analytical and organizational skills

Travel may be up to 25%

Education and Experience

Master's degree in Aeronautical, Aerospace, or Mechanical Engineering is highly desired; however, with the right experience a BS degree would be considered.

Entry-level and experienced candidates accepted

Security Clearance Requirements

Per contract requirements, must be a US Citizen, as you must be able to obtain a DoD SECRET Security Clearance.

Current clearance is desired",3.0,"ERC, Inc.
3.0","Eglin AFB, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
80,Data Analyst/Lead Collateral Analyst,$69k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"At FHLB Des Moines, we work each day to develop an inclusive culture that supports and leverages the complexity of a diverse workforce. This enables us to effectively serve the needs of our members and help them succeed.

Responsibilities/Duties/Function/Tasks:
Extract data from Bank systems and validate for accuracy.
Analyze collateral data received from members in order to create spreadsheets, reports, and perform research.
Maintain a controlled operating environment, perform first line of defense data analysis, process reviews, ensuring compliance with Bank policy, regulation and procedures.
Manage and report on Member and Financial Operations End User Computing Applications (EUCs), ensuring compliance with necessary controls as outlined in the Bank’s policies and procedures
Analyze and develop processes to ensure compliance with all regulations, policies, and procedures
Identify and implement efficiencies within processes to aide in prompt, accurate delivery of products and services to our members
Ensure written procedures align with Bank policies and controls
Support management in preparation and validation of reports and presentations for the Board of Directors, Management, Internal Audit, FHFA examinations and members as well as other information as needed
Provide excellent service to internal and external customers by responding to requests for service and choosing the appropriate method for communicating with members and co-workers
Manage departmental internal controls and regulatory issues
Ensure business activities are in line with Strategic Business Plans
Provide backup to the other Member and Financial Operations Collateral Analysts as needed
Perform other duties and projects as assigned
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in an accounting, finance, business or math-related fields or equivalent experience in a financial services field.
Experience with mortgage lending documentation (residential, commercial, and/or agricultural) a plus
Experience working with securities a plus
High attention to detail; inquisitive mind-set.
Strong verbal and written communications skills that promote effective working relationships in a team-oriented environment.
Strong organization and presentation skills.
Strong interpersonal skills and ability to interact effectively with customers, vendors and employees at all levels of the Bank
Strong computer skills, including proficiency using Microsoft Windows, Word, Excel and Visio.
Experience with business intelligence & visualization software such QlikView, Qlik Sense or similar is preferred
Solid understanding of business process flows, data sources and controls
Must be analytical and team-oriented, enthusiastic and able to work in a fast-paced environment
Excellent project management and multi-tasking skills
Ability to work independently.
Demonstrated ability to partner and build strong collaborative, trusting relationships.
Ability to positively engage, self-motivate and possess a strong desire to learn.
Manage, analyze, and recommend changes to processes and procedures within the Bank’s control framework, perform comprehensive mapping of business processes, while encompassing requirements of SOX controls, general controls, End User Computing Applications and Qliksense reports to ensure compliance with Bank policies, procedures and applicable regulations. Further improve the quality and strength of collaborative risk assessment initiatives for all controlled operating environments focusing on the reporting of numerous processes including, but not limited to member collateral, Muni Evaluations and pricing thus enabling a more synchronized approach for internal audits, external audits and regulatory exams.",3.4,"FHLB Des Moines
3.4","Des Moines, IA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1932,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
81,SCADA Engineer,$63k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a MES Scada Software Engineer at Design Group you will join a dynamic system integration and consulting company to provide cutting edge solutions to a wide range of industries. Our software engineers work on projects to provide SCADA and/or MES solutions to Fortune 100 companies in the Food and Beverage, Life Science, and Industrial market segments. The scope of work can include anything in the life cycle of a project starting from definition and selection of a platform to development/debugging and onsite startup. Frequently this team is working on first-of-a-kind solutions to solve real-world operational problems for our clients.
Responsibilities:
Working as an individual or in a team with other software engineers. Can also include working on large projects with other engineering disciplines such as greenfield design of a new manufacturing plant and all associated software system
Designing control/SCADA systems including databases and database interfaces, data analytics & reporting, scripting (VB, python, etc.) and general programming
Onsite startup of systems that you designed and implemented
Understanding project requirements in order to develop/configure industrial control packages accordingly for use in manufacturing space.
Understanding technical and operational constraints to create project development and commissioning plans.
Understanding of back-end computing infrastructure used in manufacturing (compute hardware, virtualization, OS’s, networking, databases, etc.) is a plus.
Managing multiple scopes of work in various phases simultaneously
Communicating with client stake holders to understand scopes of work and deliverables
Requirements:
3+ years of System Integration, SCADA and/or MES application development. Candidates with experience in the food and beverage or life science industries are preferred
Requires strong fluency in at least one of the following SCADA platforms: Ignition, Rockwell, Wonderware, or GE. Strong SQL skills are a plus
Requires excellent analytical and problem-solving skills.
Familiarity with Rockwell (ControlLogix, PLC5, SLC500) and Siemens PLC’s, PanelView HMI’s is a plus.
The ability to simultaneously organize and successfully execute multiple project responsibilities is needed.
Candidates must possess good communication and interpersonal skills, and the ability to interact with all levels of management, clients, and vendors. Contractor and Construction management skills are also a plus.
Willing and able to travel as necessary for project requirements to include but not be limited to: project installation and start-up activities, client meetings, company sponsored meetings, training's, industry related seminars, forums, or conventions, etc.
Education:
Bachelor of Science – Electrical Engineering or Computer Science/Engineering preferred or equivalent experience",3.6,"Design Group (MO)
3.6","Roseville, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
82,Software Systems Engineer,$76k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Farm Credit Mid-America, we believe people are our strongest asset. We are consistently looking to hire individuals from a wide range of experience and capabilities who have a desire to serve. Currently, we have over 1,400 employees across Indiana, Ohio, Kentucky and Tennessee.

We are looking for a passionate technology professional with experience implementing and administering enterprise software. An ideal candidate would have a strong technical aptitude and background encompassing a broad technical skillset.

Experience and/or knowledge in the following area(s) is a plus; database systems and data integration experience, .Net, MS SQL, Loan Origination Systems (LOS), Customer-relationship management (CRM) systems, IT Service Management software. Come join our team oriented, collaborative culture!

This position will be an enterprise software systems technical expert that works collaboratively with various team members in the administration, installation, configuration, customization and integration of association enterprise business applications (e.g. Loan Origination Systems, Customer Relationship Management (CRM) systems, Enterprise Content Management (ECM) systems, IT Service Management/Enterprise Service Management). Will serve as the escalation point of contact for enterprise software systems to aid in troubleshooting and problem resolution. This position will have the ability to create workaround procedures when standard procedures have failed and the knowledge to seek out appropriate internal and external resources when urgent problems arise to resolve issues in a timely fashion.

MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES :

Design, coordinate and perform the installation and configuration of complex enterprise software systems.
Proactive, efficient and accurate administration of enterprise software systems throughout all application environments. (E.g. Prod, Dev, Staging, DR). Coordinating upgrades and patches with other technology teams and business owners.
Document procedures for installation, upgrades, and customizations. Provide design expertise for system upgrades and application integration initiatives and projects.
Effective and timely problem solving, coordination and resolution of escalated support incidents.
Identifies and executes on opportunities for improvement in processes and technology. Stays abreast of technology trends and current business challenges. Applies technology to solve business problems and create a better customer experience (internal and external).
Perform day-to-day system administration, proactively monitor key enterprise systems for issues to avoid system downtime and enhance performance.
Build strong relationships with business partners, vendors and customers.
Anticipate and raise project, business, and technical issues to the appropriate resource(s).
Represent and communicate the mission and values of Farm Credit Mid-America and comply with its conduct policy, security policy and confidentiality expectations.
Performs other responsibilities as required.

MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS

Education and Experience

Bachelor's degree in computer science, business or related field; with at least one year experience supporting enterprise software applications; or a minimum of four years of direct experience in a software administration/software implementation role. Good project management skills, oral and written communication skills, and analytical skills necessary.

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES :

Key Competencies: integrity, motivational fit, problem solving, customer focus, teamwork, adaptability.

Knowledge of procedures and techniques as applicable to various enterprise technology components, configuration, administration and support of enterprise software systems, scripting and automation techniques, loan originations systems (LOS) customer relationship management (CRM) systems, SQL/Microsoft SQL Server; Farm Credit Mid-America financial services; enterprise content management (ECM) systems, software deployment and change management processes, Microsoft Windows server platform, Microsoft Windows Internet Information Services (IIS), C#/.NET framework.

Skills in enterprise software application implementation and administration; project management; communication and presentation skills; tact; verbal and written communication; analyzing and developing processes; Evaluation of software with recommendations for solutions to problems or use within association; complex problem solving.

Ability to exercise leadership and judgment within a team environment; complete tasks on a timely basis; analyze, evaluate and develop solutions to complex problems; be innovative, creative, objective and persuasive; work with both technical and business resources.

Here's What We Can Offer You...

Farm Credit Mid-America has an outstanding Total Rewards package, which includes, but is not limited to:

Salary commensurate with experience
15 vacation days, 15 sick days, and 11 paid holidays per year
401(k) plan with outstanding match
Medical, Dental, Vision, STD, LTD, Life/AD&D benefits, etc.
Fitness Incentive Program
Tuition assistance for employees and dependents.

Requirements of the job include the ability to do the work, with or without reasonable accommodations. It is the Association's policy to make reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities. Leadership retains the right to add, subtract or change duties of the position at any time.

Farm Credit Mid-America is an Equal Opportunity Employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, veteran status, disability or any other category protected by law.

IND123",3.7,"Farm Credit Mid-America
3.7","Louisville, KY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1985,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
83,Lead Data Platform Engineer,-1,"Job Description – Lead Data Platform Engineer*
\*
Effective Coverage is hiring! We are looking for a Lead Data Platform Engineer to be part of a cross-disciplinary, self-motivated team passionate about using data to form the future. This is a fantastic opportunity to get involved in a national, rapidly growing enterprise firm.

Our Data Engineers support critical business logic across a suite of robust services and scalable data processing jobs.

We focus on modularity and reuse where it makes sense, while ensuring that there are no constraints to delivering world-class software continuously.

The Lead Platform Engineer is a technology focused role for a hands-on coder who will have broad impact on the team and the engineering department. It is not a manager or a team lead role. Strong communication skills, adaptability and a collaborative mindset are key attributes we are looking for in a candidate.
\*
\*
Effective Coverage: *
Effective Coverage makes a significant, positive impact in the renters insurance community. We work with some of the largest apartment owners in the country to manage their renters insurance programs.

Our system retrieves large amounts of structured and unstructured data sets and uses scientific methods to extract information and make logical insights. We present those insights through a sophisticated, dynamic user interface which enables our clients to manage their resident risk profiles. The successful candidate will be a passionate coder who wants to make an impact. In this role, you have the opportunity to use data to help clients make sense of the future, while working with a diverse and dynamic group of professionals.
Your Duties: *
Develop features for compliance management platform on a small Agile team.
Consistently and frequently deliver solutions that are well-engineered, maintainable and tested within the agreed upon timeframe.
Participate in code reviews and sprint planning, help identify opportunities, work through challenges and share knowledge with colleagues.
Collaborate with the product team to understand business requirements.
Mentor and guide other software engineers.
Support critical business logic across a suite of robust services and scalable data processing jobs.
Requirements: *
Strong communication skills, adaptability and a collaborative mindset
3 years of experience as an engineer with dynamic and/or compiled programming languages
Very strong proficiency with relational databases, including modeling and performance optimization (we use MySQL and PostgreSQL, Aurora)
Professional experience using messaging queues and streaming technologies
SaaS models and cloud services preferably AWS
Proficiency developing in a Linux environment
Believer in Lean and Agile values and principles for building software
Strong attention to detail and quality
Comfortable working with engineers that are remote as well as from the local office
Perks: *
Competitive compensation; available Health and Dental Insurance, Health Savings Account, and a Simple IRA plan
A great atmosphere with a positive workplace culture
Flexible PTO and Time Off
Opportunities for paid training, mentorship, and coaching from leadership
Inclusive workplace culture
\*

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $75,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
dynamic and/or compiled programming languages: 3 years (Preferred)
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://www.effectivecoverage.com/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/EffectiveCoverage/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"Effective Coverage LLC
4.0","Latham, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Insurance Agencies & Brokerages,Insurance,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
84,Senior Software Engineer - React Native,$70k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"We're looking for experienced, talented and highly motivated software engineers to join our team. As a growth stage technology company, Clear Capital is seeking developers eager to be part of a team, working closely with every part of the company from graphic designers to our executive team.

What you’ll do
Write high quality, well-tested, extensible and scalable code
Evaluate the short- and long-term implications of every implementation decision
You’ll work with a tight-knit team solving tough problems by building quality enterprise solutions with a professional design and coding process
Learn from accomplished developers through mentoring and committed collaboration and take your dev chops to the next level
Make an immediate impact by quickly getting up to speed and building features from start to finish
Who we’re looking for
You are experienced in building offline first applications, leveraging geolocation information and have working knowledge of popular gaming and virtual reality frameworks
You love tackling really tough problems, and value the correct solution over a sloppy one
You have a passion for software development, with side projects to prove it
You understand the value of tested solutions, and you’re a capable debugger
You’re comfortable reading & writing code, and can describe what each part of the code is doing
You’re great at taking constructive feedback on your work
You’re passionate about our mission to disrupt how banks, lenders and investors value real estate
Our tool kit

We believe in using the most effective tool for the job, and also relying on the strengths of our team. While most of our engineers lean toward front- or back-end development, we encourage full-stack learning which makes our team nimble enough to tackle the diverse set of challenges we face. Here are the key technologies that we use:
Modern JavaScript
React Native, Redux, Reselect, React Native Elements
Popular gaming and virtual reality frameworks (Unity, Unreal, ARKit, ARCore)
Flexbox, CSS
Jest, React Native Testing Library
Xcode, Android Studio, Jenkins
Sentry
Git
Atlassian (Jira, Confluence, BitBucket)
Why you’ll love it
Disrupt the Real Estate data industry by bringing cloud based, enterprise software and data services to the market for big banks, lenders and investors
See your work move into production quickly, and avoid the bureaucracy that slows down larger companies
Enjoy a modern office layout that is quiet, yet collaborative surrounded by top quality engineers that enjoy working with each other
Receive great benefits like 401(k) match, and health benefits, PTO and paid holidays
Work with a growth oriented company that is transforming itself and an industry where you can have a real impact on the company's future
About Us

Clear Capital is the premier provider of real estate valuation, analytics, and technology solutions. Powered by its more than 45 years worth of information on nearly every U.S. metro, neighborhood, and property, Clear Capital’s solutions are trusted by community credit unions and billion-dollar financial institutions alike. Clear Capital is headquartered in Reno-Tahoe with a team of more than 500 nationwide, dedicated to going wherever it leads, and doing whatever it takes.

To all recruitment agencies: Clear Capital does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Clear Capital employees, or any other company location. Clear Capital is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.

Compensation

Salary commensurate with experience

Clear Capital is an equal opportunity employer",4.0,"Clear Capital
4.0","Reno, NV",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Real Estate,Real Estate,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
85,Engineer - Satellite Flight Software (Mid to Senior),$67k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Space Dynamics Laboratory (SDL) is seeking mid to senior level software engineers to develop innovative, high-quality solutions to support customers in various small satellite programs.

SDL, a University Affiliated Research Center, has been developing innovative technologies and solutions for cutting-edge DoD and intelligence programs for almost six decades. Our expertise is in space and airborne IR, VIS, UV, and RF sensors, small satellite technologies, test and calibration, cybersecurity, data visualization and assurance, and ground stations.

Key Responsibilities:

· Developing and testing embedded space flight software

· Leading other software engineers

· Supporting spacecraft component integration and test

· Preparing satellites for launch

· Supporting software development and integration for mission planning, spacecraft operation, and telemetry data processing systems

Required Qualifications:

· BS degree in computer science, computer engineering, electrical engineering or other related, technical field

· 5+ years’ experience in C/C++, embedded software development, and hardware interface/control

· Capable of leading and mentoring a team of software engineers

· Experience with hardware testing, debugging, and interfaces

· Demonstrated ability to follow rigorous software development processes including analysis, design, testing, peer review, and continuous integration techniques

· Work effectively both independently and within multi-disciplinary teams

· Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal

· Must be a US citizen and be able to obtain a US government security clearance

· Must be able to travel on occasion

Preferred Qualifications:

· Familiarity with Linux, driver development, network programming, and concurrency

· 10+ years’ experience

SDL Benefits:

At SDL, we take pride in and highly value our employees. SDL offers competitive salaries and a fantastic benefits package, including:

· Flexible work schedules

· Generous annual, sick, and holiday paid leave

· A variety of inexpensive-premium, high-quality health, dental, vision, and life insurance options

· Generous employer retirement contribution (Up to 14.2% of annual gross earnings)

· Discounted USU tuition of 50% for employees and dependents

· Access to USU facilities and USU staff privileges

Instructions to applicants:

Along with the online application, please attach:

1) Cover Letter

2) Resume

Once you've completed the initial application, you will receive an e-mail requesting you to complete a video digital interview. For more information, please visit: https://hirevue.secure.force.com/E2Candidate/?lang=en_US

Please contact us if you do not receive a confirmation email within 24 hours of applying.

AA/EOE",4.5,"Space Dynamics Laboratory
4.5","Logan, UT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1959,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
86,Shift Process Engineer l,$62k-$68k (Employer Est.),"Toray Plastics (America), Inc., is a subsidiary of the Japan-basedToray Group, which manufactures synthetic fibers, carbon fibers, plastics, and chemicals and employs more than 45,000 people in 26 countries. Annual sales exceed US$21 billion.

TPA’s films businesses in Rhode Island and foams division in Virginia are global leaders and provide innovative products that are used worldwide for consumer and industrial applications. TPA is committed to environmental, social, and corporate governance. Learn more by visitingwww.toraytpa.com.

We currently have an opportunity for aProcess Engineer (Shift). This role supports the manufacturing process using engineering skills to assess, manage, implement, improve or revise processes, with the goal of improving efficiency of operation, safety and the consistency of product quality. Develops procedures that facilitate the adoption of standardized processes that support future expansion. Monitors the effectiveness of processes and quantifies results and presents findings to management. Prepares detailed reports and analysis for use by management in measuring overall production efficiency.

Requirements:
Assesses and documents existing processes. Implements and evaluates changes to existing processes designed to enhance productivity, safety or product quality. Develops new processes as required.
Develops and maintains process documentation systems ensuring that processes and procedures are clearly stated, in the correct format and can be accessed with minimal difficulty.
Monitors daily production, collecting and analyzing data in order to recognize trends and potential problem areas. Develops proactive approach to problem solving through the early identification and understanding of problem areas.
Utilizes recognized statistical process control techniques and other measurement tools to develop, maintain and present required reports detailing the effectiveness of existing processes or supporting the need for the introduction of new processes/procedures.
Interfaces with engineering, production, quality control and other associated areas in defining and developing required processes.
Interacts with customers to provide technical service of products.
Interacts closely with new product development group to assist in implementation and scale up of new products on the production lines.
Qualifications:
B.S. in Chemical or Mechanical Engineering
0-2 years of practical work experience in Chemical or Mechanical Engineering
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Note: This is a rotating 12-hour shift position.

Toray Plastics (America), Inc. is committed to the principles of equal employment opportunity and prohibits discrimination based on any protected status, workplace harassment/bullying and retaliation for filing a complaint or providing information related to a complaint. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, pregnancy (including childbirth, lactation and medical-related conditions), age (40 and over), national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, genetic information (including testing and characteristics), veteran status or any other consideration protected by federal, state or local laws.

It is the policy of Toray Plastics (America) Inc. to maintain a work environment that is safe for all persons, including the community, and conducive to attaining high work standards. To achieve these objectives, we are committed to maintaining a drug, tobacco and alcohol-free workplace and perform pre-employment testing.",3.8,"Toray Plastics (America) Inc.
3.8","North Kingstown, RI",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1985,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
87,Senior Software Engineer,-1,"Overview:

Who is Virgin Pulse?

Virgin Pulse, founded as part of Sir Richard Branson’s famed Virgin Group, helps organizations build employee health and wellbeing into the DNA of their corporate cultures. As the only company to deliver a powerful, mobile-first digital platform infused with live services, including coaching and biometric screenings, Virgin Pulse’s takes a high-tech-meets-high-touch-approach to engage employees in improving across all aspects of their health and wellbeing, every day – from prevention and building a healthy lifestyle to condition and disease management to condition reversal, all while engaging users daily in building and sustaining healthy habits and behaviors. A global leader in health and wellbeing, Virgin Pulse is committed to helping change lives and businesses around the world for good so that people and organizations can thrive, together. Today, more than 3100 organizations across the globe are using Virgin Pulse’s solutions to improve health, employee wellbeing and engagement, reduce costs and create strong workplace cultures.

Who are our employees?

At Virgin Pulse we’re passionate about changing lives for good. We want to make a difference in the world by helping people be healthy so they can perform at their best, every day, at work and home. Our award-winning solutions support leading employers in improving and simplifying the employee health and wellbeing journey and engaging people in all aspects of their health. But our world-class products and programs are nothing without our people – the employees who design, build, promote, sell, test and perfect the latest innovations in workplace health and wellbeing. Our people are our top priority and we invest in their health and happiness. At Virgin Pulse, we have so much more than a strong, supportive company culture – have a shared vision for a healthier, happier world.

Responsibilities:

Who you are.

As a Senior Software Engineer at Virgin Pulse you will be working on a Digital Health SaaS platform that supports millions of engaged, active members in 20 languages across 190 countries, serving over 50 billion+ API calls every year to mobile and desktop users. As a Senior Software Engineer at Virgin Pulse you will be working with a passionate and strong team of engineers, product managers and UX Designers. With your strong background in cloud technologies and software architecture you will have the opportunity to develop, manage and optimize our tech stack and production pipelines. This work might include projects like building out new customer facing features, creating the APIs for new capabilities, data integration from our customers or partners, developing new strategies for managing our product stack or optimizing existing code to make it more performant. We are looking for someone with an appetite for growth and we offer the opportunity to learn directly from our highly skilled group of engineers.

You offer strength in production-ready code in Java, .Net or Kotlin using strong analytical skills. We value the desire and ability to learn quickly but familiarity with Angular and the AWS ecosystem would be a plus. Excellent problem-solving abilities, strong communication skills, and the desire and ability to self-start and time-manage in a fast-paced environment will set you up for success in our team.

What your typical day looks like.

Delivering production ready code in Java and Kotlin
Design, develop and deploy backend services with focus on high availability, low latency and scalability
Monitor, test, and continuously optimize your designs
Provide technical leadership and coaching to the more junior team members to enable them to build better software.
Master our development process, culture and code base, then think of ways to improve it and implement within our team.
Take operational responsibility for the services that are owned by your team, potentially including taking part in off hour calls with systems support team
Qualifications:

What you bring to the team.

In order to represent the best of what we have to offer you come to us with a multitude of positive attributes including:

Fluency in Java and/or .Net
4 or more years of experience developing services and APIs
A solid understanding of best practices for software development including testing, monitoring, and design
Desire to go beyond the functional solution to build maintainable and well tested code
A desire to partner closely with product managers to refine the product
Ability to articulate and champion design strategies related to scalability, maintainability, performance, security and usability.

What makes you stand out.

Experience with highly scalable systems in an AWS ecosystem
Experience with some of the tools in our tech stack, particularly Spring Boot, Cassandra, PostgreSQL and/or Elasticsearch
Experience with Continuous Integration and Continuous Delivery technologies like Maven, TeamCity, Ansible, Harness, Terraform, or similar.

Security Competencies:

Work to maintain system and data security at a high standard, ensuring the confidentiality, integrity and availability of the Virgin Pulse application is not compromised. Adhere to industry best practice coding standards and verify all code developed at Virgin Pulse is free from bugs and security vulnerabilities (OWASP/CWE).

Why work here?

We believe a career should provide competitive pay and benefits, a collaborative and supportive work environment, strong employee culture and cutting-edge technology and services — so many reasons to love it here.
We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to any protected class status.",-1,VirginPulse,"Minneapolis, MN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
88,Senior Data Engineer,$95k-$174k (Glassdoor Est.),"Brain Corp is a San Diego-based AI company creating transformative core technology for the robotics industry. Our diverse engineering teams in Software, Hardware Design, and Embedded Systems are creating comprehensive solutions to support the builders of today's autonomous machines in successfully producing, deploying, and supporting commercial robots across industries and applications. Brain Corp is funded by the SoftBank Vision Fund and Qualcomm Ventures. For more information please visit: https://www.braincorp.com/

Position Summary:

As a member of the Software Engineering team, the Senior Data Engineer owns the definition, execution, and delivery of technical architecture for Brain Corporation's Product Analytics team. Your work will improve the quality, reliability, accuracy, and consistency of our data. You will help build project-specific data pipelines and validation tools. You will have a hands-on role with product specialists and be responsible for working with them to understand data requirements and then implement those requirements in software.

Duties and Responsibilities:
Fully own critical portions of Brain Corporation's product analytics data model.
Collaborate with stakeholders to understand needs, model tables using data warehouse best practices, and develop data pipelines to ensure the timely delivery of high-quality data.
Work with technical and product stakeholders to understand data-oriented project requirements.
Write code that is understandable, simple, and easy to maintain.
Design, implement and ensure the accuracy of validation and related services for data models.
Think and work agile, including automated testing, continuous integration and deployment.
Manage numerous requests concurrently and strategically, prioritizing when necessary.
What you need:
Bachelor's in Computer Science or other related field.
5-8+ years software development experience.
Passionate about data quality and delivering effective data to impact the business.
Experience with sourcing and modeling data from application REST-like APIs.
MPP/Cloud data warehouse solutions (Snowflake, etc).
Proficiency in SQL, experience writing ETLs.
Proficiency in JavaScript/Node.js, Python, or willingness to translate experience in equivalent language.
Things that make a difference:
Master's in Computer Science or other related field.
Experience with Kafka, AMQP or other message bus.
OpenAPI/Swagger.
Express.js, NestJS.
SAML, OKTA.
Azure experience is a plus.
Being comfortable outside of your comfort zone - explore new tech, make your own tool, or find a new way to address an old problem.
Physical Demands:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Essential functions may require maintaining the physical condition necessary for sitting, walking or standing for periods of time; operating a computer and keyboard; talk and hear at normal room levels; using hands to finger, grasp, and feel; repetitive motion; close visual acuity to prepare and analyze data and figures; transcribing; viewing a computer terminal; extensive reading; lift, push, carry, or pull up to 10 pounds.

Work Environment:

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. The noise level in the work environment is usually quiet to moderate. Employee is exposed to the typical office environment with computers, printers and telephones.",3.6,"Brain Corp
3.6","San Diego, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
89,Industrial IoT System Integration Developer / Engineer,-1,"Industrial IoT System Integration Developer / Engineer*
BID Group*
Location: South Eastern US*
The BID Group of Companies is a North American leader in the design, manufacture and support of World Class equipment, services and turnkey solutions for the solid wood processing industry. BID Group serves primarily the North American market and offers the most comprehensive range of products available, producing everything from mechanical equipment and control systems to optimization systems equipped with digital machine vision and AI technology. The company integrates its products & technology to deliver fully automated production lines. BID Group has over 1500 employees working in our many divisions located around North America.

The OPER8 offering is an Industrial Internet of Things (IoT) platform with custom BID-designed architecture centered around PTC ThingWorx that connects to operations and business/IT data sources and orchestrates the data to drive efficiency, reliability, and uptime in our customer’s operations through the use of data visualization, data analytics, and custom IoT applications.

The Industrial IoT System Integration Developer / Engineer is a highly motivated professional working with the OPER8 team. As a key member of the team, the successful candidate will be responsible for designing, developing, and deploying various end to end production, throughput, asset health and quality control solutions for our customers. The successful candidate must be technically inclined and willing and able to learn new technologies as they are required. We’re a small but growing team of highly motivated professionals that feed on results. We strive to create a fun, flexible and rewarding work environment.

Responsibilities Include:
Deploying data connectivity software and customized Edge programming on-premise.
Working extensively with the cloud based IIoT platform to deploy and develop offerings.
Configuring cloud databases.
Building and QA of queries for KPI development and dashboarding.
Preparing design documentation for technical and non-technical audiences.
Contributing to the product development team by staying up to date on disruptive, breakthrough technologies and processes.
Working closely with customer reliability engineers, data analysts, electrical/automation groups, and management.
Ensuring customer satisfaction and foster loyalty to the BID Group.
Skills and Qualifications
Background and/or education in one of the following: electrical or software engineering or computer science or 4+ years of relevant work experience.
2+ years of experience with programming languages: Javascript, Python, Java, C or Shell.
2+ years of experience with databases is required: TSDBs, SQL variants or Mongo, TICK stack experience preferred.
Familiarity with communication protocols and web standards: HTTP, Websocket, REST, RPC, KepServerEx, CIP, OPC, Ethernet/IP, MQTT.
Understanding of OOP or other programming models: composition, inheritance, polymorphism, async, flow inversion of control.
Allen Bradley ControlLogix system knowledge is beneficial, but training is provided as required.
PTC ThingWorx knowledge is beneficial, but training is provided as required.
IT/computer networking skills are an asset: LANs, subnets, troubleshooting communication issues.
Methodical, able to pay close attention to detail, and possess excellent communication skills.
Flexibility in learning new technologies, often independently and under pressure.
Able to work independently and be results driven.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
This Job Is:
A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to apply
A “Fair Chance” job (you or the employer follow Fair Chance hiring practices when performing background checks)
A job for which all ages, including older job seekers, are encouraged to apply
A job for which people with disabilities are encouraged to apply
Company's website:
www.bidgroup.ca
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.9,"BID Group Technologies, US Inc
2.9",South Carolina,-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
90,Senior Systems and Data Security Engineer,-1,"Senior Systems and Data Security Engineer *
Principal Duties and Responsibilities*
Responsible for the design, test, operation and implementation of secure operating systems, networks, and database products.

Principal Duties and Responsibilities

• Responsible for performing all analysis, engineering, and solution development necessary to ensure the safety of information, systems assets and to protect systems and data from intentional or inadvertent access or destruction.

• Responsible for using current information security technology disciplines and practices to ensure the confidentiality, integrity and availability of Army information assets in accordance with established DoD, Army, and industry standards and procedures.

• Develops and maintains knowledge base on changing regulatory, threat, and technology landscapes to continually develop or maintain security policies and standards, and ensure compliance throughout the Army enterprise related to the Army metering program.
Skills and Experience Requirements: *
• Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent.

• Minimum of 0-10 plus years of work related experience.

• In depth understanding of cyber security policy and tools, threat mitigation, network topologies, intrusion detection, PKI, operational technology, control systems and secured networks.

• DoD 8570/8140 IAT Level III certifications required

• Ability to clearly present and communicate technical approaches and findings.

• US Citizenship required; Ability to obtain and maintain DoD SECRET Security Clearance

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Security Clearance Required:
Confidential (Required)
Company's website:
www.cmadvancedtech.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/cmadvancedtech/",-1,CM Advanced Technologies,"Huntsville, AL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
91,Senior Systems Engineer - Server Virtualization - Active TS w/ SCI eligibility required,$56k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Travel Required: 10-25%
Public Trust: None
Requisition Type: Regular

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

Our federal customer offers an opportunity for talented, motivated individuals to support systems used at the highest levels of the executive government. The ideal candidates will be motivated, self-starters with great communications skills. Design virtual storage clusters and physical-to-virtual conversion of servers. Design the environment for High-Availability and Data Recovery. Create virtual machine templates, resource pools and assignment of shares. Assist with development of disaster recovery plans.

Responsibilities & Skills:

Design virtual storage clusters and physical-to-virtual conversion of servers.

Design the environment for High-Availability and Data Recovery.

Create virtual machine templates, resource pools and assignment of shares.

Assist with development of disaster recovery plans.

Work with Storage Area Networks (SANs), Network Attached Storage (NAS), and Direct Attached Storage (DAS)

Work with both VMWare and Hyper-V virtualization technologies.

Work with Windows Server architecture.

Qualifications & Requirements:

BS in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering, Mathematics, or other related scientific or technical discipline is required.

MS in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering or other related disciplines preferred.

DoD 8140 compliance required.

Position requires three to eight years of relevant experience supporting projects of similar size, scope and complexity.

Relevant experience can be substituted for education.

Position requires an active TS with SCI eligibility.

Clearance Requirements:

Current Top Secret security clearance with SSBI conducted within the last 51 months is required.

Required: VMWare management/ administration experience. DOD 8570-compliant cert (Sec+, CISSP, etc)

#GDITpriority

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
92,Radar System Analysis Engineer,-1,"*Radar System Analysis Engineer* SEG is seeking a Radar System Analysis Engineer to be part of a team providing support for U.S. Surface Navy (e.g. Aegis Baseline) programs and Missile Defense Agency (MDA) Ballistic Missile Defense System (BMDS) projects *Responsibilities*: * Characterize sensor performance against threat ballistic and cruise missiles through modeling, simulation and analysis using digital simulations. * Develop, integrate and use analytical models and tools to test new threat data and software products, assess system capability, and drive system requirements and design. * Define technical approach and plan studies based on understanding of engineering community and appreciation of customer need. Define study measures of performance and effectiveness, design experiments, and demonstrate analytical skills. Conduct individual analyses, and contribute to team technical studies. * Communicate with external customer and internal technical staff, via correspondence and briefings. * Support technical leadership for internal project and contribute in external customer forums. * Author technical details of statements of work * A majority of the work is based out of our Columbia, MD office. Travel is occasionally required to participate in technical forums and reviews. * Local travel anticipated at 10 percent and occasional overnight trips at 5 percent time. *Required Skills: * * Ability to obtain and maintain a US DoD SECRET clearance * Bachelor’s Degree: Systems Engineering, Electrical, Physics, Applied Math or related technical degree. * 5-7 years work experience * Systems engineering experience * Experience with sensors, seekers, or remote sensing in RF and IR bands. * Strong analytical skills * Programming and scripting experience in a Linux environment * Communication, documentation and briefing via Microsoft office products (Outlook, Powerpoint, Excel, Word) *Desired Qualifications: * * Active US DoD SECRET or TOP SECRET Security Clearance * Masters or PhD degree preferred with relevant research project experience * MATLAB for the visual display of quantitative information, and prototyping M&S codes * Python for modeling and simulation development, data analysis, etc. * Facility working with C++ API and creating test drivers * Self-starter – Demonstrate independent ownership of tasking. Position affords opportunity to define path and lead tasks based on technical understanding of engineering community and appreciation of customer needs * Modeling and analysis experience and capability in one or more of the following areas: * RF Sensors / EO-IR Imaging / Remote Sensing Systems – Signal Processing, Detection and Track Filtering * Multi-Sensor Data Fusion, Target Classification and Discrimination (Machine Learning / AI applications) * Missile Systems (Aerodynamic, Ballistic, Space) * Defense Weapon System Performance (e.g. Navy Surface systems, Ballistic Missile Defense systems) * Ground Test and Field Test Events (missile flight and sensor track pre-event prediction and post-mission assessment) * Familiarity with version-control (Git), issue tracking (JIRA), collaboration software (Confluence), and cross-language software integration tools (SWIG). * Familiarity with high-performance computing environments *Systems Group Overview: * * Candidate will be part of a team responsible for weapon system simulation and performance analysis. The team develops and integrates individual system models for analysis (threats, weapons, sensors) to include multiple interacting systems. This team contributes to defining, leading and performing analyses for requirements feasibility, sensitivity studies for threat variability and fidelity, asset planning and what-if scenarios, flight-test mission (requirements, planning, and analysis) support and certification efforts. * The group provides independent verification and validation support for internal system-level products. This offers opportunities to work with SEG sensors, vehicles, phenomenology products and engineers integrated within our simulation software development environment to view the battle environment scenes through the eyes of combat systems. * The group includes subject matter experts and technical leads providing direct technical support to various defense programs as a contributing member of broad cross-functional and technical subject-specific integrated product teams. * We bring threat and weapons knowledge together to support concept definition, threat driver assessments, system requirements, design reviews, test planning, and defining road maps for future development *Company Overview* Systems Engineering Group, Inc. (SEG) is a highly regarded and leading provider of missile systems engineering and analysis. Principal customers include the U.S. Navy, Missile Defense Agency, AEGIS Ballistic Missile Defense Program, and Program Executive Offices for Integrated Warfare Systems and Ships. SEG is headquartered in Columbia, MD and is convenient to routes 32, 29, and 95. SEG is a wholly owned subsidiary of Telephonics Corporation. SEG provides excellent benefits, work environment and outstanding growth opportunities. We are an Affirmative Action / Equal Employment Opportunity Employer (M/F/D/V). All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, gender, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status or any other protected characteristic. Reasonable accommodations may include but are not limited to that which may enable individuals with disabilities and special disabled veterans to perform the essential functions of this position. Job Type: Full-time Benefits: * 401(k) * 401(k) matching * Dental insurance * Flexible spending account * Health insurance * Life insurance * Paid time off * Referral program * Tuition reimbursement * Vision insurance Schedule: * Monday to Friday Experience: * systems engineer: 5 years (Required) Education: * Bachelor's (Required) License: * Secret Clearance (Preferred) This Company Describes Its Culture as: * Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused * Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture * Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative Benefit Conditions: * Waiting period may apply Work Remotely: * No",-1,Systems Engineering Group,"Columbia, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Commercial Equipment Repair & Maintenance,"Construction, Repair & Maintenance",Less than $1 million (USD),-1
93,Senior-Level Software Engineer / PHP Programmer,$77k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"Our fast-growing company with major clients in an exploding and innovative industry has openings for full-time, experienced PHP application developer to work on a variety of projects.
Candidate will be able to learn our proprietary content-delivery framework as well as our client facing MVC framework, and create highly functional pages for both administrative control and personalized end-user delivery on a robust platform serving millions of users.
This is a career-growth position for the right individual; join our team of programmers and engineers and you will be exposed to a variety of applications with the opportunity to ""learn up"" into a system-owner or management role. Your appetite for information and attention to detail will allow you to master the existing code base and learn our complex business.
The ideal candidate will have at least 6 years of software engineering experience in a fast-paced environment dealing with complex systems. Excellent communication skills are required, as is an ability to learn quickly.
Immediate Responsibilities:
Work with the AFS proprietary MVC framework and CMS housing our Loyalty programs
Design and develop efficient and scalable and responsive front-end and back-end solutions
Write secure code nullifying XSS, SQL injection and other threats
Ability to juggle between different time sensitive tasks
Work with a Linux environment for website and access and error logs
Capacity to debug and troubleshoot legacy code bases
Understand existing data models, backend data processes, platform architecture and inbound/outbound file processing
Learn and adhere to our system standard architecture/framework
Work with Account Associates, Ops Managers and Quality Analysts for client requests and inquiries
Handle code reviews for security and best practice purposes
Team player and junior developer mentorship
Off-hour support and work as needed
Technical Requirements and Skills:
Very strong coding with PHP 7
Strong understanding of the object-oriented design and programming paradigm
Proficiency with RESTful API web services
Ability to write and optimize complex SQL queries
Familiarity with HTML5, CSS3, JavaScript, jQuery and Ajax
Strong understanding with XSS and SQL injection preventions
Comfortable to work on a Linux environment
Strong grasp of the MVC framework paradigm
Strong Git code repo and management skills
Follow industry coding and release standards
Experience with SSO using SAML 2.0 but not required
Experience working with project management tools like Jira
Critical and analytical thinking
Excellent communication skills
Qualifications:
Bachelors degree or higher in Computer Science or related discipline
At least 6 years’ experience of Web Development.
The candidate must be able to work in our NY office daily",3.2,"Affinity Solutions
3.2","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
94,Senior Software Engineer II -,$95k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tabula Rasa Healthcare– TRHC is a family of companies that leverages technology to improve healthcare. TRHC works with providers and insurers to identify multi-drug interactions and to reduce risk of medication-related problems. We have developed the first multi-drug interaction tool that identifies risk across a variety of safety factors and presents meaningful opportunities to mitigate that risk. This technology can be used to assess safety at the individual patient-level or to stratify medication risk at the population-level, and can be embedded within any EMR or other healthcare IT system.

A Tabula Rasa Healthcare Co., CareKinesis, is looking for a telented and experienced Senior Software Engineer to contribute to our cloud-based medication Risk Mitigation Platform The candidates selected for these roles will work together with a Scrum team to take requirements through the development lifecycle and transform into high quality, valuable deliverables. As a Senior Software Engineer II, he or she will take a paramount role as a tech lead in cultivating technical guidance, architecture, best practices as well as assisting the team and growth through mentorship. He or she will also be a key member in the overall assessment, vision, and implementation of our technical decisions by participating in cross-team committees.

Location: Mount Pleasant, SC

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Function as a tech lead in an agile environment developing on both full-stack Javascript applications / services as well as a Rails Core application in our EOM Platform. (Node.js, Angular.js, React.js, Ruby, Rails preferably on a UNIX or Linux platform)
Participation and ownership in all stages of development process: requirements, design, implementation, testing, deployment, and support.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Perform challenging work in designing, writing, editing, modifying, and debugging software applications and services.
Participation in cross-team architecture, design, process discussions and decisions within established committees.
Self-motivated with the ability to design and write high-performance, reliable, and maintainable code.
Learn new technologies and resolve challenges involved with integrating them with our infrastructure.
Update and modify systems to improve efficiency.
Work closely with Product Team in evaluating current systems and making decisions on future development.
Developing, testing and documenting RESTful APIs; with event-driven design patterns utilizing message queues; with SQL and/or NoSQL data stores; with designing, developing and deploying distributed systems.
Comfortable with large projects in source control (git), continuous integration (Jenkins) and writing unit tests and integration tests.
Design, develop and implement solutions around both a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
REQUIREMENTS:

Education:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study, or related practical experience.
M.S. in Computer Science or similar technical field of study(preferred)
Experience:
10+ of professional software development experience.
Expertise in two or more general purpose programming languages.
Preferred Experience in Healthcare Technology and/or Pharmacy Operations.
Preferred Experience with EHRs, integrations, system validations (EPIC, Cerner, QS/1, etc.).
Interest and ability to learn other coding languages and technologies as needed.
Knowledge of e-prescribing standards certifications a plus. (Meaningful Use, FHIR)
Familiarity with ontologies such as SNOMED, RxNorm, LOINC, ICD-10, NDC a plus
Qualifications:
Ideal candidates must be innovative, creative, flexible and be passionate about building quality software.
Ability to architect, design, develop and implement solutions around a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
Highly skilled in written and verbal communication.
Has exceptional initiative and follow-through on projects with minimal supervision or guidance.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Establishes and maintains effective working relationships with clients, end-users, and team members.
Experience using platform provided tools preferred (Docker, Cloud Foundry, AWS, NewRelic, Sentry).
Experience with performance optimization, especially the use of asset pipelines and CDNs, as well as tools used to analyze front end performance bottlenecks.
Preferred experience with database re-factoring and decomposing existing systems from a monolith to a micro-services architecture.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
Fast paced environment.
Collaboration across remote sites within the company.
New office located on Shem Creek.
Flexibility to work remote when warranted.
Office health and wellness initiatives, for those interested. (on-site private shower)
Celebrating success!
#DICE",4.4,"CareKinesis
4.4","Mount Pleasant, SC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
95,"Sr. Mechanical Engineer - Engine Installation (Excavator, AG & AWP)",-1,"ABOUT US: ZOOMLION, a leading player in the global engineering machinery industry is growing and has positions available at Zoomlion North America's engineering research and development center in Yorkville, Wisconsin.

If you are looking for a challenging opportunity to share and expand your skills, consider joining Zoomlion North America’s creative, innovative and collaborative team, where we live these concepts….every day. Our R & D Center in Yorkville, Wisconsin is a great place to become globally connected in a multi-cultural team driven environment.

Here at Zoomlion, we are looking for the most qualified applicants who are inspired by the opportunity to create innovative technology driven solutions for a global market.

YOUR RESPONSIBILITIES:

Perform engineering duties in planning, designing and analysis tools, structural design and other mechanically functioning equipment (excavator, agriculture, MEWP). This includes direct involvement in all related design activities and engagement with cross-functional support staff to ensure project goals are met. Evaluate products, parts or processes for cost efficiency and reliability and work with other members of the engineering staff in a team environment to ensure that production is completed per project plan and timely.

Perform simple and complicated hand calculations and/or analyses.

Read and interpret blueprints, technical drawings, schematics, or computer-generated reports.

Research, design, evaluate, install, operate, and maintain mechanical products, equipment, systems and processes to meet requirements, applying knowledge of engineering principles.

Collaborate with engineers or other personnel as appropriate regarding any essential engineering functions and to implement operating procedures, resolve system malfunctions, or provide technical information and/or assistance.

Recommend design modifications to eliminate machine or system malfunctions.

Conduct research that tests or analyzes the feasibility, design, operation, or performance of equipment, components, or systems.

Investigate equipment failures and difficulties to diagnose faulty operation, and to make recommendations to maintenance crew.

Develop and test models of alternate designs and processing methods to assess feasibility, operating condition effects, possible new applications and necessity of modification.

Develop, coordinate, or monitor all aspects of production, including selection of manufacturing methods, fabrication, or operation of product designs.

Specify system components or direct modification of products to ensure conformance with engineering design and performance specifications.

Research and analyze customer design proposals, specifications, manuals, or other data to evaluate the feasibility, cost, or maintenance requirements of designs or applications.

Write performance requirements for product development or engineering projects.

Provide feedback and guidance to design engineers on customer problems or needs.

Apply engineering principles or practices to emerging fields, new technologies and engineering concepts and practices.

Study industrial processes to determine where and how application of equipment can be made.

Design test control apparatus or equipment or develop procedures for testing products.

REQUIREMENTS:

Bachelor's Degree (four-year college or technical school) Required, Field of Study: Mechanical Engineering or related field

5 plus years of experience in Mechanical Engineering or related field Previous experience in Construction, Heavy Industrial, AG equipment

2 plus years of experience in Root Cause Analysis and 6 Sigma Tools.

Office Suite (Outlook, Word, Excel, PowerPoint, SharePoint, etc.) CAD software, Siemens NX preferred, Pro-E/Creo, ANSYS, Matlab, MathCAD Familiar with: Industrial engineering standards (ISO, ASME, SAE, ASABE, etc.) and Complex manufacturing processes Critical decision-making skills ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:

• Zoomlion NA offers competitive pay and benefits.

• Job location is Yorkville, Wisconsin

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Relocation assistance
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Mechanical Engineering: 5 years (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
zoomlion-na.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",2.7,"Zoomlion Heavy Industry NA, Inc.
2.7","Franksville, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Research & Development,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
96,Data Engineer,$76k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking multiple Data Engineers to support a new requirement in/around Springfield, VA. The selected candidates may be required to deploy forward up to 10% of the time into operational areas or other remote sites.

Responsibilities include:
Responsible for extracting, loading, and transforming a variety of data types, formats, and sources in order to cultivate accessible relational, document store, and graph databases
Develops logical and physical data models, database creation, data optimization, and implementation
Work side-by-side data scientist to make use of the collected data
Deploy sophisticated analytics programs, machine learning, and statistical models
Document all work in a code base, and other Install, Operations, and Maintenance artifacts per government direction
Basic Qualifications:
Requires in-depth knowledge of distributed systems, computer science, programming, and mathematics. Works with warehouses across multiple databases; responsible for developing table schemas
Ability to manage and organize data while identifying trends and inconsistencies that will impact government missions
Experience preparing data for predictive and prescriptive modeling; uses data to discover tasks that can be automated; delivers updates to stakeholders based on analytics
Experience/certifications in Mongo DB, Python, Cypher Query Language, R, Apache Spark / Hadoop, Linux, ETL, data warehouse, data modeling, and MS Azure, and Amazon Web Services
Experience adhering to Information Technology processes, polices, and procedures for entering changes and new products into the production environment
Experience in cloud, containerization, indexing, scaling databases, and graph analysis to build in automation, efficiency, and implementation of security controls
Desired Skills:
Prior experience supporting US Special Forces
Prior deployment to OCONUS locations
AWS and/or Azure certifications
Security Clearance Requirements:
Active TS/SCI security clearance required
Willing to undergo polygraph examination
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5","Springfield, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
97,Data Engineer,$83k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"• 5-8 years in Microsoft application development.

• Development experience in Cosmos. (Datapipeline development experience is highly preferred)

• Performance tuning experience in Cosmos.

• Strong experience in C#, ASP.NET, ADO.Net, Web API development.

• Experience in Azure data factory (ADF), Azure Data Bricks, Azure Data Lakes

• Ability to provide technical solutions to client and ability to resolve technical complexities.
hcl\_ers *
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available:
No: Not providing sponsorship for this job
Company's website:
www.hcltech.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.5,"HCL America Inc
3.5","Redmond, WA",-1,10000+ Employees,1991,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
98,Senior Software Engineer - EOM,-1,"Tabula Rasa Healthcare– TRHC is a family of companies that leverages technology to improve healthcare. TRHC works with providers and insurers to identify multi-drug interactions and to reduce risk of medication-related problems. We have developed the first multi-drug interaction tool that identifies risk across a variety of safety factors and presents meaningful opportunities to mitigate that risk. This technology can be used to assess safety at the individual patient-level or to stratify medication risk at the population-level, and can be embedded within any EMR or other healthcare IT system.

A Tabula Rasa Healthcare Co., CareKinesis, is looking for a talented and experienced Senior Software Engineer to contribute to our cloud-based medication Risk Mitigation Platform. The candidate selected for this role will work together with a Scrum team to take requirements through the development lifecycle and transform into high quality, valuable deliverables. As a Senior Software Engineer, he or she will take a paramount role as a tech lead in cultivating technical guidance, architecture, best practices as well as assisting the team and growth through mentorship. He or she will also be a key member in the overall assessment, vision, and implementation of our technical decisions by participating in cross-team committees.

Location: Mount Pleasant, SC

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Function as a tech lead in an agile environment developing on both full-stack Javascript applications / services as well as a Rails Core application in our EOM Platform. (Node.js, Angular.js, React.js, Ruby, Rails preferably on a UNIX or Linux platform)
Participation and ownership in all stages of development process: requirements, design, implementation, testing, deployment, and support.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Perform challenging work in designing, writing, editing, modifying, and debugging software applications and services.
Participation in cross-team architecture, design, process discussions and decisions within established committees.
Self-motivated with the ability to design and write high-performance, reliable, and maintainable code.
Learn new technologies and resolve challenges involved with integrating them with our infrastructure.
Update and modify systems to improve efficiency.
Work closely with Product Team in evaluating current systems and making decisions on future development.
Developing, testing and documenting RESTful APIs; with event-driven design patterns utilizing message queues; with SQL and/or NoSQL data stores; with designing, developing and deploying distributed systems.
Comfortable with large projects in source control (git), continuous integration (Jenkins) and writing unit tests and integration tests.
Design, develop and implement solutions around both a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
REQUIREMENTS:

Education:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study, or related practical experience.
M.S. in Computer Science or similar technical field of study(preferred)
Experience:
6+ of professional software development experience.
Expertise in two or more general purpose programming languages.
Preferred Experience in Healthcare Technology and/or Pharmacy Operations.
Preferred Experience with EHRs, integrations, system validations (EPIC, Cerner, QS/1, etc.).
Interest and ability to learn other coding languages and technologies as needed.
Knowledge of e-prescribing standards certifications a plus. (Meaningful Use, FHIR)
Familiarity with ontologies such as SNOMED, RxNorm, LOINC, ICD-10, NDC a plus
Qualifications:
Ideal candidates must be innovative, creative, flexible and be passionate about building quality software.
Ability to architect, design, develop and implement solutions around a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
Highly skilled in written and verbal communication.
Has exceptional initiative and follow-through on projects with minimal supervision or guidance.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Establishes and maintains effective working relationships with clients, end-users, and team members.
Experience using platform provided tools preferred (Docker, Cloud Foundry, AWS, NewRelic, Sentry).
Experience with performance optimization, especially the use of asset pipelines and CDNs, as well as tools used to analyze front end performance bottlenecks.
Preferred experience with database re-factoring and decomposing existing systems from a monolith to a micro-services architecture.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
Fast paced environment.
Collaboration across remote sites within the company.
New office located on Shem Creek.
Flexibility to work remote when warranted.
Office health and wellness initiatives, for those interested. (on-site private shower)
Celebrating success!
#DICE",4.4,"CareKinesis
4.4","Mount Pleasant, SC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
99,Senior Software Engineer II -,$95k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tabula Rasa Healthcare– TRHC is a family of companies that leverages technology to improve healthcare. TRHC works with providers and insurers to identify multi-drug interactions and to reduce risk of medication-related problems. We have developed the first multi-drug interaction tool that identifies risk across a variety of safety factors and presents meaningful opportunities to mitigate that risk. This technology can be used to assess safety at the individual patient-level or to stratify medication risk at the population-level, and can be embedded within any EMR or other healthcare IT system.

A Tabula Rasa Healthcare Co., CareKinesis, is looking for a telented and experienced Senior Software Engineer to contribute to our cloud-based medication Risk Mitigation Platform The candidates selected for these roles will work together with a Scrum team to take requirements through the development lifecycle and transform into high quality, valuable deliverables. As a Senior Software Engineer II, he or she will take a paramount role as a tech lead in cultivating technical guidance, architecture, best practices as well as assisting the team and growth through mentorship. He or she will also be a key member in the overall assessment, vision, and implementation of our technical decisions by participating in cross-team committees.

Location: Mount Pleasant, SC

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Function as a tech lead in an agile environment developing on both full-stack Javascript applications / services as well as a Rails Core application in our EOM Platform. (Node.js, Angular.js, React.js, Ruby, Rails preferably on a UNIX or Linux platform)
Participation and ownership in all stages of development process: requirements, design, implementation, testing, deployment, and support.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Perform challenging work in designing, writing, editing, modifying, and debugging software applications and services.
Participation in cross-team architecture, design, process discussions and decisions within established committees.
Self-motivated with the ability to design and write high-performance, reliable, and maintainable code.
Learn new technologies and resolve challenges involved with integrating them with our infrastructure.
Update and modify systems to improve efficiency.
Work closely with Product Team in evaluating current systems and making decisions on future development.
Developing, testing and documenting RESTful APIs; with event-driven design patterns utilizing message queues; with SQL and/or NoSQL data stores; with designing, developing and deploying distributed systems.
Comfortable with large projects in source control (git), continuous integration (Jenkins) and writing unit tests and integration tests.
Design, develop and implement solutions around both a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
REQUIREMENTS:

Education:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study, or related practical experience.
M.S. in Computer Science or similar technical field of study(preferred)
Experience:
10+ of professional software development experience.
Expertise in two or more general purpose programming languages.
Preferred Experience in Healthcare Technology and/or Pharmacy Operations.
Preferred Experience with EHRs, integrations, system validations (EPIC, Cerner, QS/1, etc.).
Interest and ability to learn other coding languages and technologies as needed.
Knowledge of e-prescribing standards certifications a plus. (Meaningful Use, FHIR)
Familiarity with ontologies such as SNOMED, RxNorm, LOINC, ICD-10, NDC a plus
Qualifications:
Ideal candidates must be innovative, creative, flexible and be passionate about building quality software.
Ability to architect, design, develop and implement solutions around a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
Highly skilled in written and verbal communication.
Has exceptional initiative and follow-through on projects with minimal supervision or guidance.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Establishes and maintains effective working relationships with clients, end-users, and team members.
Experience using platform provided tools preferred (Docker, Cloud Foundry, AWS, NewRelic, Sentry).
Experience with performance optimization, especially the use of asset pipelines and CDNs, as well as tools used to analyze front end performance bottlenecks.
Preferred experience with database re-factoring and decomposing existing systems from a monolith to a micro-services architecture.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
Fast paced environment.
Collaboration across remote sites within the company.
New office located on Shem Creek.
Flexibility to work remote when warranted.
Office health and wellness initiatives, for those interested. (on-site private shower)
Celebrating success!
#DICE",4.4,"CareKinesis
4.4","Mount Pleasant, SC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
100,Senior Software Engineer - EireneRx,$95k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tabula Rasa Healthcare– TRHC is a family of companies that leverages technology to improve healthcare. TRHC works with providers and insurers to identify multi-drug interactions and to reduce risk of medication-related problems. We have developed the first multi-drug interaction tool that identifies risk across a variety of safety factors and presents meaningful opportunities to mitigate that risk. This technology can be used to assess safety at the individual patient-level or to stratify medication risk at the population-level, and can be embedded within any EMR or other healthcare IT system.

A Tabula Rasa Healthcare Co., CareKinesis, is looking for a talented and experienced Senior Software Engineer to contribute to our cloud-based medication decision-support and e-prescribing platform team, EireneRx.

EireneRx is the source of patient demographics and medication information between Nurses, Prescribers, Technicians, and Pharmacists. From on demand and automated messaging, to medication entry & e-prescribing with clinical analysis and recommendations, to detailed and high level reporting across the board - EireneRx is the all in one place for clinical interactions between our clients and our pharmacy. EireneRx primarily serves the Program for All-inclusive Care of the Elderly (PACE), and has been reducing healthcare costs and improving patients' lives since 2010.

The candidate selected for this role will work together with a Scrum team to take requirements through the development lifecycle and transform into high quality, valuable deliverables. As a Senior Software Engineer, he or she will take a paramount role in cultivating technical guidance, architecture, best practices as well as assisting the team and growth through mentorship.

Location: Mount Pleasant, SC

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Work in an agile environment developing on both full-stack Javascript applications / services as well as a Ruby on Rails Core application in our EireneRx Platform. (Node.js, Angular.js, React.js, Ruby, Rails preferably on a UNIX or Linux platform)
Participation and ownership in all stages of development process: requirements, design, implementation, testing, deployment, and support.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Perform challenging work in designing, writing, editing, modifying, and debugging software applications and services.
Self-motivated with the ability to design and write high-performance, reliable, and maintainable code.
Learn new technologies and resolve challenges involved with integrating them with our infrastructure.
Update and modify systems to improve efficiency.
Work closely with Product Team in evaluating current systems and making decisions on future development.
Developing, testing and documenting RESTful APIs; with event-driven design patterns utilizing message queues; with SQL and/or NoSQL data stores; with designing, developing and deploying distributed systems.
Comfortable with large projects in source control (git), continuous integration (Jenkins) and writing unit tests and integration tests.
Design, develop and implement solutions around both a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
REQUIREMENTS:

Education:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study, or related practical experience.
M.S. in Computer Science or similar technical field of study(preferred)
Experience:
8+ of professional software development experience.
Expertise in two or more general purpose programming languages.
Experience in Healthcare Technology (preferred)
Qualifications:
Ideal candidates must be innovative, creative, flexible and be passionate about building quality software.
Ability to architect, design, develop and implement solutions around a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
Highly skilled in written and verbal communication.
Has exceptional initiative and follow-through on projects with minimal supervision or guidance.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Establishes and maintains effective working relationships with clients, end-users, and team members.
Experience using platform provided tools preferred (Docker, Cloud Foundry, AWS, NewRelic, Sentry).
Knowledge of e-prescribing standards certifications a plus. (Meaningful Use, FHIR)
Familiarity with ontologies such as SNOMED, RxNorm, LOINC, ICD-10, NDC a plus.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
Fast paced environment.
Collaboration across remote sites within the company.
New office located on Shem Creek.
Flexibility to work remote when warranted.
Office health and wellness initiatives, for those interested. (on-site private shower)
Celebrating success!",4.4,"CareKinesis
4.4","Mount Pleasant, SC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
101,Sr Voice Platform Engineer,-1,"Sr Voice Platform Engineer - Arlington, VA - Visioneering, LLC

Opportunity to join a Dynamic Company!

We are a Consulting and Telecom Engineering Services firm serving our DoD customers in Arlington, VA. We promote a culture of operational excellence while upholding the highest standards of compliance, quality and integrity.

We are in search of an experienced Voice Platform Engineer to complement our IT operations team and are looking for a motivated and enthusiastic individual who shares our commitment to excellence in meeting the needs of our DoD clients and working in a team atmosphere. We offer a challenging, customer focused environment with competitive compensation and a robust benefits package in a team-oriented, casual atmosphere. If you desire to work in an environment where you are appreciated and supported by senior management, apply today to join our team.
Description: *
The Engineer is responsible for VoIP Maintenance on a geo-diverse platform and must have the experience and ability to configure and troubleshoot the telephony platform, including using tools to monitor and increase the system capabilities. Employee will also work on unique and interesting advanced projects in a lab and provide cut-over support, application troubleshooting / triage, and follow-up support as required.
Responsibilities Include:
Operate in a Voice SIP Engineer role, establish and perform routine preventative maintenance tasks. Enforce security guidelines to maintain compliance. Review, test and apply hardware, firmware, and OS patches.
Perform emergency recovery on failed components and coordinate repair with vendor software and hardware support as needed.
Deployment and configuration of physical and virtual servers.
Assist operations staff in resolving customer trouble tickets and network issues that are outside of their troubleshooting scope.
Perform Interoperability and acceptance testing directly with customers and suppliers.
Document network architecture and methods of procedure for regularly performed tasks.
Candidates must be willing to occasionally travel within the Washington, DC Metro area to support various program initiatives in regional co-location facilities.
Required Knowledge and Experience:
The ideal candidate will have skills and experience in some or all of the following areas:
Able to triage, diagnose and repair hardware and software faults.
Strong enterprise background with administrative experience in virtualization technologies.
Strong technical background of TCP/IP and Network Security related protocols such as DNS, FTP, HTTP, ICMP, IPSec, IPv4, IPv6, NTP, RADIUS, RTP, SRTP, SNMP, SMTP, SSH, NAT, and VLAN.
Interoperability experience with the following protocols/technologies:
SIP Applications
SIP Trunking / Access
VoIP CODEC Transcoding G711, etc.
Avaya AS5300 / Genband Experience a Plus
SBC Experience a Plus
Asterisk Experience a Plus
Installation and maintenance experience with enterprise server hardware, copper, and fiber Ethernet
Experience with CLASS 5 Softswitch and feature server
Extensive hands on experience with the Avaya AS5300 as it is very similar in base code and architecture to the Genband AS.
Basic knowledge of Session Border Controllers
Solid knowledge of Gateways such as AudioCodes, MG3500, MG9000 etc.
Solid knowledge of legacy switches such as Nortel CS2100, Nortel CS1000, 5ESS, etc.
Solid knowledge of trace captures analysis
Solid knowledge of IP Data Network functions and configuration
Solid IP Experience
Solid SIP Experience
Manufacturer certifications acknowledging expertise in any of the above or similar a Plus
Minimum Qualifications:
5 years relevant training, knowledge, & experience
Secret Security Clearance
Position: Full-time*
We continually strive to create an environment that balances work life and offers benefits that will enhance the compensation package. We offer Medical, Dental, Vision, Health Savings Accounts, Short Term Disability, Long Term Disability, Life Insurance and AD&D, Paid Time Off, Personal Leave, Holidays, 401(k) plan with company match and work/life balance. Equal Opportunity Employer. Security+ will be required once starting.*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $109,000.00 - $165,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
8 Hour Shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
SIP VoIP: 5 years (Required)
Ribbon / GENBAND / Avaya: 3 years (Preferred)
SBC: 5 years (Preferred)
Language:
English (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Secret (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Company's website:
www.GOVisioneering.com
Work Remotely:
No",-1,VISIONEERING LLC - DoD Contracting Firm - www.GOVisioneering.com,"Arlington, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
102,Data Engineer,$74k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Group O is seeking a strong candidate with advanced analytics experience to fill an exciting Data Engineer role for an AI partner to Fortune 500 companies. In this role, you will be a valuable in managing large amounts of data and implement loading disparate data sets while managing the technical communication between the team and client.

Implementation including loading from disparate data sets, preprocessing using Hive and Pig.
Manage the technical communication between the team and client
Work with big data team to deliver cutting edge solutions

2-5 years of demonstrable experience designing technological solutions to complex data problems, developing & testing modular, reusable, efficient and scalable code to implement those solutions.
Ideally, this would include work on the following technologies:
Proficiency in at least one of the following: R, C++ or Python (preferred). Scala knowledge a strong advantage.
Strong understanding and experience in distributed computing frameworks, particularly Apache Hadoop 2.0 (YARN; MR & HDFS) and associated technologies -- one or more of Hive, Sqoop, Avro, Flume, Oozie, Zookeeper, etc..
Hands-on experience with Apache Spark and its components (Streaming, SQL, MLLib) is a strong advantage.
Operating knowledge of cloud computing platforms (AWS, especially EMR, EC2, S3, SWF services and the AWS CLI)
Experience working within a Linux computing environment, and use of command line tools including knowledge of shell/Python scripting for automating common tasks
In addition, the ideal candidate would have great problem-solving skills, and the ability & confidence to hack their way out of tight corners.
Education:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related technical degree",3.1,"Group O
3.1","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
103,Staff Software Engineer - Distributed Systems,$124k-$242k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Staff Software Engineer - Distributed Systems, you will actively contribute and lead engineers in the design and development of new distributed data processing capabilities. You will be instrumental in helping us solve complex low-latency, distributed systems challenges to handle our ever-increasing scale. Our system is a highly distributed, fault tolerant, multi-tenant platform that includes bleeding edge components related to storage, messaging, search, and analytics. This system ingests and analyzes terabytes of data a day, while making petabytes of data available for search and forensic analysis.

What you'll be working on:
Designing and implementing extremely high-volume, fault-tolerant, scalable backend systems that process and manage petabytes of customer data.
Work to improve algorithms built to schedule load on clusters of thousands of machines elastically at runtime.
Improve systems to provide performance guarantees to customers in a shared-everything multi-tenant architecture.
Lead and contribute to the re-architecting of our internal message processing technology to multi-petabyte per day scale.
Help manage exabytes of data using the latest and greatest technologies such as Kafka, Kubernetes and Docker.
Your experience and skills include:
B.S. or higher in Computer Sciences or related discipline (M.S. a plus)
8+ years of industry experience with a proven track record of ownership and delivery
Experience developing scalable distributed data processing solutions
Experience in multi-threaded programming
Experience in running large scalable distributed services following a microservice architecture
Hands-on object-oriented programming experience (e.g., Java, Scala)
Excellent verbal and written communication
---------------------------------------------------------------

About Us

Mission:
Democratize machine data analytics through the Sumo Logic platform, bringing real-time data insights securely through the cloud.

Funding and Growth:
We have raised $345 million in funding to date, with the most recent round being May 2019. Investors include Battery Ventures, Greylock Partners, Sutter Hill Ventures, Accel Partners, Sequoia Capital, Sapphire Ventures and DFJ Growth. Our recurring revenue and customer base are growing steadily. We serve over 2,000 customers across the globe including Alaska Airlines, Anheuser Busch, Hootsuite, Hearst, Hudl, Major League Baseball, Marriott, Medidata, Sauce Labs, Samsung SmartThings, SPS Commerce, Twitter, Telstra, Toyota, Zuora and more.",3.3,"Sumo Logic
3.3","Redwood City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2010,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
104,Senior Process Engineer I – Downstream Manufacturing Development and Technology,$98k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Process Engineer I – Downstream Manufacturing Development and Technology
Location: Bedford, MA
Overview
We are seeking a highly motivated Senior Process Engineer I with outstanding knowledge and hands-on experience in downstream process development and process scale-up. This individual will be responsible for providing technical and scientific expertise to downstream process transfer, scale-up, and GMP manufacturing for Homology’s novel and proprietary adeno-associated virus (AAV) viral vectors. Critical to this role, is the ability to effectively communicate scientific findings and innovative solutions with other functions including Process Development, Manufacturing, Engineering, Quality and CMC teams.
Responsibilities
Play a lead role in providing routine person-in-plant support to downstream GMP manufacturing activities
Support downstream GMP manufacturing batch record review, change controls, deviations, etc.
Provide technical expertise in trouble-shooting, root cause analysis, and data trending toward continued downstream process improvement
Act as subject matter expert for technology transfer, scale-up, and process characterization
Collaborate with internal and external groups to ensure alignment and completion of project objectives and activities
Author technology transfer and GMP manufacturing campaign reports
Maintain and update downstream database containing information related to all GMP manufacturing activities; ensure data integrity and traceability
Support regulatory filings and responses to regulatory questions
Qualifications
A Ph.D., M.S. or B.S. in Chemistry, Chemical Engineering or related fields with a minimum of 2 (Ph.D.), 5 (M.S.) or 8 (B.S.) years of relevant industry experience.
Previous experience in downstream process development
Ability to operate cross-functionally with strong communication and interpersonal skills
Attitude to proactively learn and apply new technologies
Ability to assist in analyzing complex technical problems, and proposing new solutions
Willingness to travel both domestically and internationally (up to 15%)
Interested candidates should forward a cover letter and Resume / CV to careers@homologymedicines.com or on line:
www.homologymedicines.com
Homology Medicines, Inc. (HMI) has built foundational intellectual property on gene editing and gene therapy vectors derived from naturally occurring human adeno-associated viruses (AAVs). The Company's technology is precise, on-target and highly efficient for in vivo editing of genetic mutations. This transformative platform technology, combined with an elite leadership team of biopharmaceutical industry veterans, create a significant opportunity for HMI to rapidly advance a diverse pipeline of new medicines that address and potentially cure the underlying cause of genetic diseases.",4.4,"Homology Medicines
4.4","New Bedford, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
105,Modeling & Simulation Test Engineer,$44k-$67k (Glassdoor Est.),"AEgis is seeking a modeling and simulation engineer with a background in testing, federation development, and/or integration to support DIA/MSIC Integrated Threat Analysis and Simulation Environment (ITASE) program. The candidate will establish, improve and maintain testing suites and processes for ITASE software products focusing on Intelligence Community (IC) authoritative integrated weapons systems models across land, air, sea, space, and cyber domains, but also potentially including the simulation architecture, scenario configuration tools, analysis tools, integration tools and system-of-systems ITASE simulations.
The candidate will establish, improve and maintain testing suites and processes for ITASE software products constructed for use in the ITASE Modeling and Simulation (M&S) framework. These products include the simulation architecture, scenario configuration tools, integration tools, analysis tools, system-of-system ITASE simulations, and IC authoritative integrated weapons systems models across land, air, sea, space, and cyber domains. The candidate must be able to comprehend and analyze system technical documentation, system intelligence assessments, ICDs, and software specifications; interact with IC System Analysts and model developers; and examine model, tool and architecture capabilities and interfaces to define, develop and implement unit tests, system tests and systems-of-systems tests based on comprehensive system- and process-level understanding of ITASE simulation architecture and models.
Day-to-Day Duties:
The candidate’s primary focus will be to develop, execute and analyze test plans and test results for constructive and high-fidelity virtual authoritative weapons systems. Test plans should be derived from in-depth, system-level knowledge of the system’s capabilities, limitations, operations, doctrinal intent, and other assessments. The candidate should review model developer documentation and test plans, IC system assessments, and all relevant documentation to produce test plans to verify development claims; validate system performance versus assessments, engineering analysis, and hardware test results; define edge-case and other relevant test cases not examined by the developer; and provide tests which can be incorporated into the automated testing framework. The candidate will analyze all test data with regards to veracity, relevance, and source, and provide conclusions in a written report or in the issue documentation system, as required by project scope. Model performance will be evaluated at both the system and system-of-systems levels. Candidate will be expected to develop and execute complex M&S scenarios.
Candidate should be able to collect, organize, and analyze data to summarize, document, present, and archive findings. Candidate will generate technical memoranda, reports, and briefings to detail the analysis, findings, limitations and caveats of the threat M&S. Participation in various TIMs is expected as well as periodic coordination with the ITASE PMO.

Required:
*Must possess a current TS/SCI security clearance
· Must possess a minimum of 5 years of software test background
· Must possess a bachelor’s degree in a technical field
· Must possess a minimum of 5 years of experience working with constructive/virtual simulation environments.
· Must have experience working with Distributed Interactive Simulation (DIS) or High Level Architecture (HLA) simulation federations
· Must possess a minimum of 5 years of experience and a thorough understanding of C, C++, C# or Python development languages
· Able to work well within a software development team
Desired:
· Possess a TS/SCI with CI Poly
· Strong understanding of the software development process using object-oriented development practices.
· Highly motivated to develop software from requirements gathering through design, coding, and testing.
· 5+ years of experience working Army, Joint, Intel Community or other Command and Control Systems
· 5+ years of object-oriented design and implementation experience
· 5+ years of experience developing network or database interface applications
· Strong understanding of software, computer, and network architectures
· Understanding of common industry and military network protocols
· Working knowledge of SQL and experience interfacing with databases.
· Creating and manipulating records within a relational database from C++ or C# using native calls, ADO.NET, ODBC, or OLE DB

AEgis Technologies
– Leading the Transformation of Modern Warfare
The AEgis Technologies Group (AEgis) provides advanced engineering solutions across the space superiority, directed energy, missile defense, electronic warfare & cyber, C4ISR, and intelligence markets. The Company was founded in 1989 and has served its core customer base as a trusted partner for decades focused on solving the Defense and National Security Community’s hardest challenges. AEgis is an end to end life cycle partner through R&D, development, and into operations. We are the trusted provider leading the transformation for tomorrow’s multi-modal and multi-domain warfare. AEgis Technologies – Leading the Transformation of Modern Warfare.",4.2,"The Aegis Technologies Group, Inc.
4.2","Huntsville, AL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
106,Software Engineer III Virtual Hiring Event,$63k-$126k (Glassdoor Est.),"Staples Virtual Hiring Event!

Event Details
Date: Thursday, October 22, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Software Engineer III

Software Engineer II

Benefits Analyst

Senior Digital & eCommerce Strategist

Intake Details:

Requirements

Review job specific requirements on Staples Retail Career Site (https://retailcareers.staples.com/)

Technical requirements

To attend the virtual hiring event, please ensure you're able to be on video via a computer or phone.

What to bring to this event

Resume

Completing our online application prior to the event is strongly encouraged and will speed up the process.

What to wear

Dress code is Casual (come as you are, but please be presentable).

About Staples

Staples helps the world work better with work solutions that deliver industry-leading products, services and expertise across office supplies, facilities, breakroom, furniture, technology, promotional products, and print and marketing services. The company supports businesses of all sizes from sole-preneurs to the Fortune 100 and everything in between. Headquartered near Boston, Mass., Staples operates in North America. More information about Staples is available at www.staples.com.

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

As a Software Engineer III for Staples, you will join an established technology team to help lead technical innovation within the Digital Solutions division. You will be responsible for the design, development, testing, implementation, and support of applications and related integrations.

Software Creation & implementation:

Develop in-depth knowledge of several Staples business processes and systems environment
Actively lead in the definition, design, development, testing and implementation of software functionality using the Agile methodology
Create, modify, and design complex programs, modules, routines, scripts and data objects from a detailed design where efficiency, performance and reliability are critical
Work with and advise both business and technology teams on how best to implement desired features and enhancements
Ensure that technical solutions follow best practices, are reliable, are easily maintainable and are scalable under sustained load
Create and evolve application documentation as required
Full job description: retailcareers.staples.com",3.2,"Staples
3.2","Framingham, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1986,Company - Private,Office Supply Stores,Retail,$10+ billion (USD),-1
107,Senior Software Engineer - Medication Decision Support,$95k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tabula Rasa Health Care– TRHC is a family of companies that leverages technology to improve healthcare. TRHC works with providers and insurers to identify multi-drug interactions and to reduce risk of medication-related problems. We have developed the first multi-drug interaction tool that identifies risk across a variety of safety factors and presents meaningful opportunities to mitigate that risk. This technology can be used to assess safety at the individual patient-level or to stratify medication risk at the population-level, and can be embedded within any EMR or other healthcare IT system.

CareKinesis, a division of Tabula Rasa Health Care is looking for a talented and experienced Senior Software Engineer to contribute to our cloud-based Medication Decision Support Platform.

MDS is transforming how clinical professionals visualize and interpret medication therapy management and pharmacogenomics. This team oversees complex calculations, high throughput data processing, as well as the user experience to interpret many different categories of clinical data in the most straightforward and efficient way possible. Our goal is to change the way all healthcare users will understand the impact (pros and cons) of adding or removing any drug from a patient's overall medication regimen.

The candidate selected for this role will work together with a Scrum team to take requirements through the development lifecycle and transform into high quality, valuable deliverables. As a Senior Software Engineer, he or she will take a paramount role in cultivating technical guidance, architecture, best practices as well as assisting the team growth through mentorship.

ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:
Work in an agile environment developing on both full-stack Javascript applications / services (Node.js, React.js, Redux preferably on a UNIX or Linux platform)
Participation and ownership in all stages of development process: requirements, design, implementation, testing, deployment, and support.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Perform challenging work in designing, writing, editing, modifying, and debugging software applications and services.
Self-motivated with the ability to design and write high-performance, reliable, and maintainable code.
Learn new technologies and resolve challenges involved with integrating them with our infrastructure.
Update and modify systems to improve efficiency.
Work closely with Product Team in evaluating current systems and making decisions on future development.
Developing, testing and documenting RESTful APIs; with event-driven design patterns utilizing message queues; with SQL and/or NoSQL data stores; with designing, developing and deploying distributed systems.
Comfortable with large projects in source control (git), continuous integration (Jenkins) and writing unit tests and integration tests.
Design, develop and implement solutions around both a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:
Ideal candidates must be innovative, creative, flexible and be passionate about building quality software.
Ability to architect, design, develop and implement solutions around a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
Highly skilled in written and verbal communication.
Has exceptional initiative and follow-through on projects with minimal supervision or guidance.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Establishes and maintains effective working relationships with clients, end-users, and team members.
Experience using platform provided tools preferred (Docker, Cloud Foundry, AWS, NewRelic, Sentry).
EDUCATION:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study, or related practical experience.

M.S. in Computer Science or similar technical field of study(preferred)

EXPERIENCE:
6+ of professional software development experience.
Expertise in two or more general purpose programming languages.
Experience in Healthcare Technology (preferred)
OTHER SKILLS and ABILITIES:
Interest and ability to learn other coding languages and technologies as needed.
Knowledge of e-prescribing standards certifications a plus. (Meaningful Use, FHIR)
Familiarity with ontologies such as SNOMED, RxNorm, LOINC, ICD-10, NDC a plus.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
Fast paced environment.
Collaboration across remote sites within the company.
New office located on Shem Creek.
Flexibility to occasionally work remote when warranted.
Regular office activities include: game nights, paddle boarding, yoga on the pier, team lunches and happy hours.
Office health and wellness initiatives, for those interested. (on-site private shower)
Celebrating success!
#DICE",4.4,"CareKinesis
4.4","Mount Pleasant, SC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
108,Principal Automation Controls Engineer/Integrator,-1,"Job Description*
\*\*\*This is an advanced engineering position and candidates will be required to demonstrate competence as an automation engineer. \*\*\*
Background: *
ICR Resources LLC is a fast-growing full-service Automation and Integration provider. We are looking for candidates to fill two new Automation Engineering positions. Our services include but not limited to:

· Automated Process Design & Consulting

· Machine Control Design and Build

· PLC / PC Based Automation

· SCADA - Data Collection, Historian and Andon services

· Process Instrumentation and DCS systems

· Wireless Automation Solutions

· Electrical Infrastructure Design and Installation Management (voltages less than 15kv)

· Custom Robot and Motion Solutions
Job Description: *
· Control System Design

· Advanced PLC Programming (all manufacturers)

· Advanced HMI Programming (all manufacturers) including scripting

· Robot Programming (Pendant and Software Based)

· VFD, Servo, Motor control design, installation, and troubleshooting

· Power distribution design and installation supervision including MCC and switchgear

· Panel layout in 2d cad

· System drawings in Solid works Electrical

· Manage multiple projects at the same time including subcontractors both mechanical and electrical

· Utilization of various industrial protocols across different types of media. Including cat5e, fiber, wireless, serial, etc. E/IP, Modbus, Modbus RTU/ASCII/TCP, Profibus, DeviceNet as examples of protocols that may be utilized

· Understand, troubleshoot and Implement P,I&D control systems.

· Travel to individual customers site for supervision of system installs and customer support. Advanced troubleshooting skills are required.

· Design, Build, and Install SCADA systems. Design systems that display real-time production status. Setup up of database (SQL, ODBC, etc.) may be required for historian applications.

· Understand an equipment or process problems, and effectively countermeasure the root cause

· Understand process requirements and specify electrical and mechanical hardware with the environment in mind. Electrically, mechanically, chemically.

· Candidate must possess strong troubleshooting skills
Software’s Utilized On A Frequent Basis*
· PLC software (all types)

· HMI software (all types)

· Program robots by teach pendant

· Robot Programming by PC Software

· 2d Auto Cad

· Solid works

· Excel / Word / Outlook
Character Traits Desired: *
· Self-Driven

· Honest

· Energetic and Highly Productive.

· Precise

· Professional

· Positive Attitude

· Hands on

Job Type: Full-time

Flexible work schedule

Salary: $85,000.00 to $105,000.00 /year - starting pay

Excellent Health Insurance

Retirement Benefits

Vacation / Holiday Pay

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $85,000.00 - $105,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Health insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Ability to Commute/Relocate:
Silex, MO (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
Automation / Controls Engineering: 2 years (Preferred)
Programming: 2 years (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location",-1,ICR Resources LLC,"Silex, MO",-1,Unknown,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
109,Principal Software Engineer - File Accelerator,$84k-$162k (Glassdoor Est.),"Nasuni is growing and looking for talented engineers to help found a new File Accelerator Team and create a new product. This is a green-field opportunity at an established leading tech company to build something new from scratch using industry best-practices. We're looking for multi-disciplined software engineers interested in all aspects of product development - architecture, design, coding, testing, CI/CD, release & deployment management - all in an Agile environment.

The Role: Principal Software Engineer

Key skills we're looking for include:

* At least 5 years of python development in a product environment.

* Demonstrable experience with AWS Serverless technologies including API Gateway and Lambda. AWS certifications a plus.

* Development of testing frameworks, building CI/CD pipelines, and management of 3rd party packages.

* High-scale computing in enterprise or global production environments that are receiving, handling, and processing large amounts of data in a time-critical manner.

* Data modeling of SQL and/or no-SQL databases, including AWS DynamoDB.

* Infrastructure-as-code technologies like AWS CloudFormation or Terraform, as well as, command line tools for managing this infrastructure.

* Monitoring of and alerting on highly available systems
Focus on quality by testing, code reviews, and other methodologies.

Nice-to-have Skills:

Data analysis and /or high-scale request and data processing with recommendation systems.

Other high-level languages for prior serverless development including Golang, Java, and Javascript.

Nasuni is hiring remotely during Covid-19. This team will be based in Boston Seaport. We will consider remote employees for this team who have created high-scale computing products in serverless environments.

About Nasuni

Nasuni delivers a single software platform to store, protect, synchronize, and collaborate on unstructured file data at scale. Nasuni Cloud File Services, powered by the patented UniFS® global file system, leverages cloud storage to modernize primary NAS and file server storage; file archiving; backup; and disaster recovery, while offering transformational new capabilities for multi-site file collaboration. By combining the low cost, unlimited capacity, and durability of private or public cloud object storage with the high performance, security, and broad application compatibility of traditional disk-based file storage, the Nasuni subscription service improves workforce productivity, simplifies IT operations, and reduces IT costs. Nasuni operates globally from its worldwide headquarters in Boston, Mass., USA.

Why work at Nasuni?
As part of our commitment to your well-being, we are pleased to offer comprehensive benefits packages to employees across the world. Benefits packages vary by geography, but generally include:
Take-What-You-Need paid time off
Incentive stock options
Comprehensive health, dental, and vision plans
Life and disability insurance
Retirement plan
Generous employee referral bonuses
To all recruitment agencies: Nasuni does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our job boards, Nasuni employees or any other company location. Nasuni is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.

Nasuni is an equal opportunity employer. The equal employment opportunity policy at Nasuni protects employees and job applicants from discrimination on the bases of race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy, gender identity, and sexual orientation), parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service, or other non-merit based factors. These protections extend to all management practices and decisions, including recruitment and hiring practices, appraisal systems, promotions, and training and career development programs.",3.9,"Nasuni
3.9","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
110,Full Stack Software Engineer - Remote Work Opportunity,$48k-$90k (Glassdoor Est.),"Purpose and Scope

As a Full Stack Software Engineer at Tolmar Inc., you will be a member of the IT team in the Windsor, CO office, augmenting our development capacity by contributing high-quality code to the existing code base for our proprietary applications. You will work with other IT members in a collaborative environment to meet deadlines and improve the overall code quality.

Essential Duties& Responsibilities
Design, develop and test applications/components. You will deliver highly tuned, testable and optimized application and database code per spec and be expected to offer alternative approaches when reviewing requirements.
Collaborate closely with stakeholders, QA and infrastructure teams throughout all phases of the software and product development lifecycle.
Stay current on technology and domain trends, frameworks and cutting-edge technology.
Contribute to architecture and design decisions.
Implement third party products needed to support systems and applications, including development toolkits.
Analyze business operations to understand strengths and weaknesses and determine opportunities to automate processes and functions.
Be responsible for expanding the feature set of the platform in an extensible and scalable manner.
Own individual modules and act as the technical SME for them.
Get the experience of building products from scratch and taking them all the way to production.
Work with business and provide solutions to problems faced by customers.
Create logical data models based on functional requirements.
Perform quality assurance review of specifications for internal and external delivery.
Troubleshoot and provide technical support and solutions to users.
Prepare and update documentation for new or existing systems.
Monitor system effectiveness in satisfying user needs.
Perform other related duties, as assigned.
Education and Experience
Bachelor’s Degree required; Master’s Degree in Computer Science, Engineering or Information Technology preferred.
5+ years of full stack enterprise software development experience using Microsoft ASP Net Core (C#), SQL Server, Microservices architecture, WCF, XML/ Web services; RESTFUL APIs, CSS3/Bootstrap, HTML5, JavaScript, Angular, TypeScript and JSON highly desired.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities
Experience working in a regulated industry (e.g. Pharmaceutical, Bio-Pharmaceutical, or Medical Devices) preferred.
ERP implementation, replacement or support experience
Strong desire to learn and grow professionally.
Proficient in both front and back end web development.
Experience in implementing responsive web application using Bootstrap framework is essential.
Highly proficient in writing T-SQL queries and stored procedures.
Experience in SQL Server SSAS, SSIS and SSRS preferred.
SharePoint development experience preferred.
Mobile development experience preferred.
Experience with SaaS / PaaS environments such as Azure is preferred.
Good understanding of software design patterns and object oriented design concepts.
The ability to take a project from scoping requirements through actual launch of the project as a team.
Strong analytical, problem solving and programming skills.
Strong knowledge in data structures and algorithms.
Good understanding of Computer Science fundamentals, object oriented programming concepts and web technologies.
Excellent verbal and written communications skills.
Experience communicating with other teams to collect requirements, review test cases and translate the product requirements to technical requirements.
The ability to work independently or as a team with the guidance of managers.
Ability to document the technical design and approach for the features developed.
Core Values
The Full stack software engineer is expected to operate within the framework of Tolmar’s Core Values:
Consistently operate with the highest standards of ethics and compliance.
Take ownership of your actions, success and setbacks.
Respect each other and understand that honest collaboration is at the heart of our company success.
Go the extra mile to make things happen.
Be committed to all we do and the patients we serve.
Embrace change with enthusiasm.
Strive to learn about and understand the needs of customers and patients, and take action with great speed and efficiency no matter the task.
Requirements
Full stack enterprise software development experience using Microsoft ASP.NET (C#), SQL Server, WCF, XML/ Web services; RESTFUL APIs, CSS3/Bootstrap, HTML5, JavaScript, AngularJS, TypeScript and JSON highly desired.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information.",3.3,"TOLMAR
3.3","Windsor, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
111,iFit Content Data Analyst,$33k-$60k (Glassdoor Est.),"Founded in 1979, ICON Health & Fitness is the world’s largest fitness manufacturer. We are known for our best-in-class consumer fitness brands (NordicTrack, ProForm, FreeMotion, Weslo, Weider, and iFit) that are distributed through hundreds of the world’s best retailers.

We create the tools, technology, and equipment to help everyone from elite athletes focused on their next big day, to beginners getting ready for day one, to move more, move better and move forward.

At Icon Health and Fitness, we are proud to offer competitive compensation as well as the following benefits:
Paid Training
Competitive compensation package with growth based on performance
Full benefits package (Medical, Dental, Vision and Life insurance)
401(k) with company match
Paid time off
Discounts on Icon products
Discounts at local retail stores
The chance to test the fitness products we create in our state-of-the-art gym on location
Onsite massage therapist
Working in beautiful Cache Valley, Utah, with access to an exceptional outdoor lifestyle, a university campus nearby
Happy work-life balance
Collaborative work space and environment
A free beverage center and snack bar to keep you hydrated and fueled throughout the day
SUMMARY

Icon Health & Fitness is seeking a gifted individual who will serve as a trusted business advisor for a rapidly growing global fitness brand called iFit. This person’s focus will be to support decision-making by completing a variety of strategic and tactical data tasks and initiatives.

iFit produces world-class fitness content in video format, which is made available via streaming on high-end workout equipment with built-in tablets. The content is accessed on a subscription basis. Your purpose will be to support the production and development of this content by working with the Director of Content, SVP of Marketing, President of iFit, iFit Studio film producers, and other analysts at the company to provide insight into what content is being accessed, what subscribers want most, and what is contributing to business growth, user engagement, and subscriber retention.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Data gathering: get the data you need, on your own, whenever it is needed
Data mining: finding the “gems” of the data which may be overlooked in high-level reports
Data explaining: explain what you find out--potentially complex issues--in layman’s terms
What you’ll actually be doing:
Developing and maintaining business intelligence infrastructure and analytical framework for iFit
Work with backend database developers to develop new data sources which will provide insight to the business
Integrating primary and secondary data sources into an enterprise data warehouse
Acquiring data from sources to interpret and analyze results
Use statistical techniques to understand and interpret trends
Implement data analyses to optimize operational efficiency
Identify, analyze and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Filter and clean data by reviewing data sources
Correcting data issues at the source if they are discovered
Locating and defining new process improvement opportunities
Maintain data integrity across multiple data sources
Manage recurring or automated reporting using BI tools
Complete analyses projects or inquiries on short time frames
Fulfill ad-hoc requests for data to stakeholders across the company
Being proactive about delving into data, with a goal to gain new insights into customer behavior, preferences, wants, dislikes, etc
Be willing to learn new skills to enhance the value of your analyst role
Using all means at your disposal to complete analysis projects
Sitting down with iFit stakeholders regularly to relay insights they need to have
If there is new data we need, you will be working with iFit software developers to find ways to collect what we need in new ways
Writing SQL day-in, day-out to get the data you need
Building automated reports using BI software (Tableau)
Providing ad-hoc data to requestors across the company
Identifying and resolving data issues as they are discovered
Other duties may be assigned.
QUALIFICATIONS

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Ideal Candidates will have:
Three to five years demonstrated experience with statistical analysis software/languages (SAS, R, Python)
Three to five years demonstrated experience in deep dive analytics with
The fitness industry, or
Analytical experience crafting strategies for new content with well known streaming companies (Netflix, Hulu, D+, Prime, etc.).
Required skills for this position:
Exposure to RDBMS (MS SQL Server, Amazon Redshift, Oracle, or others)
Proficiency in any SQL development software (SSMS, DBeaver, DBVisualizer, etc)
Working knowledge of SQL (3+ years)--SQL test to be administered
Intermediate to Advanced expertise in MS Excel or Google Sheets
Experience in BI tools (Power BI, Qlik, Tableau, MicroStrategy, Domo, etc)
EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE
Master’s Degree in statistical discipline preferred.
Must have a B.A. or B.S. in related field or equivalent experience.
REASONING ABILITY

Must have great people skills. Able to handle stressful situations. Must have a positive attitude.

CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS

As needed for position. May require a valid driver’s license.

PHYSICAL DEMANDS

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee frequently is required to use hands to finger, handle, or feel. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

WORK ENVIRONMENT

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate. Typical office environment

DISCLAIMER

Your employment at ICON is ""at will"". You and the company each have the right to terminate the employment relationship at any time for any cause or for no cause at all. Nothing but an express written contract signed by you and a Vice President of this Company can modify this ""employment at will"" arrangement.

""We do not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, ancestry, mental or physical disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, medical condition, genetic information, marital status, Veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.""",3.8,"Icon Health and Fitness
3.8","Logan, UT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
112,Product Testing & Lab Operations Engineer,$53k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"PURPOSE OF JOB

Do you have ideas? Do you look at a product and want to understand how it delivers its benefits? Do you like hands on work? Do you like collaborating and coordinating with others to achieve a goal?

Lead product testing for the growing Owens Corning Roofing Components business. This role will be based at the Components R&D Center in Granville, OH which includes a Product Testing Laboratory that conducts performance testing and a Pilot Line that runs prototyping trials. This supports the manufacturing and new product development activities for the Roofing, Geosynthetics, and Protective Packaging business segments. The work includes leading lab coordination and improvements, product testing, data collection and analysis, competitive benchmarking and customer-inspired test method development. This position works closely with the product development, pilot, quality, IP teams and customers.

Join an organization that believes that every employee owns a piece of our bold growth goals and ultimate success. We are a market-leading Fortune 500® company with a history and focus on growth through customer-inspired innovation. Owens Corning is devoted to delivering sustainable solutions across our three business segments while striving to ensure our people and products make the world a better place. We take pride in having an inclusive and diverse workplace with employees around the globe. A holistic sense of community exists across our entire organization as our talent grows globally. We are a company that fully recognizes the importance of paving a path to a sustainable and safe enterprise through investing in our people. Our desire to make an impactful difference in the world flows from top down to all levels of the organization. By being a company that instills pride within each and every employee, we aspire to build market-leading businesses; global in scope - human in scale.

Reports to: Program Leader, Components Core Technologies

Span of Control: An individual contributor of a small team.

JOB RESPONSIBILITIES

LAB LEADERSHIP (50%)

Coordinates lab activities and delivers operations improvements, partnering with others to deliver successful outcomes.

Coordinates day to day execution of product testing, test method development and benchmarking
Establishes and improves operations, including management systems and workflows
Determines priority calls in conjunction with customers, and ensures timely completion of tests
Leads communication and collaboration within team, with lab customers, and stakeholders
Sets personal performance and development objectives and delivers against these
Collaborates to define the team strategy and metrics for growth and leads execution against milestones

TEST METHOD DEVELOPMENT & PRODUCT TESTING (50%)

Develops test methods and technical claims.Conducts product testing and competitive benchmarking.

Lives the Owens Corning safety culture every day, working safely and identifying and driving improvements
Conducts product testing, analyzes data and reports results and recommendations
Develops customer-inspired test methods and validates against field performance
Develops meaningful technical claims to help market and sell OC products
Provides technical direction and feedback to others, sharing knowledge throughout the organization
Supports operation of pilot line plastic extrusion equipment to create prototypes

JOB REQUIREMENTS

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelors degree in Engineering or Science field
Must be comfortable using a computer including MS Office Suite (Word, Excel, Outlook, Powerpoint)
Knowledge of laboratory practices
Ability to repetitively lift objects up to 40 lbs and stand for a large portion of the day

PREFERRED EXPERIENCE:

2-3 years experience in industrial R&D lab is preferred
Experience leading teams and projects, especially in R&D environment is preferred
Experience using statistics to drive data-based decisions and develop customer-inspired test methods is preferred
Technical knowledge and experience with ASTM, roofing, geosynthetics, or packaging testing is preferred
Prior experience operating plastic extrusion equipment is preferred
Ability to travel up to 10% of the time is preferred

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES:

Strong desire to learn and own delivery of project and team outcomes.
Self-motivated with the ability and desire to work independently to learn and apply new technical areas.
Team oriented, with high energy and desire to build strong relationships, collaborate and drive results across multi-functional and discipline boundaries in a dynamic environment.
Passion for understanding how things work and the ability to collect, analyze and present data to drive decisions.
Resilience and agility to adapt to an ever-changing environment and business.
Out of the box thinking to identify new approaches to overcome obstacles.
Organized leader with the interest to build a team, direct work, drive improvements and deliver outcomes.
Ability to understand and translate customer needs into feasible test methods and meaningful technical claims.
Practices safety-conscious behaviors in all operational processes and procedures.
Attention to detail and dedication to documenting and embedding knowledge within the organization.
Excellent written, presentation and verbal communication skills. Strong computer skills.",3.9,"OWENS CORNING
3.9","Granville, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1938,Company - Public,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
113,Foreign Military Sales (FMS) Systems Engineer MQ-9,$44k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB TITLE: Foreign Military Sales (FMS) Systems Engineer MQ-9

PROJECT OVERVIEW:

AFLCMC / WII is responsible for the development, test, production, and sustainment of the MQ-9 UAS. This project provides Life Cycle Sustainment in the product support areas to include Supply Support, Maintenance Planning, PHS&T, and Tech Orders for MQ-9 and associated systems. This position provides advisory and assistance services support to the government program office at their Wright-Patterson AFB operating location.

JOB DESCRIPTION AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Act as engineering team leader or supervisor, developing engineering procedures and controls, managing project efforts, and taking the lead in problem resolution for aircraft research, development, production, and lifecycle acquisition and sustainment activities; interface with weapons system Contractors, vendors, and Government representatives regarding the technical aspects of engineering activities; independently apply engineering principles to investigate, analyze, plan, oversee, and evaluate weapons system development and sustainment activities; review and prepare engineering and technical analyses, reports, change proposals, and other technical documentation; and provide engineering expertise, oversight, and participation to activities involving weapons system and associated support equipment hardware/software development, integration and test, configuration management, quality assurance testing, and acquisition and resource management
Support development and sustaining engineering support for RPAs, similar vehicles, and associated systems, subsystems and ground control stations; the development of long range plans, roadmaps and mission area plans; processes required to analyze operational capability requirements and determine adequate technical solutions; the integration of radar systems, Electro-Optical/Infrared (EO/IR) sensors, weapons, and other payloads/stores; processes necessary to support environmental requirements; and all aspects of RPAs, similar systems and associated ground control stations development and supportability
Ensure new designs are sustainable, meet system requirements and requiring-office expectations; support the resolution of SWaP issues for RPA or similar vehicle / systems; support laboratories (i.e. Air Force Research Laboratory (AFRL)) and / or special projects for new technologies; and provide technical and feasibility analyses for development, testing and fielding of RPAs or similar vehicles.
Assist the PM in the effort to support, track and provide USAF existing documentation / information for country-specific airworthiness certification requirements IAW approved Delegation of Disclosure Letter (DDL)
Provide advisory assistance / witnessing Acceptance Test Procedures (ATP) for both aircraft and GCSs with the FMS Country representatives
REQUIRED SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:

Security Clearance: Top Secret/SCI
Active TS/SCI clearance
Ten (10) years experience
Masters degree in relevant field
Eight (8) years of additional work experience may be substituted for a Masters degree; or, four (4) years of additional work experience plus a Bachelors degree may be substituted for a Masters degree.
Five (5) years of any experience must have been performed on DoD programs/projects
DESIRED SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:
Experience with Unmanned Systems (UAS)
WORK LOCATION: Wright Patterson AFB, OH

TRAVEL: 10%

KEY WORDS: Engineering; Systems Engineering; Air Worthiness; Data Analysis; ECP; Acquisition Support; Foreign Military Sales; FMS #MON

WBB is a technical and management consulting company that provides innovative products and services that solve government and commercial customers toughest problems. For more than 30 years, WBB has set the standard for excellence in consulting services, while providing its employees with an outstanding work environment with ample opportunities for growth and success. WBB continues to enjoy impressive growth, which is directly attributed to the companys hiring practice of always hiring the very best professionals from government, military and industry.

We are proud of our diverse environment and are an Equal Opportunity Employer. WBB is committed to a policy of equal employment opportunity. WBB participates in E-Verify.

WBB does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of WBB and WBB will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.",4.1,"Whitney, Bradley and Brown
4.1","Dayton, OH",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
114,Electrical Engineer/CS/Physicist (R&D Sensor System Development),-1,"Sensor System Development/Processing/Data Collection*
SUMMARY DESCRIPTION: * Development, integration, and advanced processing of state-of-the-art digital sensors and data collection/processing technology. The responsibilities include multi-INT sensor system design, development, integration, data collection, and data processing. In addition to design and development of EO/IR optics, focal plane array, electronics, and other sensor technology. Similar positions exist for developing/enhancing post acquisition sensor, signal processing algorithms and AI algorithms for real-time imagery display and exploitation, design and integration of electronic hardware and software for sensor data processing, acquisition, and dissemination.
QUALIFICATIONS: * BS/MS/Ph.D. in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Physicist or equivalent. Experience in signal, image, and data processing with knowledge of analog and digital electronics. Experience in system hardware design. Knowledge in some or several of these areas is preferred:
Xilinx SOC FPGA hardware design using RTL in VHDL and embedded software design.
Printed Circuit Board design using Altium Designer.
Electronic component and sub-system design and integration.
Familiar with Aerospace wiring best practices for systems.
Real-time signal processing for electro-optical and infrared sensors.
Image enhancement/processing
AI algorithm development and deployment with CUDA GPUs
Experience with C/C++, MATLAB, optics, focal plane array and sensor technology desired.
Must be a U. S. citizen and have an existing DOD SECRET security clearance.*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $100,000.00 - $150,000.00 per year

Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,"Alaire Technologies, Inc.","Washington, DC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
115,Software Engineer Backend,$49k-$79k (Glassdoor Est.),"RealTruck, a Truck Hero company, specializes in truck and Jeep® accessories. We are a well-established, privately held, company that is transforming itself into a leading-edge technology company seeking to disrupt the automotive aftermarket e-commerce space. We have offices in Florida, North Dakota, Indiana and Missouri.

Our mission is to revolutionize the truck accessory industry by focusing on innovation, inspiration and unmatched service. We provide an immersive and engaging experience for truck enthusiasts with expert advice and comprehensive information on every product we sell.

Position Summary: The Backend Software Engineer plays a significant role in our Technology Team, helping drive the future direction of our systems and is responsible for developing and maintaining several aspects of our cutting edge cloud-based eCommerce platform.

Primary Responsibilities:
Work with backend team to develop and implement server-side solutions
Work with systems processing large amounts of data required to support operations
Write clean, maintainable, and testable code to ease further development. Provide reasonable test coverage using unit testing best practices
Research and recommend ways to improve and modernize existing systems
Education and Experience:
BS, Computer Science with 3+ years of experience, or equivalent working with Node, or other backend languages
Experience troubleshooting and optimizing existing code
Conceptual understanding of modern software practices including automated testing, and CI/CD
Understanding of public cloud PaaS (Heroku, DigitalOcean, or AWS)
Basic understanding of Docker/containers
Skills and Abilities:
Excellent communication and organizational skills
Experience working in a TDD environment
Experience working with an enterprise ERP system, especially NetSuite
Experience building with IaaS systems like AWS or GCP
Experience with functions as a service system like AWS Lambda or Azure Functions
Experience with event-driven architecture and asynchronous programming
In light of the current pandemic situation, to protect all team members we also require the ability to:
Pass daily pandemic health screening protocols which include responding to CDC recommended personal health and activity related questions.
Follow pandemic safety protocols which may include:
Wearing of an approved face covering at all times
Washing hands/use of hand sanitizer upon entry to facility and as needed throughout the day
Cleaning/disinfecting of personal work area
Maintaining social/physical distancing requirements (six feet from others) whenever possible
In some circumstances submitting to company paid virus testing through approved medical provider
Travel
10% or less.
Total Rewards!
Comprehensive Benefits Package for you and your family with coverage beginning the 1st of the month following the start of employment. This includes medical, dental, vision, basic life and AD&D, Short Term/Long Term Disability, Critical Illness, Accident, Hospital Indemnity, and Legal Coverage
Eligibility to participate in our company matching 401k plan after 30 days of employment.
PTO allowance with no waiting period.
Healthcare Flexible Spending Account and Dependent Care Flexible Spending Account.
Employee Assistance Program.
Tuition Reimbursement Program.
Employee discounts automotive aftermarket accessories.
Opportunities: To participate in some of our many different professional development programs offered, to give back to our community, support our Veterans, have fun at work, to be a part of something great, and much more!",3.7,"RealTruck - ECommerce
3.7","Fargo, ND",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Automotive Parts & Accessories Stores,Retail,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
116,Senior Data Engineer,$76k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Basic Qualifications :

Bachelor’s degree in systems engineering, a related specialized area or field is required (or equivalent experience) plus a minimum of 8 years of relevant experience; or Master's degree plus a minimum of 6 years of relevant experience. Agile experience preferred.

CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:

A TS/SCI security clearance with the ability to obtain a Polygraph is required at time of hire. Candidates must be able to obtain the Polygraph within a reasonable amount of time from date of hire. Applicants selected will be subject to a U.S. Government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Due to the nature of work performed within our facilities, U.S. citizenship is required.

Responsibilities for this Position:

Developing mission-critical systems that help keep people safe is what we do. At General Dynamics Mission Systems, you’ll be part of the team that helps heroes make a true impact. The work we do is important. The challenges we face are career-defining. The opportunity we can offer is one-of-a-kind.

We apply advanced technologies such as Artificial Intelligence, Blockchain, AR/VR, Cloud Native and Quantum Physics to solve our customers’ missions in cyber, RF, undersea, interstellar space and everything in between.

As a Senior Data Engineer, you’ll lead model and simulation activities as you participate in requirements analysis and management, functional analysis, performance analysis, system design, trade studies, systems integration and test (verification). It’s your chance to step up to the challenge and prove you’re ready to lead the world.

REPRESENTATIVE DUTIES AND TASKS:

We are seeking a Senior Data Engineer to support the Insider Threat mission. Data Engineers work with various security system data owners to automate data integration and collection strategies. Work closely with the data science team to ensure data cleanliness and accuracy.

Support data science team by designing, developing and implementing scalable ETL process for disparate datasets into a Hadoop infrastructure
Design, develop, implement and maintain data ingestion process from various disparate datasets using StreamSets (experience with StreamSets not mandatory)
Develop processes to identify data drift and malformed records
Develop technical documentation and standard operating procedures
Mentor new and junior data engineers
Leads technical tasks for small teams or projects

KNOWLEDGE SKILLS AND ABILITIES:

Working knowledge of entity resolution systems
Experience with messages systems like Kafka
Experience with NoSQL and/or graph databases like MongoDB or ArangoDB
Any of the following databases: SQL, MongoDB, Oracle, Postgres
Working experience with ETL processing
Working experience with data workflow products like StreamSets or NiFi
Working experience with Python RESTful API services, JDBC
Experience with Hadoop and Hive/Impala
Experience with Cloudera Data Science Workbench is a plus
Understanding of pySpark Leadership experience
Creative thinker
Ability to multi-task
Excellent use and understanding of data engineering concepts, principles, and theories

#CJ3

#CB

Company Overview:

General Dynamics Mission Systems (GDMS) engineers a diverse portfolio of high technology solutions, products and services that enable customers to successfully execute missions across all domains of operation. With a global team of 13,000+ top professionals, we partner with the best in industry to expand the bounds of innovation in the defense and scientific arenas. Given the nature of our work and who we are, we value trust, honesty, alignment and transparency. We offer highly competitive benefits and pride ourselves in being a great place to work with a shared sense of purpose. You will also enjoy a flexible work environment where contributions are recognized and rewarded. If who we are and what we do resonates with you, we invite you to join our high performance team!

General Dynamics is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer that is committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/Disability/Veteran",3.6,"General Dynamics Mission Systems, Inc
3.6","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1952,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
117,Senior Battery Scientist/Engineer,-1,"Position: Senior Battery Scientist/Engineer

Company: BrightVolt (www.brightvolt.com)

LOCATION: Indiana

REPORTS TO: Chief Battery Scientist

COMPENSATION: DOE

POSITION SUMMARY: The Senior Battery Scientist/Engineer’s primary responsibility will be product design & development of thin film batteries including product specification at the development level. The prospective candidate is expected to follow through from cradle to adult stages of the product: based on the performance requirement, ensure comprehensive qualification and validation of the design, transfer developed battery technology to scale up and manufacturing teams, work alongside production and quality teams to ensure that scaled up products meet required specifications, and address inadequate product performance if necessary. The ideal candidate will be familiar with the construction and manufacturing processes of lithium-based batteries and have successfully worked on various battery design configurations from concept to production. Some travel may be required.

CORE POSITION RESPONSIBILITIES
Product design: from concept to scale up including all ancillary requirements. (ie; regulatory, testing, etc.)
Project management: project conceptualization, execution, management, and reporting
Process improvement: Product development system operations, development and characterization of new processes, and improvement of existing process to improve battery performance
Working knowledge of Technical Sales to assist the Sales & Marketing teams on technical know-hows
COMPETENCIES
Execution: Able to translate designs and planning to actions and quantifiable results.
Quality: Commitment to product quality & customer satisfaction
Benchmark: Closely monitor current industry trends; benchmark competitive products and technologies to maintain BrightVolt’s leadership position in battery design and technology
Ownership: Be committed to product excellence, value, and continuous improvement (quality, service, and cost)
Personality: Positive, energetic, team oriented. Can effectively foster collaborative relationships with team members at all organizational levels.
SKILLS:
Strong organizational and project management skills.
High attention to details, accuracy and precision
Advanced communication (oral & written) and interpersonal skills
Demonstrated knowledge of cell and battery testing methodologies; interpretation and presentation of data.
Design of experiment (DOE) at development level
Failure analysis (FMEA), including validation testing, and root cause analysis
Knowledge in 6-sigma design concept a plus
MINIMUM POSITION REQUIREMENTS:
BS Engineering in Chemical, Electrochemical or Material Science w/minimum 10 years related industrial experience, or an advanced degree with minimum 5 yrs. related experience, in battery (primaries and secondary) design & development.
Demonstrated proficiency with MS Office, MS Project, etc.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Relocation assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Overtime
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
battery design/engineering: 5 years (Required)
private company battery design and engineer design: 5 years (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.brightvolt.com
Company's Facebook page:
BrightVolt
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.1,"BrightVolt
4.1","Newberry, IN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
118,Systems Engineer/Systems Integrator,$36k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Overview

Axle Informatics is a scientific research and information technology company that offers innovative computer services, informatics, and bioresearch solutions to research centers and healthcare organizations around the globe. With experts in software engineering, bioinformatics, molecular research, and program management, we focus on developing and applying technological tools and scientific techniques to empower the world of research. We work with some of the top research organizations and facilities in the country including multiple institutes at the National Institutes of health (NIH), which means candidates will be receiving the best on-the-job training possible in this field.

Axle is seeking a highly ambitious, adaptable, structured, and detail-oriented Systems Engineer/Systems Integrator to join our vibrant team at Bethesda, MD.

Responsibilities:

Provides expertise on a broad range of skills, including but not limited to: cloud architecture, infrastructure, application development, and database management
Translate client requirements into technical design and determine appropriate technology solutions
Oversee the development, technical review, and implementation of integrated systems to fit specific client needs using from component subsystems
Interacts and coordinates with data science and engineering teams to reach a singular unified goal
Take an active role in the development process to deliver solutions for challenging problems
Maintain a comprehensive and holistic view of system-wide platforms when designing and implementing solutions

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Bioinformatics or other related field, years of work experience will be considered in lieu of degree
3+ years experience working with JavaScript and Python (Java and C/C++ a large plus)
3+ experience with multiple cloud services (AWS, GCP, Azure)
Experience with the following is preferred:
TypeScript
Node.js
Angular 6+
SQL databases (MySQL, PostgreSQL)
NoSQL databases (MongoDB, Cassandra)
Containers and container orchestration tools (Docker, Kubernetes)
DevOps tools (Jenkins, TravisCI)
Higher level education will be considered in lieu of relevant work experience
Demonstrated ability to quickly learn/adopt new technologies
Critical thinking, problem solving, and attention to detail
Communication and soft skills
Familiarity working in an Agile environment

Benefits

Paid Time Off (PTO)
10 Paid Federal holidays
Generous health coverage provided with no monthly premium to the employee
Generous vision and dental coverage provided with no monthly premium to the employee
Short and Long-Term Disability coverage (paid by company)
Basic Life and AD&D coverage (paid by company; option to purchase additional coverage)
401(K) with significant company match & no vesting period
Competitive salaries with performance bonus opportunities
Discount plan for pet care, legal services, & identify theft protection
Flexible Spending Accounts:
Healthcare (FSA)
Parking Reimbursement Account (PRK)
Dependent Care Assistant Program (DCAP)
Transportation Reimbursement Account (TRN)

The diversity of Axle’s employees is a tremendous asset. We are firmly committed to providing equal opportunity in all aspects of employment and will not tolerate any illegal discrimination or harassment based age, race, gender, religion, national origin, disability, marital status, covered veteran status, sexual orientation, status with respect to public assistance, and other characteristics protected under state, federal, or local law and to deter those who aid, abet, or induce discrimination or coerce others to discriminate.

Accessibility: If you need an accommodation as part of the employment process please contact:

Email: careers@axleinfo.com

Disclaimer: The above description is meant to illustrate the general nature of work and level of effort being performed by individual’s assigned to this position or job description. This is not restricted as a complete list of all skills, responsibilities, duties, and/or assignments required. Individuals may be required to perform duties outside of their position, job description or responsibilities as needed.",3.9,"Axle Informatics
3.9","Rockville, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
119,Disaster Recovery Engineer/Architect,-1,"About Highlight:

Know Way. Know How.

For over ten years, Highlight has provided Development and Modernization, Secure IT and Mission Solutions for our federal government customers. We know the technology; we understand the way our customers and their stakeholders work; and we know how to implement industry best practices for development and services, delivering end-to-end solutions that minimize risk and maximize results.

Overview:

You will join a team which is responsible for ensuring the Department of State's IT programs and system capabilities are in place to meet vital Diplomatic and National Security needs. You will help the State Department meet its mission to lead “America’s foreign policy through diplomacy, advocacy, and assistance by advancing the interests of the American people, their safety and economic prosperity.”

To do this, we need highly skilled professionals with a history of successfully supporting IT systems and platforms to meet missions of national importance. You will efficiently and effectively deliver support to ensure the welfare and protection of U.S. citizens abroad, for the issuance of passports and other documentation to citizens and nationals, and for the protection of U.S. border security and the facilitation of legitimate travel to the United States.

As an DR Network Engineer/Architect, you will be focused on the networks you will oversee and on reviewing the testing and implementation of planning to ensure that the integrity and security of all electronic data and data systems are adequately protected. This work includes developing and maintain the requirements and operations to support the DR program to include policies, standards, guidelines, training programs. You will assist in the development and implementation of the client’s networks to support disaster recovery operation at HQ and other offices.

Responsibilities:
Supports the preparation of an organization-wide business resumption plan.
Assists in the coordination and establishment of disaster recovery programs and business resumption planning across all enterprise platforms.
Coordinates and monitors simulation testing across all networks and platforms.
With a focus on networks, you will support the design and administration of the DR programs to include policies, standards, guidelines, training programs, as well as a viable quality assurance process for disaster recovery.
Qualifications:
Current Secret clearance required.
Bachelor's degree required.
5+ years of experience.
Must possess strong communication and organizational skills.
Ability to interface and coordinate work efficiently and effectively with multiple groups and organizations.
:

#nw",4.0,"Highlight Technologies, LLC
4.0",Virginia,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
120,Senior Quality Engineer - Design Assurance,-1,"Job Summary*
SetPoint Medical is seeking an experienced quality engineer to work collaboratively in a cross-functional environment to ensure the delivery of high-quality development projects within approved program schedules. The Senior Quality Engineer will be responsible for the generation and/or review of all design control and risk management activities.

All candidates will be asked to describe in detail their individual as well as team contributions towards development and testing activities within a Class II/III medical device environment.
Job Responsibilities*
Provide functional input during development project planning to accurately assess resource and scheduling considerations
Partner with Product Development and other cross-functional team members to define design input (i.e. Customer, System, Hardware, Software Requirements)
Review and approve design input and design output documentation
Partner with Product Development, other cross-functional team members and consultants/external test houses to define design verification and validation testing
Assist in the execution of dry runs and in oversight of official V&V testing
Review and approve verification and validation test plans and test reports
Represent as lead quality assurance team member in design review and phase review meetings
Drive project/system level risk management deliverables (i.e. plans, Device Hazard Analyses, reports, and Risk Management)
Review and approve other cross-functionally developed risk management deliverables (i.e. uFMEA, pFMEA)
Review and assess all proposed changes (i.e. Change Requests, Special Rework Instructions) to ensure proper level of testing supports implementation
Verify development project documentation is in compliance with Company procedures
Current working knowledge of 21 CFR Part 820, ISO 13485, ISO 14971, and other standards as required
Other projects as assigned
Minimum Qualifications*
Bachelor's degree in Engineering, related technology, or equivalent experience required; MS preferred
Medical device industry experience of 5 or more years required
Experience with Class III sterile, implantable electromechanical devices utilizing microcontrollers strongly preferred
Demonstrated individual and team-based contributions towards development and testing activities
GD&T skills and knowledge is desirable
Quality System Knowledge including 21 CFR 820, ISO 13485, and ISO 14971
Demonstrated skills in statistical analysis
Required Skills and Abilities*
Work collaboratively and effectively on cross-functional teams to meet development project goals
Ability to effectively support multiple high priority deliverables at once
Outstanding written and oral communication skills
High attention to detail
Ability to review, analyze, summarize, and interpret data to draw conclusions and make appropriate recommendations and decisions
Must be able to write clear, understandable written reports, and give oral presentations
Strong organizational and time management skills
Ability to take a creative and proactive approach when considering resolutions and/or alternatives
Effective interpersonal/communication skills
Company Description*
SetPoint Medical is an early-stage medical device company developing the first implantable bioelectronic device for the treatment of chronic inflammatory diseases.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $115,000.00 - $125,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Medical Device Industry: 5 years (Preferred)
Class III sterile, implantable electromechanical device: 1 year (Preferred)
Quality Systems Knowledge: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
High school or equivalent (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.setpointmedical.com
Work Remotely:
No",3.5,"SetPoint Medical
3.5","Santa Clarita, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
121,Mechanical Engineer Lead,$50k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"Our client is seeking a Mechanical Engineer Lead to assist in guiding the team responsible for the design, development, production, integration and life cycle support of the company’s Government projects group products used aboard Navy submarines, ships, and aircraft. This group designs, develops, demonstrates, produces, assembles, tests and delivers SONAR arrays and electronic assemblies. This team works with the Navy, internal production staff and the representatives from other companies to advance military weapon performance and lower production costs.

Mechanical Engineer Lead Responsibilities
• Design and analyze components and electro-mechanical assemblies
• Create and maintain mechanical solid models and drawings using SolidWorks
• Create and manage bills of material (BOM) within the company data management system
• Develop fixtures and equipment to support testing and production efforts
• Develop and present PowerPoint slides documenting design progress
• Participate in various technical and program meetings on a weekly basis
• Develop technical presentations, recommendations, and written communications to explain technical issues to program management and the Navy customer team.

Mechanical Engineer Lead Qualifications:
• Experience with SolidWorks product suite
• Experience developing detailed designs of mechanical systems
• Experience with GD&T per ASME Y14.5
• Strong documentation and communication skills
• Experience with ruggedized electronics packaging a plus
• Familiarity with Navy environmental qualification test standards a plus
• Ability to perform structural and thermal analyses (FEA) on components and systems

• B. S (or higher) Degree in Mechanical, Electrical or Industrial Engineering or a related technical field (or equivalent experience) is required

• 5 years plus of engineering experience required

• Effective leadership skills, technical acumen, an educational background and expertise

This position requires the applicant to obtain and maintain a DoD Clearance

TriMech Services is an engineering resource provider specializing in the placement of qualified technical candidates for both temporary and direct hire opportunities. TriMech Services offers a unique approach to matching the specialized skill sets of our candidates to our clients engineering specific requirements.",3.4,"TriMech Services
3.4","Pittsburgh, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
122,Electrical Engineer Lead – Embedded Systems,$61k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"Seeking an Electrical Engineer Section Lead with Embedded Systems design experience to lead a team comprised of design, system engineering, electrical engineering, mechanical engineering and production associates to develop power systems for embedded systems electronics to include products used aboard Navy submarines, ships, and aircraft. This group designs, develops, demonstrates, produces, assembles, tests and delivers torpedo SONAR arrays and electronic assemblies

Electrical Engineer Section Lead – Embedded Systems Responsibilities

Lead a team comprised of design, system engineering, electrical engineering, mechanical engineering and production associates to develop embedded systems.

Perform System Engineering, requirements decomposition, and manage the Allocated, Development, and preliminary Product baseline.

Assist the program management team in planning, scheduling establishing performance targets and reporting routine status in support of program execution.

Manage and contribute to the effort to design, simulate, and implement embedded systems.

Perform component and architecture trade studies to determine optimal system solutions.

Document and present trade studies, analyses, test results, status, etc. to the team.

Generate design and interface documentation.

Manage and contribute to the effort to design and develop software and firmware for embedded processor and FPGA based systems.

Manage and contribute to the effort to integrate, test, troubleshoot, and verify hardware & firmware.

Develop test criteria and assist in the design of test systems including test software applications.

Develop technical presentations, recommendations, and written communications to explain technical issues to program management and the Navy customer team.

Provide inputs and technical expertise in creating estimates to support new work proposals.

Electrical Engineer Section Lead – Embedded Systems Qualifications

Possess effective leadership skills, technical acumen, an educational background and expertise (experience preferred) in embedded digital, signal processing and power systems design, development and troubleshooting.

Experience in FPGA design, VHDL design and verification.

Xilinx development environment, integrated and soft-core processors, schematic entry using OrCAD Capture, analog signal conditioning, data acquisition, and power regulators a plus.

Strong documentation and writing skills.

Ability to rapidly adapt to handling electronic system technical issues found in system integration labs, field environments and during production.

Ability to steadily develop knowledge/expertise across the various tactical baselines and platforms.

Reliable, motivated and able to lead mixed discipline engineering teams.

B.S (or higher) degree in Electrical Engineering or a related technical field (or equivalent experience) is required.

Minimum of 10 years engineering experience required.

This position requires the applicant to obtain and maintain a DoD Clearance.

TriMech Services is an engineering resource provider specializing in the placement of qualified technical candidates for both temporary and direct hire opportunities. TriMech Services offers a unique approach to matching the specialized skill sets of our candidates to our clients engineering specific requirements",3.4,"TriMech Services
3.4","Pittsburgh, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
123,Data Engineer,$52k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview

ID.me is a digital identity network and our mission is to make the world a more trusted place by facilitating transparent and efficient interactions between people and organizations.

We are looking for a Data Engineer to join our Product team to design and build a robust set of tools and pipelines to support data analytics efforts. You’ll manage and optimize our core infrastructure by creating and maintaining data pipelines. You will work with other engineers and analysts from the Product and Business teams to design, implement, and maintain a data ecosystem that delivers actionable insights to make key business decisions. You have technical chops but can also work independently to prioritize issues, work within ambiguity, and manage conflicting deadlines. You are creative, data-driven, results-oriented, and eager to help us solve data problems of varying complexities.

Responsibilities
Develop technical solutions using proven techniques in data and analytics processes
Develop, prototype, and build frameworks based on open source and commercially available tools
Orchestrate and maintain data pipelines that meet security standards and ensure the integrity and quality of data
Demonstrate a passion for serving the needs of internal and external customers by enabling them with self-service reporting tools and analytics capabilities
Drive the execution of data initiatives that provide key performance metrics
Understand the data related challenges, nuances, and requirements to identify and recommend the optimal technical approach
Train and educate team members as well as stakeholders about best practices in data engineering and governance
Collaborate closely with the engineering and devops team to implement DataOps, thus reducing our analytics development cycle
Research and improve our data platform to ingest, process, transform, and distribute insightful data to our audience ranging from executives, analysts, and engineers to customers, vendors, and partners
Evangelize data driven culture by breaking down silos and encouraging data sharing
Qualifications
3+ years of hands-on experience in data engineering for a SaaS company or a mature startup
Proven experience working with various tools but more importantly, familiarity with how to best assemble and deploy production ready data stack to any cloud environment
BS in a quantitative or scientific field such as computer science, computer engineering or equivalent experience
Experience in applying agile software development approach - Git, CI/CD, Jira, etc - to data engineering
Familiar with SQL and other popular programming languages (such as Ruby, Python, .NET, etc)
Exceptional fluency with SQL; you conquered the join venn diagram long ago and have moved on to explaining cost based optimization to your peers on the engineering team
Some level of experience working in the cloud - AWS, Azure, or GCP
Experience with ingesting, processing, and visualizing data sources of varying types - structured/relational and unstructured
Experience in developing, managing, and manipulating large, complex datasets
Data-driven, detail-oriented individual with excellent storytelling and problem-solving abilities
Ability to work independently and autonomously, as well as part of a team
Superb time management, prioritization of tasks and ability to meet deadlines with little supervision
Vision: To be the world's leading digital identity network empowering people to control their own information and to prove their credentials across all channels: online, call center, and in-person.

Mission: To make the world a more trusted place by delivering the highest level of security with the least amount of friction at the lowest possible cost.

People: We have an audacious mission. We aim to fix the identity layer of the internet. Billions of people will live better lives with more trust and convenience thanks to ID.me. We are like Special Forces. We take on the most difficult challenges with amazing teammates.

ID.me Core Values: *Don't be a jerk. *Always compete. *Ask questions like a 5-year old. *Inspire people with your passion. *Make something better every day. *Treat each customer like your favorite family member. *Own your mistakes so you can learn from them. *Details are everything. *Communicate like a scientist. *Be truthful (even when it's hard). *Reflect ID.me's values in your actions. *Act like an owner.

ID.me Career Site & Culture Deck: https://www.id.me/careers",3.2,"Id.me
3.2","McLean, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
124,AWS Cloud Data Architect Developer,$79k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"The goal of this data warehousing project is to integrate a federal agency’s most important structured data within a new AWS Cloud data mart, and there optimize it for reporting and analytic uses. On a daily basis the agency needs to have source data from multiple systems extracted, loaded to the data mart, transformed, and integrated so that reports and data visualizations can be generated to provide complete and accurate information for both internal users and external stakeholders.
Click here to learn about BRMi's culture.

Technical Responsibilities
Help estimate and plan phases of work
Collaborate with the agency and the agency's service provider to configure and manage the AWS development environment
Document security mechanisms used to securely ingest, store, process, and transmit data
Perform technical analysis, data analysis, technical design, ELT development, and testing to support stakeholder requirements and user stories
Create conceptual, logical, and physical data models (both normalized and dimensional) that adhere to industry best practices for data integrity, data quality, scalability, extensibility, and performance
Develop and deliver incremental versions of a scalable data mart that meets the agency’s requirements for data integration
Create source-to-target mappings for all data elements required for the data mart
Provide back-end data development and technical support for MicroStrategy, the client's recently implemented tool for BI and Analytics
Ensure that both the Cloud data mart and MicroStrategy are properly integrated and that the data mart is optimized to support MicroStrategy's reporting and analytic functions
Engage in iterative data development to continuously extend the agency's data analytics capabilities
Architect and develop a solution for real-time operational reporting and querying against a subset of critical agency data
Perform structured problem solving involved complex data
Adhere to standards, Agile methodology, and compliance requirements
Document the technical solution and all related processes
Team and Client Responsibilities
Help facilitate the writing and grooming of client user stories
Collaborate with other team members, architects, and stakeholders to design technical solutions that meet the client’s needs and expectations
Provide demonstrations of data mart and analytics capabilities to agency stakeholders
Provide written and oral status reports on work performed, work planned, issues or obstacles encountered, and project risk

The ideal candidate for this effort has a strong background in ETL/ELT development for data warehouses, both Cloud and on-premise data architecture, and the tools and services that are available in the AWS stack
Minimum Requirements
5+ years of experience with ETL/ELT development, data warehouse architecture, and data modeling
5+ years of experience with manipulating SQL- and NoSQL-based file types and data structures and troubleshooting query performance, joins, aggregations, and analytic functions
3+ years of experience with Cloud-based architectures for data processing, ETL/ELT, and with data ingestion tools such as S3 and AWS Glue
1+ year of experience as a development team member in an Agile/Scrum environment
1+ year of experience supporting an enterprise BI or analytic tool
Expertise in data management and in best practices associated with data integrity
Proven success in analyzing reporting requirements and providing solutions that meet business needs
Working proficiency with complex data from multiple data sources to understand underlaying data structures and architecture
Familiarity with structured data formats, including JSON, XML, and XHTML
Strong background in developing and automating operations and workflow procedures for data transformation
Experience with deployment of automation tools
Proficiency in Python
Proven ability to work creatively and analytically in a problem-solving environment
Ability to work in diverse environments and communicate complex ideas to teammates, clients, and non-technical experts
Excellent documentation habits
Excellent communication skills (written and oral) and interpersonal skills
Highly motivated, good attention to detail, and able to follow through on tasks
Self-starter with ability to perform and lead work independently
Team player
Bachelor's degree and certifications in a technical field
US Citizenship
Desired Qualifications
AWS Certified Solution Architect or comparable certification (Google Cloud Professional Cloud Architect, Google Professional Data Engineer, or Microsoft Azure Architect)
Strong experience with the tools and services in the AWS stack, including Pipelines, Glue, RDS, and AWS Lake Formation
Previous consulting or client service delivery experience with enterprise BI and analytic tools
Previous consulting or client service delivery experience on AWS
EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disabled
We are an equal opportunity employer that values diversity and commitment at all levels. All individuals, regardless of personal characteristics, are encouraged to apply. Employment policies and decisions on employment and promotion are based on merit, qualifications, performance, and business needs. The decisions and criteria governing the employment relationship with all employees are made in a nondiscriminatory manner, without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, marital status, physical or mental disability, medical condition, veteran status, or any other factor determined to be unlawful by federal, state, or local statutes.",4.3,"BRMi
4.3","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
125,Senior Test Engineer - 704th Test Group,$59k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB TITLE: Senior Test Engineer - 704th Test Group

PROJECT OVERVIEW:

""This position is contingent upon contract award""

The Aerospace Survivability and Safety Office (704th Test Group (TG)/Operating Location (OL)-AC) is the preeminent aircraft survivability and landing gear safety resource for the United States Air Force (USAF). The 704th TG/OL-AC supports Department of Defense (DoD) acquisition and sustainment requirements through world-class capabilities for aircraft survivability and landing gear systems Research, Development, Acquisition, Test, and Evaluation (RDAT&E), enabling more survivable and safe aircraft operation by the warfighter.

The 704th TG/OL-AC consists of the Survivability Assessment Flight and Landing Gear Test Flight. These two Flights are tailored to their distinct survivability assessment (OL- Aircraft Vehicle Survivability Facility (ACS)) and unique landing gear safety (OL-Aircraft Landing Gear Facility (ACL)) missions. These Flights support their missions through basic Research, Development, Test, and Evaluation (RDT&E), platform integration, demonstration, and Title 10 Live Fire Test and Evaluation (LFT&E).

JOB DESCRIPTION AND RESPONSIBILITIES:

Provides test and evaluation of hardware and/or software development. This includes developing and documenting test plans and procedures, conducting testing, and evaluating and documenting results. Prepares studies, plans, and analyses in support of the program.

REQUIRED SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:

Security Clearance: Secret
Active Secret (DoD) clearance required
Bachelors Degree in electrical, aerospace, systems, or mechanical engineering
10 years of experience in test & evaluation planning, execution, data recording & reporting
DAWIA Level III, Test & Evaluation
Familiar with a variety of the test & evaluation concepts, practices, and procedures
DESIRED SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:
Masters Degree in electrical, aerospace, systems, or mechanical engineering
Survivability and/or lethality testing
Modeling & Simulation experience
WORK LOCATION: Wright-Patterson, OH

TRAVEL: 15%

KEY WORDS: Test & Evaluation, Live Fire, Lethality, Survivability, Modeling & Simulation, Test Instrumentation

WBB is a technical and management consulting company that provides innovative products and services that solve government and commercial customers toughest problems. For more than 30 years, WBB has set the standard for excellence in consulting services, while providing its employees with an outstanding work environment with ample opportunities for growth and success. WBB continues to enjoy impressive growth, which is directly attributed to the companys hiring practice of always hiring the very best professionals from government, military and industry.

We are proud of our diverse environment and are an Equal Opportunity Employer. WBB is committed to a policy of equal employment opportunity. WBB participates in E-Verify.

WBB does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of WBB and WBB will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.",4.1,"Whitney, Bradley and Brown
4.1","Dayton, OH",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
126,Senior Software Engineer (TS/SCI w/ Poly),-1,"Nexxis Solutions is looking for Senior Software Engineers to develop software solutions for our US Government customers. You will lead and support Agile teams to define software requirements and take the lead on operational and technical projects. In this role, you should be able to work independently with little supervision. You should have excellent organization and problem-solving skills. If you have hands-on experience in software development, DevOps, and/or Agile methodologies, we’d like to meet you. Your goal will be to develop high-quality software that is aligned with user and mission needs. *Responsibilities* * Develop high-quality software design and architecture to solve mission-critical challenges for US Government customers using the latest technologies. * Identify, prioritize and execute tasks in the software development life cycle * Develop tools and applications by producing clean, efficient code * Automate tasks through appropriate tools and scripting * Review and debug code * Perform validation and verification testing * Collaborate with customers and team members to fix and improve mission products * Document development phases and monitor systems * Ensure software is up-to-date with latest technologies *Skills* * *An active TS/SCI clearance with polygraph is required.* * Proven experience as a Senior Software Engineer * Extensive experience in software development, scripting and project management * Knowledge of selected programming languages (e.g. Java, Python, C/C++) * In-depth knowledge of relational databases (e.g. PostgreSQL, MySQL) and NoSQL databases (e.g. MongoDB). * Familiarity with various operating systems (Linux, Mac OS, Windows) * Familiarity with modern DevOps tools and modern platforms (Docker, Kubernetes, VMWare, OpenShift). * Familiarity with Big Data/Cloud Platforms and Processing Solutions (Accumulo, Spark, AWS, Azure, etc.) * Analytical mind with problem-solving aptitude * Ability to work independently * Excellent organizational and leadership skills * BSc/BA in Computer Science, Information Systems, Electrical Engineering, or a related degree Job Type: Full-time Pay: $150,000.00 - $230,000.00 per year Benefits: * 401(k) * 401(k) matching * Dental insurance * Disability insurance * Flexible spending account * Health insurance * Life insurance * Paid time off * Professional development assistance * Referral program * Retirement plan * Tuition reimbursement * Vision insurance Schedule: * 8 hour shift * Monday to Friday Supplemental Pay: * Signing bonus Experience: * Software Engineering: 10 years (Required) Education: * Bachelor's (Required) Security Clearance Required: * Top Secret (Required) Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available: * No: Not providing sponsorship for this job This Job Is: * A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to apply Company's website: * https://www.nexxissolutions.com Company's Facebook page: * https://www.facebook.com/nexxissolutions Benefit Conditions: * Only full-time employees eligible Work Remotely: * No",-1,"Nexxis Solutions, Inc.","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
127,"Senior Software Engineer, Distributed Systems (Cloud)",$83k-$160k (Glassdoor Est.),"Come join a winning team!

Take a walk around our offices and you’ll see a dedicated group of professionals who care about improving health care. Our team thrives on collaboration and sharing ideas, whether in a cross-functional meeting or at one of our office events.

While we're diverse in our backgrounds and skills, we have much in common. A passion for our mission. A strong sense of integrity. A belief that we're making a positive impact and a commitment to having fun.

We are seeking a Senior Software Engineer for our Lexington, MA office.

Job Summary

As a Senior Software Engineer on a highly skilled Cloud Platform team, you will be expanding and improving common libraries and services used by the rest of the engineering organization to expose application features and functionality in the cloud. You will focus on backend infrastructure, while leveraging proven distributed systems experience. You will strive to make the system faster to build, better tested, easier to deploy and more observable.

Duties and Responsibilities
Play an important role in the design and implementation of our highly scalable hosted (SaaS) solutions, with lots of autonomy while receiving guidance and feedback to help you grow
Assume full range of software engineering responsibilities, including architecture, design, development, testing and production support
Collaborate with DevOps, Product Management, Release Delivery, Customer Support and other groups towards developing most optimal solutions and troubleshooting issues
Practice modern agile software development practices that deliver high quality code: continuous integration and deployment, and automated testing
Qualifications
BS/MS degree in Computer Science or related field, and 5+ years of relevant work experience
Outstanding technical problem-solving, design and coding skills
A proven ability to learn and adapt to new, complex development environments with deep dive analytical skills
2 + years’ experience building distributed highly scalable hosted (SaaS) solutions
Java expertise
Proficiency with relational data stores
Dedicated to producing quality code through best practices
Desired Skills
Programming in functional paradigm language, such as Scala
Experience with distributed streaming platforms, such as Kafka
Reactive programming principles using frameworks like Akka and Play
Working knowledge of Java open source frameworks
Deep familiarity with RESTful Web APIs, JSON, web services and Linux environment
Cryptography, security, and data privacy
Experience developing for Continuous Deployment on AWS, GCP or similar
At Imprivata, we have a top-notch work environment, developmental opportunities, a competitive total rewards package, and the desire to have fun. If you have the skills and qualifications as we have described above, we want to hear from you!

Imprivata provides equal employment opportunities to minorities, females, veterans, and disabled individuals, as well as other protected groups.",3.4,"Imprivata
3.4","Lexington, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
128,Data Engineer,$69k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

NJVC, LLC

Company Job Title: Data Engineer

Clearance: Top Secret with ability to obtain SCI

Location: Springfield, VA

Reports To: Program Manager

FLSA Status: Exempt, Full Time, Regular

Summary:

The Data Engineer will work with product owners and data stewards to deliver high quality technical solutions in response to business requirements. You will be counted on to provide your peers with technical expertise that will offer solutions for difficult programming problems.

Duties and Responsibilities:
SQL Server Integration Services (SSIS) including UI and custom code features.
Write or create stored procedures, SQL scripts, SSIS packages that can be used to:
Move data from source databases to target databases
Clean / Condition data
Convert or transform data
Reconcile and confirm converted data
Find data errors
Validate data to business rules
Ability to examine existing ETL scripts and track data back to source
SQL Server administration, tuning, and workbench.
Work with business experts to understand data and complete data mappings.
Focus on the development of extract, transform, and load (ETL) jobs currently using Microsoft SQL, Server, and SSIS.
The environment currently supports hundreds of related ETL jobs that move data between 30 different source systems and between multiple classifications.
Part of the challenge as a data engineer will be to find scalable and efficient coding solutions that plug into this extensible system in order to add more data to the Enterprise data store.
Other duties as assigned
Minimum Qualifications: (To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.)
Bachelor’s Degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field
Equivalent years of experience in lieu of degree
4 years of relevant experience with the following software / tools:
Experience with Microsoft SQL
Prior experience supporting IC/DoD
The existing data warehouse is built on Microsoft SQL hosted on Amazon Web Services (AWS), so experience developing solutions that scale well in these environments is a plus.
Active Top-Secret Clearance with ability to obtain SCI
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Ability to work independently and yet be effective within a team setting
Must be capable of managing multiple efforts with time related constraints in a fast-paced contracting environment
Demonstrated ability to effectively communicate and collaborate with diverse internal and external stakeholder groups and individuals
Friendly presence, helpful attitude, good interpersonal skills, and ability to work well with others.
Excellent skills in Microsoft Word, Excel, and other Office applications
Proficient with Microsoft Office Applications, and experience working in a home office setting as well as the ability to train end users on frequently asked technical issues.
Ability to provide technical assistance and support over the phone; good phone skills, professional demeanor, previous customer service experience strongly desired.
Good problem-solving skills; ability to visualize a problem/situation and think abstractly to solve it

Physical Demands: (The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.)
While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee is frequently required to walk; use hands to finger, handle, or feel and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stand; climb or balance and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision.
Work Environment: (The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.)
The employee will normally work in a temperature-controlled office environment, with frequent exposure to electronic office equipment.
During visits to areas of operations, may be exposed to extreme cold or hot weather conditions. Is occasionally exposed to fumes or airborne particles, toxic or caustic chemicals, and loud noise.
Chenega Corporation and family of companies is an EOE.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Native preference under PL 93-638.

We participate in the E-Verify Employment Verification Program.

Primary Location: United States-Virginia-Springfield

Organization: NJVC
Strategic Business Unit: Military Intelligence and Operations Support
Security Requirements: Top Secret
Job Schedule: Full Time Exempt
Recruiter: Jonas Patterson
Req ID: 2000001203",4.3,"Chenega MIOS
4.3","Springfield, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
129,Cisco Unified Computing System (UCS) Data Center Engineer - Senior,$59k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Type of Requisition:

Pipeline

Clearance Level Must Currently Possess:

Top Secret/SCI

Clearance Level Must Be Able to Obtain:

Top Secret/SCI

Suitability:

Polygraph

Public Trust/Other Required:

Job Family:

Systems Engineering

Job Description:

Serve as a SME on UCS assisting in the implementation, configuration, maintenance, and support for an enterprise-level Cisco UCS Platform, which involves heavy Windows Server 2008R2/2012, VMware ESX, and Storage and Cisco switching technologies. Position will provide technical guidance and leadership to the Government and will work closely with IT leaders to set strategy and direction for designated technologies.

Performance shall include:
Implementing, configuring and supporting an enterprise Cisco UCS Environment, which includes Cisco UCS B-Series and C-Series Servers, with SLES, Redhat, Debian Linux, Windows 20xx, and VMware ESXi 5.x, 6.x environment
Working with Cisco UCS Manager
Configuring, supporting and provisioning the virtual server environment P2V conversions, V2V conversions, vCenter Ops Manager, etc.
Configuring, supporting and provisioning bare metal installations of Windows 20xx, and various flavors of Linux
Coordinating with managed services for provisioning and deploying a UCS infrastructure
Experience with UCS Central required
Experience with UCS Director or VMware vRealize suite preferable
Participation in full life-cycle of systems engineering activities of high-quality, scalable solutions
Experience:
Minimum of 8 years related experience
Education:
• Bachelors degree in a related area or equivalent experience (4 years)
Certifications:
Must meet position and certification requirements outlined in DoD Directive 8570.01-M for Information Assurance Technician Level 2 within 6 months of the date of hire
Security Clearance:
Current Top Secret Clearance with SCI Eligibility
Eligibility for access to Special Access Program Information
Willingness to submit to a Counterintelligence polygraph
Scheduled Weekly Hours:

40

Travel Required:

Less than 10%

Telecommuting Options:

Telecommuting Not Allowed

Work Location:

USA DC Washington

Additional Work Locations:

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
130,Civil Engineer II,$61k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"General Summary*
Civil Engineer II will perform engineering duties in planning, designing, and overseeing construction and maintenance of land development, oil field, and public infrastructure. Facilities include, but are not limited to, roads, storm drain, and water and sewage systems.
Essential Job Function*
Provide design of land development, oil field, or public agency projects.
Inspect project sites to monitor progress and ensure conformance to design specifications and safety or sanitation standards.
Compute grade requirements, and/or flow rates, to determine design specifications.
Plan and design transportation or hydraulic systems and structures, following construction and government standards, using design software and drawing tools.
Analyze survey reports, maps, drawings, aerial photography, and other topographical or geologic data to plan projects.
Perform design computations and plan detailing for compliance with codes, manuals, and design consideration for clients.
Other duties as apply.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities*
Great verbal and oral communication
Able to give and receive guidance
Critical thinking
Problem solving skills
Must have knowledge of AutoCAD Civil3D
Education and Experience*
Bachelor of Science Degree in Civil Engineering, Agricultural Engineering, or closely related field

Possess a California P.E. license in Civil Engineering

Must possess 4-8 years’ experience in Civil Engineering and Design

Must possess 4-5 years’ experience using ACAD

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://dpsiinc.com/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/DiversifiedProjectServices/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible",2.7,"Diversified Project Services International (DPSI)
2.7","San Luis Obispo, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
131,Data Engineer,$67k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

NJVC, LLC

Company Job Title: Data Engineer

Clearance: Top Secret with ability to obtain SCI

Location: Springfield, VA

Reports To: Program Manager

FLSA Status: Exempt, Full Time, Regular

Summary:

The Data Engineer will work with product owners and data stewards to deliver high quality technical solutions in response to business requirements. You will be counted on to provide your peers with technical expertise that will offer solutions for difficult programming problems.

Duties and Responsibilities:

SQL Server Integration Services (SSIS) including UI and custom code features.
Write or create stored procedures, SQL scripts, SSIS packages that can be used to:
Move data from source databases to target databases
Clean / Condition data
Convert or transform data
Reconcile and confirm converted data
Find data errors
Validate data to business rules
Ability to examine existing ETL scripts and track data back to source
SQL Server administration, tuning, and workbench.
Work with business experts to understand data and complete data mappings.
Focus on the development of extract, transform, and load (ETL) jobs currently using Microsoft SQL, Server, and SSIS.
The environment currently supports hundreds of related ETL jobs that move data between 30 different source systems and between multiple classifications.
Part of the challenge as a data engineer will be to find scalable and efficient coding solutions that plug into this extensible system in order to add more data to the Enterprise data store.
Other duties as assigned

Minimum Qualifications: (To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.)

Bachelor’s Degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field
Equivalent years of experience in lieu of degree
4 years of relevant experience with the following software / tools:
Experience with Microsoft SQL
Prior experience supporting IC/DoD
The existing data warehouse is built on Microsoft SQL hosted on Amazon Web Services (AWS), so experience developing solutions that scale well in these environments is a plus.
Active Top-Secret Clearance with ability to obtain SCI

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:

Ability to work independently and yet be effective within a team setting
Must be capable of managing multiple efforts with time related constraints in a fast-paced contracting environment
Demonstrated ability to effectively communicate and collaborate with diverse internal and external stakeholder groups and individuals
Friendly presence, helpful attitude, good interpersonal skills, and ability to work well with others.
Excellent skills in Microsoft Word, Excel, and other Office applications
Proficient with Microsoft Office Applications, and experience working in a home office setting as well as the ability to train end users on frequently asked technical issues.
Ability to provide technical assistance and support over the phone; good phone skills, professional demeanor, previous customer service experience strongly desired.

Good problem-solving skills; ability to visualize a problem/situation and think abstractly to solve it

Physical Demands: (The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.)

While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee is frequently required to walk; use hands to finger, handle, or feel and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stand; climb or balance and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision.

Work Environment: (The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.)

The employee will normally work in a temperature-controlled office environment, with frequent exposure to electronic office equipment.
During visits to areas of operations, may be exposed to extreme cold or hot weather conditions. Is occasionally exposed to fumes or airborne particles, toxic or caustic chemicals, and loud noise.

Chenega Corporation and family of companies is an EOE.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Native preference under PL 93-638.

We participate in the E-Verify Employment Verification Program.

Primary Location: United States-Virginia-Springfield

Organization: NJVC

Strategic Business Unit: Military Intelligence and Operations Support

Security Requirements: Top Secret

Job Schedule: Full Time Exempt

Recruiter: Jonas Patterson

Req ID: 2000001203",2.9,"Chenega Corporation
2.9","Springfield, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
132,SonicWall Firewall Engineer,-1,"Solutions Granted, Inc. (an Equal Opportunity Employer & Drug Free Work Zone) is a Master Managed Security Service Provider located in Woodbridge, VA. Due to explosive growth and opportunity, SGI is excited to have an immediate opening for a SonicWall Firewall Engineer reporting onsite to HQ. (Background screening required.) We offer - competitive Salary, tons of Benefits, paid vacation, and a fun-fast paced environment!

Responsibilities Include:
Discover, Configure, Deploy SonicWall & Dell technology as assigned. (Remote and/or Onsite).
Work directly with customer to properly implement network security.
Maintain an ongoing relationship with customer through Monitoring, Management, Reporting, etc. as applicable.
Assist in troubleshooting and resolution of customer issues.
Configuration and maintaining systems/products including but not limited to:
SonicWall Firewalls
SonicWall, Dell and Brocade Switches
SonicWall SMA/VPNs
SonicWall and Aerohive Wireless
Dell Network Storage
VMWare Environment
A.I. Based SIEM
Network Monitoring Tools
DYNDNS
IP Allocation
Required Qualifications Include:
Network Plus Certificate
Security Plus Certificate
Firewall specific certifications welcome
1-5 Years of Experience in networking and network security
1-5 years of Understanding and experience with SonicWall products.
Understanding of firewall, switching, and routing functions such as but not limited to; IDP/IPS, DLP, WAF, GAV, SD-WAN, ACLs, NAT, CFS, SPI, DPI, DPI-SSL, etc.
Solid understanding of networking technologies and protocols such as but not limited to; TCP/IP, UDP, VLANs, OSI Model, VoIP/SIP, static and dynamic routing protocols, DNS, etc.
Solid understanding of how all pieces of a network fit and function together as well as affect each other. These pieces can include but are not limited to; computers, servers, Active Directory, switches, routers, hubs, firewalls, VPNs, SD-WAN, remote access, wireless, BYOD, etc.
Experience configurating and installing network infrastructure hardware such as Switches, Firewalls, Routers, Load Balancers, etc.
Solid understanding of wireless networking.
Solid understanding of Disaster Recovery and Continuity of Business.
The ability to work after hours and on weekends if required.
Required Skills:
Solid troubleshooting and problem solving logic.
Solid organizational skills. Must be able to organize large amounts of data in a logical manner.
STRONG communication skills both written and verbal.
EXCELLENT documentation skills.
The ability to convey technical concepts to non-technical executives and managers at the customer level.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $29.00 - $35.00 per hour

COVID-19 considerations:
We follow CDC Guidelines - we have the space and masks to keep our staff safe.
Once training is complete - remote from home at periods to encourage COVID-19 protections and proper social distancing within out office.

Work Location:
One location
Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available:
No: Not providing sponsorship for this job
This Job Is:
A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to apply
A “Fair Chance” job (you or the employer follow Fair Chance hiring practices when performing background checks)
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",4.8,"Solutions Granted, Inc.
4.8","Woodbridge, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Public,Grantmaking Foundations,Non-Profit,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
133,Data Engineer,$86k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Kingfisher Systems, Inc. specializes in providing a full range of Information Technology, Cybersecurity, Intelligence, and support services to the U.S. Government. Kingfisher Systems core competency is technology-enabled services, with a specific focus on national security. Since 2005, Kingfisher has established itself as a recognized and trusted mission partner whose mission is safeguarding sensitive information, operations, and programs for our Federal customers and warfighters.

Responsibilities:

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is seeking a Data Engineer to provide data flows and transformations to automate, script, visualize, and modeling subnational wealth. Day to day technical tasks include meeting with the customer to understand and refine the requirements. The candidate will use Nifi and Python to create data flows and transformations and understand the workflow of the project. They will work with the customer to implement any requested updates, move data storage to RDS, and work with security to ensure the entire system is compliant. They will compile security controls and artifacts and contribute to the Standard Operating Procedures and other related documents.

Skills Requirements:
The successful candidate should have experience with scripting in Python and using Nifi. Some knowledge of geospatial software such as ArcGIS, QGIS is preferred or willingness to learn.
Knowledge of best practices for data standards, data management, data quality.
Experience with SQL, PostGreSQL/PostGIS. Ability to communicate analysis to experts and lay persons alike.
Years of Experience: Minimum of 3 years experience.

Degree Requirement: Bachelor's degree in computer science, geography, or related field.

Minimum Clearance Requirement: Minimum Top Secret clearance with SCI Eligibility. Applicants selected will be subject to an additional security investigation and thus may have additional eligibility requirements to meet.

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, among other things, or status as a qualified individual with a disability.",4.5,"Kingfisher Systems
4.5","Falls Church, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
134,Lead Back End Engineer,$107k-$161k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Alteryx


Alteryx develops software for data preparation and analysis, including a number of server solutions for model deployment, collaborative work on data, and scheduling of automatic data processing. We're revolutionizing data analytics by providing a complete end to end, self-service platform that allows users to get from business questions to business answers at incredible speeds.

Why work for just any analytics company? At Alteryx, we are explorers, dreamers and innovators. We're on a journey to build the best analytics platform in the world, but we can't do it without people like you leading the way. We want Alteryx to be recognized as much for our dynamic work culture as for our products.

About Alteryx Innovation Labs


The Innovation Labs office, Alteryx's first office presence in Boston, was started earlier this year by the acquisition of MIT-spinout Feature Labs. This rapidly growing team combines the excitement of being part of a fast-paced, innovative startup with the resources, market penetration, and wisdom of a data analytics market leader. Our goal is to turbo-charge machine learning and data science efforts on the Alteryx platform, and to enable anyone to solve dynamic problems. We are working on high-impact, high-visibility projects, and we’re looking for collaborative and knowledge-hungry teammates who want to join us as we work to democratize machine learning.

Overview


As a Lead Back End Engineer you will you will lead the Innovation Labs’ back end development efforts on a new web-based data science product (sorry we can’t say much yet on what it is publicly, but we promise it’s great!). In this role, you will have the opportunity to problem solve, drive projects to success, communicate with stakeholders, and learn from both success and failures as part of a dynamic, friendly and ambitious team with technical influence throughout Alteryx and beyond.

Responsibilities
Work closely with Engineering Leadership to architect, design and develop the back end services, APIs and infrastructure to power this new application
Design and develop and deploy a robust data processing and ML API platform
Help to recruit, scale and mentor the back end engineering team
Define and promote a culture of rigorous software development practice and high quality standards
Work closely with Product and Front End counterparts to drive the product to completion
***The company will not provide sponsorship for work visas or other employment authorization for this position***
Requirements
7+ years of experience in building large scale web applications, ideally into a B2B and/or enterprise environment
3+ years in a Technical Leadership capacity
Experience writing production-quality code in a modern web framework/technology (Python, Node, Go, Scala, etc)
Experience writing clear and effective documentation
Experience in docker-based infrastructure on AWS (or another cloud provider).
Experience with automated testing and CI/CD platforms and tools like CircleCI, Selenium, etc.
Track record of sharing knowledge with team members through mentoring, code reviews, pair programming, and presentations.
Experience working with Product, Design, DevOps and other departments in a cross-functional way.
Bonus
Experience with Java/Scala and/or Python.
Startup experience (building products from 0→1 and 1->10).
Contributions to open-source frameworks and/or libraries.
Experience in ML/AI/Data Science python environment (sklearn/etc.)
Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Health plans that cover your family and pets
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation, 5 sick days, 9 holidays, 3 floating holidays, and 20 hours volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness reimbursement annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",3.6,"Alteryx
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
135,(HIH 10077) Sr. Software Engineer (Cloud) – Randolph AFB,$86k-$174k (Glassdoor Est.),"(HIH 10077) Sr. Software Engineer (Cloud) – Randolph AFB (TX)

Location: San Antonio, TX

Clearance: Secret

PCI has an exciting opportunity for a Senior Software Engineer located at Randolph AFB in San Antonio, Texas. This position will be in the Air Force Human Resources Systems Division, which supports a variety of Air Force personnel web applications. The Sr. Software Engineer will provide software engineering support for the HR Systems Personnel Applications and its subsystems. This role will require oversight of technical planning, acquisition, development and sustainment of Air Force-based Oracle applications.

Responsibilities:

The successful candidate will perform work that applies a broad theoretical and practical knowledge of software engineering including, but not limited to the following:
Provide software engineering support and oversight for Air Force Cloud-Based Personnel Systems
Provide software/systems engineering, analyses, specialized technical support to technical interchange meetings, direct assistance to program managers and support the design and fielding of HR systems.
Provide technical consultation and support in the development of web applications and programs
Analyze network communication requirements, design specifications and technical specifications or Oracle Application solutions
Develop and maintain system topology and architecture diagrams
Participate in Integrated Product Team (IPT) meetings and reviews to ensure Systems Integrator is adhering to program requirements and systems engineering process. Determine operational feasibility by evaluating analysis, problem definition, requirements, solution development, and proposed solutions.
Document and demonstrate solutions by developing documentation, flowcharts, layouts, diagrams, charts, and code comments.
Prepare and install solutions by determining and designing system specifications, standards, and programming.
Improve operations by conducting systems analysis and recommending changes in policies and procedures as needed.
Evaluate, test, and approve licensed software products and recommend for purchase.
Collect, analyze, and summarize development and service issues.
Review and provide software engineering and technical advice/assistance on project deliverables such as:
Software Development Plan
Software and Interface Requirements Specification
Software and Interface Design Description
Database Design Description
Software Test Plan, Test Description and Test Report
Software Product Specifications
Data Migration Plans/Reports (Technical Reports)
Interface Control Documents (ICDs)
Assure project quality, security, and compliance requirements are satisfied
Conduct reviews on program portfolio to evaluate and/or recommend alternative plans, improve software engineering programs/processes, manage/sustain program technical baseline, and design/perform system level tests to assure that subsystems and system performance is achieved in accordance with approved specifications.
Required Qualifications:
MA/MS in Computer Science, Information Technology or other Engineering discipline and 12 years of experience, 5 of which must be in the DoD; or
BA/BS in Computer Science, Information Technology or other Engineering discipline and 15 years of experience, 5 of which must be in the DoD; or
20 years of directly related experience with proper certifications, 8 of which must be in the DoD
Technical/analytical skills in systems/software engineering (HR systems is a plus) and the knowledge needed to support the full acquisition life cycle from pre-award to post-award, development, testing and fielding.
Experience in Air Force Program software and and systems engineering policies, procedures, and practices
Knowledge of reporting tools that support cloud implementation
Experience as a systems or network engineer for a large enterprise software or ERP system
Experience managing and integrating COTs software into a DoD environment
Experience with Windows Server environments, IIS, .NET
MS Office Applications – MS Visio, MS Access DB, MS Excel, MS Word, MS Outlook
High proficiency with computers and software applications, including MS Office
Expert attention to detail
Strong verbal and written communications skills


Desired Qualifications:
Knowledge of Cloud (AWS, Azure) infrastructure architecture, development methodologies, and service types (IaaS, PaaS, and SaaS) is a plus
ERP conversion/data migration/cloud implementation experience is a plus
Knowledge of DevSecOps practices and implementation a plus
Oracle and SQL RDBMS products experience a plus
Experience collaborating with multiple technical teams across multiple organizations is a plus
Knowledge of secure software development such as Oracle Single-Sign On (SSO) Software and /or Working Knowledge a plus
Unix experience a plus
Any of the following certifications is also desirable:
AWS Cloud Solutions Architect
Network +
Security +
CISSP
CSSLP
CMMI Level 2.0 Software Process Improvement",4.6,"PCI
4.6","San Antonio, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
136,SCADA Engineer,-1,"Requirements

Must have full comprehensive understanding of Inductive Automation / Ignition SCADA platform

Strong working knowledge of RSLogix 5000 and Panelviews HMI

Qualifications

Bachelor's degree in Electrical Engineering, Information Technology, Computer Science or related technical field preferred

Minimum 3 - 5 years Hands-on experience configuring and testing EMS, cellular routers, SEL RTAC, RTUs, HMIs, or PLCs for SCADA systems

Knowledge of SCADA communication data flow and protocols

Strong problem solving skills with the ability to troubleshoot systems software

Excellent verbal and written communication skills

Ability to work as part of a team and independently

Establishing and keeping deadlines and goals

Manage multiple detail oriented tasks

Responsibilities

Setup/configuration/Programing of logic, control schemes, and network/communication paths for RTACs, RTUs, HMIs, PLCs, Cellular Routers and other SCADA system equipment

Support and development of SCADA system components

Preform/document data analysis and troubleshooting SCADA system and related components

Conduct and document root-cause analysis of deployed SCADA system failures

Track, document, and report weekly progress updates

Work with and create revisions for existing programs, systems, and procedures

Coordinate with team members to implement and update SCADA system and field equipment

Handle other duties and tasks as needed

Must be able to work out of our New Hampshire office

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Location:
Hampstead, NH (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Confidential,"Hampstead, NH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
137,Data Engineer,$59k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you want to get a foot in the door at an online Advertising and Media company that has seen tremendous growth? Do you want to work in the world of online video; one of the fastest growing advertising formats in the world? Then Playwire is the place for you…

Playwire Media is a full-service digital innovation partner that leverages online advertising and proprietary technologies to build publishing brands in the gaming and entertainment verticals.

To keep pace with our explosive growth, we are currently seeking a data engineer to extend our data collection, warehousing, and analysis capabilities. You’ll use your skills to facilitate objectives ranging from simple data pipelining and summarization for use in internal dashboards, to supporting our prediction initiatives by collecting and transforming data from a variety of sources and then crafting prediction algorithms to run at scale. As such, you’ll need to bring a variety of skills to bear, from pipelining to ETL to algorithmic manipulation of data.
Playwire’s services are responsible for delivering millions of ads daily to sites and apps that depend on our technology and expertise for their ad revenue. Data is central to our latest advances in this regard; if you want to participate in the early expansion of our data-related capabilities, and thrive in a fast-paced, rapid-development environment, then talk to us.
This position requires full-time employment; availability at our main office in Boca Raton, FL is preferred, but remote work is a possibility.

Essential functions:
Architect and maintain data pipelines, data lakes, and databases, both independently and as part of a data engineering team.
Work with the development team to support data-centric applications.
Design and deploy algorithms best suited for Playwire’s optimization and prediction needs.
Integrate data from external sources, gathered both via API and from email-based reports.
Identify bottlenecks and bugs, and devise solutions to these problems.
Help maintain data-related code and service quality, organization, and reliability.
Required qualifications:
Experience with Amazon AWS’s data-related services.
Knowledge of common data design patterns.
Experience with data pipelining.
Experience with ETL.
Experience using APIs to access data.
Knowledge of business intelligence tools, and the relationship between data and BI-type instrumentation.
An understanding of source control, particularly git and Github.
Comfort with big data principles and management.
Nice-to-haves:
Experience with digital ad servers, SSPs, or ad exchanges.
Experience with Amazon AWS, particularly RDS and S3.
Proficiency with one or more coding languages; Ruby, Go, and Javascript are all plusses.
Knowledge of machine learning principles and technologies.
Experience with digital advertising units, terminology and standards.
Experience working in a team using Agile development and project management practices.
A basic knowledge of CDNs and the role they fill, including edge computing capabilities.
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Company's website:
https://www.playwire.com/
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.5,"Playwire Media
3.5","Boca Raton, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
138,Cloud Engineer,-1,"Cloud Engineer

Do you enjoy working with cutting edge technology to solve tough problems? Our teams at Deloitte are comprised of deeply passionate and experienced professionals who guide clients through their most complex technology challenges. If you are seeking a role that offers you the opportunity to work with clients through critical issues, consider at Deloitte.

Work you’ll do

This position is for a Cloud Engineer supporting our client’s cloud services infrastructure. This client plans to offer managed cloud services in Microsoft Azure followed closely by Amazon Web Services.

Additional Responsibilities:

Build new cloud based data center services environments for cloud initiatives.
Assist with identifying and planning potential new cloud services, features, and capabilities.
Serve as overall subject matter expert on Cloud Engineer technology and market capabilities/trends.
Collaborate with internal and external parties to transform high-level technical objectives into comprehensive technical requirements.
Formulate detailed network, storage, and compute design specifications for stable and secure computing operations in a dynamic cloud based environment.
Make recommendations for improvements to security, scalability, manageability, and performance across a wide variety of network, storage, and compute technologies.

Qualifications

Required:

CompTIA Security+ certification

Active Secret clearance

Must be legally authorized
to work in the United States without the need
for employer sponsorship, now or at any time
in the future

Preferred:

Mid to senior level Cloud Engineer experience
Security+ (Or equivalent IA cert) and computing environment certification (i.e. MCSD Azure Solutions Architect, AWS Certified Solutions Architect, etc. strongly preferred)
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Experience effectively managing multiple large-scale projects
Experience automating routine administrative tasks desired
Strong experience with IPSEC/VPN, and other secure transport technologies as well as BGP
Proven experience migrating on-premise applications to the cloud
Understanding of network, storage, server, and application technologies
Strong knowledge of automation concepts, tools, and scripting languages (Ansible, Terraform, Python, Powershell, Bash, Puppet, Chef, etc.)
Working knowledge of code repositories tools such as Git preferred
Working knowledge of DoD STIGs, and IA Vulnerability Management (IAVM) – preferred
Continuous Integration/Continuous Delivery pipeline experience such as Jenkins, Travis CI, AWS CodeDeploy - preferred
DS&J

How you’ll grow

At Deloitte, our professional development plan focuses on helping people at every level of their career to identify and use their strengths to do their best work every day. From entry-level employees to senior leaders, we believe there’s always room to learn. We offer opportunities to help sharpen skills in addition to hands-on experience in the global, fast-changing business world. From on-the-job learning experiences to formal development programs at Deloitte University, our professionals have a variety of opportunities to continue to grow throughout their career. Explore Deloitte University, The Leadership Center.

Benefits

At Deloitte, we know that great people make a great organization. We value our people and offer employees a broad range of benefits. Learn more about what working at Deloitte can mean for you.

Deloitte’s culture

Our positive and supportive culture encourages our people to do their best work every day. We celebrate individuals by recognizing their uniqueness and offering them the flexibility to make daily choices that can help them to be healthy, centered, confident, and aware. We offer well-being programs and are continuously looking for new ways to maintain a culture where our people excel and lead healthy, happy lives. Learn more about Life at Deloitte.

Corporate citizenship

Deloitte is led by a purpose: to make an impact that matters. This purpose defines who we are and extends to relationships with our clients, our people and our communities. We believe that business has the power to inspire and transform. We focus on education, giving, skill-based volunteerism, and leadership to help drive positive social impact in our communities. Learn more about Deloitte’s impact on the world.

Recruiter tips

We want job seekers exploring opportunities at Deloitte to feel prepared and confident. To help you with your interview, we suggest that you do your research: know some background about the organization and the business area you’re applying to. Check out recruiting tips from Deloitte professionals.

CloudGPS

#IND:PTY",3.8,"Deloitte
3.8","Radford, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1850,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$10+ billion (USD),-1
139,Senior Control Systems Engineer,-1,"The Senior Control Systems Engineer provides hardware and software troubleshooting and programming assistance on utility systems, manufacturing equipment, laboratory equipment and building systems in a highly regulated cGMP environment. This individual will be a part of a team to advance a fundamentally important aspect of the company’s long-term success focused on internal manufacturing capability. The Senior Control Systems Engineer is creative, team oriented, and has hands on experience in process and building automation technologies required to support a cGMP manufacturing facility.

Ownership and administration of equipment control systems in a cGMP regulated environment
Identify, lead, and support system improvements; development of detailed specifications, engineering documents, and standard operating procedures
Lead technical root cause analysis, incident investigations, and troubleshooting issues related to electrical, instrumentation, and equipment control systems
Supply information and technical data for securing spare parts
Provide responsive customer support with emphasis on customer satisfaction
Perform start up and commissioning activities as required
Work in a collaborative team environment and interact with other support groups such as Engineering, Facilities, Validation, Quality Assurance, IT, and Manufacturing
Interact and oversee work of vendors and/or contractors
Develop and implement preventative maintenance programs for control systems

Bachelor’s Degree in Electrical Engineering or Computer Science, Chemical Engineering, Biotech Engineering or related life science engineering with 5+ years’ experience in operations/manufacturing environment
Manufacturing control systems automation background focused specifically in design, installation, programming, validation and lifecycle maintenance of automated equipment specifically in GMP environment
Experience in change control, non-conformance, corrective and preventative actions, and validation practices
Experience with Rockwell Automation is strongly desired (Factory Talk SE, PlantPAX, Studio 5000)
Experience with Johnson Controls, Data Historian (Factory Talk Historian SE, PI) and system integration of OEM equipment (OPC communication)
Knowledge of GAMP software development lifecycle, ANSI/ISA-S88 and S95 industry standards and 21 CFR Part 11
Experience with network architecture including TCP/IP, Routing, Switching, Network IDS/IPS, Active Directory, Domain Integration and Firewalls
Excited about working collaboratively in a fast paced, team-based environment",4.4,"Homology Medicines, Inc.
4.4","Bedford, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
140,Project Engineer Virtual Hiring Event,$40k-$61k (Glassdoor Est.),"ABEC, Inc. Virtual Hiring Event!

Event Details
Date: Thursday, October 22, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Mechanical Assembler

Electrical Assembler

Project Engineer

Electrical Designer

Mechanical Designer

Transportation Supervisor

Accounting Manager

Senior Accountant

Intake Details:

Requirements

High school graduate or equivalent required for all positions except the Project Engineer which requires a bachelor's in an Engineering field.

2 years of relevant experience needed for all positions except the project Engineer which needs 3-5 years of experience. Designer Position requires 2-year Technical Degree in CAD or Drafting.

Technical requirements

The interview will take place on Indeed's virtual interviewing platform. After RSVP, you will find a link in your email that will lead you directly to the video interview lobby during the event. Try to find a quiet place with good lighting and a stable internet connection.

What to bring to this event

Resume

Completing our online application prior to the event is strongly encouraged and will speed up the process.

What to wear

Dress code is Business casual (dress pants/skirt, button down/blouse, optional tie).

About ABEC, Inc.

ABEC is a leading supplier to the biopharmaceutical manufacturing industry. ABEC’s unique value is based on combining long experience with the ability to engineer, design, manufacture, commission, qualify, and service the entire bioprocess to reduce overall cost, shorten time to market, and maximize productivity. ABEC’s products include process and equipment engineering/consulting services, comprehensive site services, bioreactors and fermenters, filtration and chromatography systems, prep and hold systems, and cleaning/sterilization systems.

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

Project Engineer designs, specifies and commissions new and renovated biopharmaceutical process and clean utility equipment; provides engineering support and leads deviation investigations for equipment and manufacturing processes. As Project Engineer you will be responsible to provide the Project Manager with assistance required to attain or exceed the project operating income, project execution plan and customer satisfaction goals. Day-to-day activities include, but are not limited to, job costing, estimating, billings, labor management and tracking, enhancing customer relationships, scheduling and purchasing responsibilities.

Responsibilities

• Ability to work in a professional team-based office environment and meet date-driven customer-focused commitments

• Keep assigned Project Manager(s), Project Team Members and Departmental Management Supervisor apprised of project workload progress, needs and updates on a regular basis

• Monitor all project costs & identify any scope of supply changes affecting project cost

• Function as direct customer contact on technical items related to assigned projects

• Prepare & update ‘Project Scope Report’

• Supports Project Manager activities and responsibilities on “as-needed” bases when required or when the Project Manager is not available

• Work to meet all departmental Goals, Objectives and Metric based improvement initiatives

• Review, generate and comprehend customer based specifications, requirements and proposal documents

• Review & analysis of customer specifications with respect to company offer, scope of supply & commercial terms

• Prepare & maintain contract files in accordance with Company procedures

• Support Company Designers on Engineering-related deliverables while meeting customer expectations for equipment requirements related to form, fit and function

• Support the creation and approval of key Engineering / Design documentation (i.e. P+ID’s, GA’s, Detailed Design Drawings, BOM’s etc…)

• Perform calculations required for equipment verification and component / system sizing

• Preparation of specifications & equipment data sheets

• Support design verification activities and participate in Design-driven Model reviews

• Review and Approve related Engineering Change Notices (ECN’s) and ensure their accuracy and completeness prior to their publication and release throughout the organization (i.e. purchasing, quality, production etc…)

• Support Automation and Electrical Engineering Resources on related deliverables driven by customer expectations related to equipment communications and / or functionality

• Work with company Automation resources to review customer requirements and generate / approve related automation documentation including but not limited to Functional Requirement Specifications (FRS) and Detailed Design Specifications (DDS)

• Support Manufacturing and Quality based resources in their work to fabricate, assemble and qualify Engineering / Design deliverables in support of customer driven requirements

• Function as company contact on technical items related to assigned projects under fabrication and quality verification

• Supervision and/or conduct FAT and/or SAT activities both domestically and internationally

• Generate required test plans and work with customers to seek approval in advance.

• Generate IQ / OQ and PQ documentation as required

• Support the development of engineering standards, procedures & procedures for review by departmental management

• Support Departmental and Organizational efforts to improve performance and reduce operational costs by identifying potential items for consideration, and participating in company sponsored process improvement teams as assigned

• Travel to customer job sites as required

• Execute other tasks as assigned

Requirements

• BS in an Engineering field (Mechanical, Biological, Chemical or equivalent experience)

• 3 years post graduate Engineering experience in related industry

• Preferred experience of 5 years post graduate Engineering experience working in a BioPharm or Piping systems market and / or direct experience supporting the manufacture and testing of custom equipment, machinery and components driven by customer specifications

• 2 years’ experience in support of automation and control systems engineering related to bioprocesses preferred.",2.2,"ABEC, Inc.
2.2","Bethlehem, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
141,Development Test Engineer - R&D,$41k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"Role Summary: TTI Floor Care is home to some of the world's best-known floor care brands - Hoover, Dirt Devil and Oreck. Our dynamic team, located in Charlotte, North Carolina is passionate about creating innovative products through a user centered design approach. As a member of the Research & Development team you will have the opportunity to work across brands and categories in the consumer and commercial industries. The fast-paced work is rewarding and covers the entire range of corded and cordless floor care appliances.

As a critical part of the Advanced Engineering group, this Development Test engineer will be a key contributor for developing new consumer, commercial products and systems. You will utilize standard test and fabrication equipment to verify physical functioning units which could include; creative experimentation, problem-solving skills to create and validate new solutions, complete execution of engineering test plans. You will collaborate with CFD Engineers, Test Engineers, Mechanical Engineers, Electrical Engineers and Industrial Designers to maximize performance. The perfect candidate for this role will be self-motivated and have a keen interest in understanding how things work. They will be patient, persistent, detail oriented and capable of taking constructive feedback while working collaboratively.

Essential Responsibilities:
Provide product focused engineering testing support to the Advanced Engineering group for a variety of consumer and commercial products
Assist in the design, build, and prototyping to iteratively to prove out design concepts
Test product using standard test equipment and procedures, and analyze results to evaluate performance and issue recommendations
Develop new tests to troubleshoot product designs as needed
Read schematic drawings and engineering instructions for assembling electronics units, applying engineering knowledge.
Drives innovation and incorporation of next generation: Stay abreast of relevant technologies and assess innovations regarding their applicability to floor care and other consumer products.
Responsible for lab organization and efficiencies, creating and maintaining test fixtures and test equipment
Requirements/Qualifications:
Education: Associates Degree in Electrical Engineering Technology, Mechanical Engineering, Mechatronics or equivalent work experience. Ability to read and interpret schematics, assembly drawings, procedure manuals, parts lists
Personal computer skills required to configure and load software, analyze, graph and communicate data
Familiarity in supporting control of AC and DC motors, pumps, motor controllers, and electronic circuits or technologies in similar field. Familiarity with lithium-ion batteries
Minimum 1-year experience (including Co-ops and internships) in test/validation, system test plans and troubleshooting.
Routinely work in a hands-on manner.
Solid understanding of equipment, tools and software to design, test and analyze systems and components as well as electronic lab equipment, calibration, etc.
Understanding in the use of oscilloscopes, DVM's, power supplies, data acquisition systems, power analyzers, etc. Matlab and LabVIEW is a plus.
Experience with Creo or equivalent CAD package a plus
Self-starter, highly motivated with good organizational and time management skills.
Strong interpersonal and communication skills (written and verbal) within and outside the organization, including the ability to discuss and explain complex technical details to non-technical audiences.
Pro-active approach with risk analysis, including the development of mitigation strategies before issues arise.
Strong project management skills, attention to detail, and strong analytical and interpretative skills.
Proficient in common office applications (MS Office, PowerPoint, Excel, Project).
The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work performed by employees assigned to this position. This document is subject to change at any time and is not intended to be exhaustive of all duties, responsibilities, and skills required by employees with this position title. The physical requirements described on the supplemental Occupational Worksheet are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of the job. Reasonable accommodations may be made upon request.

#LI-CC1

Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",3.3,"TTI Floor Care North America Inc.
3.3","Charlotte, NC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
142,Network Engineer 4,-1,"Company Overview


Cosmic Advanced Engineered Solutions (Cosmic AES) is a small innovative company tackling the most difficult technical challenges in signals, space, and cyberspace. We design and develop high-end signal processing solutions for Department of Defense (DoD) in the Counter-Space, Special Operations, Homeland Security, and other specialized mission areas. Our strong team of scientists, engineers, and operations experts specialize in exploring emerging technologies, system development, and rapid prototyping to solve the most difficult national security concerns.

Job Summary

Cosmic AES is seeking a Network Engineer in support of our government customer, where we equip the joint warfighter with space control systems to gain, maintain, and exploit space superiority. Executing cradle to grave responsibility for weapon system development, fielding and sustainment.

Job Duties

The Network Engineer will build and maintain development and testbed networks for use across the companys cyber and RF network needs. The Network Engineer will be responsible for developing system-level requirements from architectural guidelines and mission objectives; developing detailed designs with supporting implementation, test and transition plans. The Network Engineer will be instrumental in designing an enterprise that will directly support the future of the Special Operations Force Portfolio objectives while utilizing innovative technologies alongside a very diverse team of engineers and analysts. The Network Engineer will be a direct contributor and will operate within a highly skilled and cross-functional team, which supports laying the foundation of future, cyber, space and ground operations.
The Network Engineer will be responsible for:
Design, configure, integrate, and testing networking (monitoring) software, computer hardware, and applicable user applications
Design, setup and configure complex switching environments and complex wireless networking that supports open or secured access and the ability to support voice and video applications
Troubleshoot, diagnose, and resolve hardware, software, and other network and system problems
Troubleshooting malfunctions of network hardware and software applications, telephones and security systems to resolve operational issues and restore services
Replace faulty network hardware components when required
Maintain, configure, and monitor virus protection software and/or applicable applications
Configure and setup Firewalls, VPN Concentrators, and other Security Appliances
Monitor network performance to determine if adjustments are required
Maintain and administer computer networks and related computing environments including systems software, applications software, hardware, and configurations
Perform disaster recovery operations and data backups when required
Protect data, software, and hardware by coordinating, planning, and implementing network security measures
Operate master consoles to monitor the performance of networks and computer systems
Possible overseas travel to add and maintain remote network sites with unique connectivity needs
Any other duties as assigned by management. Non-inclusive examples are assisting with operating systems administration, cybersecurity monitoring, documentation, project oversight
Providing operations support; daily coordination and network optimization; monitor the health and status of the network
Responding to network and system issues and take corrective actions to resolve
Responsible for managing and maintaining routers, switches, and crypto devices; utilizing network monitoring tools such as Solar Winds to manage network devices
Providing mission management and help desk support ensuring efficient utilization and allocation of network and system resources to maintain availability and performance
Use available diagnostic tools to troubleshoot and resolve network systems issues
Use available diagnostic tools to identify potential problems and develop solutions before outages occur
Coordinate Authorized Service Interruptions (ASI) schedules and ASI execution
Meet IA workforce requirements defined in United States Department of Defense (US DoD)
Be responsible for determining production direction while developing test plans and execution timelines for various projects.
Work closely with the CTO and other executives to align network design with organizational goals.
Provide specific detailed information for hardware and software selection, implementation techniques and tools for the most efficient solution to meet business needs, including present and future capacity requirements.
Conduct testing of network design.
Maintain technical expertise in all areas of network and computer hardware and software interconnection and interfacing, such as routers, switches, firewalls, storage, compute, etc.
Evaluate and report on new communications technologies to enhance capabilities of the network.
Compare & develop Analysis of Alternatives (AoAs) and Bill of Materials (BOMs) for hardware & software while working with technology vendors to develop organizational IT roadmap.
Ensure network design follows best practice across the DoD, federal space and industry standards.
Continuously evaluate emerging network technologies to maximize performance, security & efficiency.
Required Qualifications:
Must have a Top-Secret security clearance with SCI Eligibility.
Must have one of the following combinations of education and experience: HS Diploma \(or GED\) and 8 years of general experience; Associate's degree and 6 years of general experience; Bachelor's degree and 4 years of general experience; Master's degree and 2 years of general experience\.
General experience must include 4 years directly related experience desgining and administrating a network.
Must possess a DoD 8570\.01\-M IAT Level II approved cert \(e\.g\. CompTIA Security CE\)
Network technical experience with a solid understanding of Cisco internal and external routing protocols
Experience with Palo Alto or KG\-175 TACLANE encryptors\.
Possess Cisco certification such as CCNA
Knowledge of architecture frameworks \(i\.e, DoDAF, TOGAF, etc\.\)
Experience w/multicast technologies
Experience with network architecture, engineering, design, implementation, and testing.
Understanding of network communication protocols and network routing protocols (BGP, OSPF, and EIGRP) and IP network troubleshooting.
Basic knowledge of network testing methodologies using routers, switches, and firewalls.
Experience with developing new configurations for routers, switches, and firewalls.
Experience with TCP/IP behavior, network communications and routing protocols, network traffic analysis and troubleshooting experience.
Desired Qualifications:

Possess a CEH certification (Certified Ethical Hacker)
Shell Scripting, Python, C programming skills highly desired
Powered by JazzHR",4.4,"Cosmic AES
4.4","Colorado Springs, CO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
143,"Software Engineer - (Python, C/C++/C#, Perl)",-1,"Job Description:
DEPROCESSING/IMAGING EMBEDDED HARDWARE

o Acquire images to perform the physical deprocessing of integrated circuits (ICs).

o Investigate and develop techniques to reduce or remove noise, balance intensity levels, and improve linearity of integrated circuit in all SEM captured images.

o Perform image analysis/processing tools to complete image capture requirements.

VULNERABILITY ANALYSIS

o Analyze the functionality of a hardware device

o Identify its security weaknesses/strengths

o Provide guidance for further enhancements

o Develop exploits to defeat hardware imposed security mechanisms that may enable retrieval of information stored within the device

o Use commercial design tools such as Cadence, Hercules, and Formality

SOFTWARE DEVELOPMENT

o Develop/enhance software tools and the associated graphical user interfaces (GUIs) to analyze, annotate and enhance images produced by any of the image acquisition tool systems

o Develop software programs in various programming languages (e.g. Python, C/C++/C#, Perl) in order to;

Implement image processing/manipulation algorithms.
Analyze digital logic and other circuit schematics.
Analyze large quantities of hardware-related data from a variety of sources.
Provide efficient software user interfaces.

Candidates should have a minimum of a Bachelors Degree in Computer Science or Electrical Engineering (or similiar) and ideally 14 years of relevant experience. Current TS/SCI required

Overview:

Entegra Systems designs, develops and deploys advanced technology and performs critical analytical roles to support our nation’s most important intelligence missions. Whether as a valued partner to other leading contractors, or directly for federal customers, Entegra brings innovative thinking, top-tier talent, and a positive attitude to every aspect of every project. Ethics and integrity are at the heart of our name, our brand, our people, our product, our way of doing business. Ethics and integrity are our core values that guide everything we do.

The work is challenging. The team is top-notch. The benefits are almost too good to be true.

There’s a reason Entegra is such a terrific place to work. Our founders looked at their own experiences as employees, and consciously decided to create a workplace that represented the “best of the best” of where they’d worked before. And make it even better.

Competitive pay is a given, though at Entegra, you do get paid for every hour you work. Our benefits have become something of a legend in our community. They’re that good. Because our people are our most important investment. Everybody gets time and budget for training. And we always work with our people to make sure their careers are on trajectories that work for them and us.

We’re not a company that’s just about filling seats. We’re about filling expectations — for our clients, our staff, our company. You’ll also find here a diverse, collegial atmosphere marked by mutual respect. Best of all, you’ll do important work with talented people. And you’ll make a difference for your country.",4.5,"Entegra Systems
4.5","Annapolis, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
144,Senior Engineer of SSD NAND Characterization,$90k-$179k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Responsibility:

As part of this role, the candidate will perform but not limited to the following functions:
Work with the Firmware team to define the needed VU commands, develop, implement, debug and run firmware tools for SSD level NAND characterization.
Develop and implement test items and test scripts for internal test platform to validate SSD level NAND reliability and performance.
Analyze customer requirements and dealing with customer issues.
Work with NAND reliability team to deliver NAND reliability requirements and validating through SSD level NAND characterization.
Perform collaboration with other stakeholders for SSD architecture/FW/SoC and NAND team.
Qualification:
BS degree in engineering is required
5+ years of hands-on development/analysis experience in SSD or storage systems.
Expertise knowledge in NAND reliability test and JEDEC standards.
Hands-on experience of SSD level testing, performance measurement.
Ability to work on SSD system performance analysis with flash friendly file systems and databases.
Ability to work creatively and analytically in a problem-solving environment.
Knowledge of SSD level NAND management schemes such as Read Reclaim and Background Media Scan.
Excellent oral and written skills for communication and documentation.
Data process and analysis using C/C++, Matlab or Python, Spotfire.
Self-motivated, strong team player
Preferred Qualification:
Experience in SSD customer engagement is a plus.
Experience in state of the art of NAND flash memory, 3D-NAND experience is a plus.
Experience with multi-ARM core based development is a plus.",3.4,"SK Hynix Memory Solutions America Inc.
3.4","San Jose, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
145,Analytic Software Engineer - TS/SCI w/FSP Required,-1,"Job Description:
Join our team of talented engineers in the Fort Meade area supporting critical national security programs. As an analytic software engineer, youll work closely with mission SMEs to develop niche analytics for the Intelligence Community. These may be batch analytics that operate over large volumes of data at-rest, or they may be streaming analytics that operate over smaller volumes of data in-motion. When operational, your analytics will support Phoenixs core mission of Arming the Analyst.

This position will support multiple programs and is open to both mid-level and senior candidates. A typical day includes engineering activities across a mid-sized team, exploring mission data sets, working with mission SMEs to understand tradecraft, and developing analytics to support that tradecraft. All development will be conducted within an Agile process using standard Scrum practices (daily stands-ups, sprint planning, sprint demos/retrospectives).

*** Top Secret SCI Clearance with Full-Scope Polygraph Required ***

Technical Skills Required
5+ years of experience in Java software development
3+ years of experience with distributed technologies such as Hadoop, Spark and Kafka
3+ years of experience implementing RESTful web services
3+ years of experience processing XML and JSON data formats
3+ years of experience using Git, JUnit, Maven and Jenkins
3+years of experience developing software in a Linux environment
3+ years of experience supporting Defense or Intelligence programs
Technical Skill Preferred
Experience developing analytics with MapReduce, Spark or similar technologies
Experience with distributed databases such as Accumulo or HBase
Experience working in an Agile environment using Jira and Confluence
Basic understanding of Python or Scala
Basic Machine Learning algorithms & techniques
Benefits Offered:
Medical, Dental, Vision Insurance - 100% Company Paid Premiums
STD, LTD, and Life Insurance - 100% Company paid
401K Automatic 10% company contribution; no matching required
PTO - 4 weeks/year
Holidays - 10 paid/year
Birthdays off with pay
Company laptop built to your specification
Referral Bonuses Upfront AND Annually Recurring
Open Source Bonuses Contribute to our GitHub projects
Professional Development Paid training, Certifications and Enrichment
ABOUT PHOENIX OPERATIONS GROUP:
Phoenix Operations Group is an engineering services company that protects US Warfighters and supports US Intelligence efforts. As a small business operating in the Baltimore & DC areas, we rely on innovation to continually advance our employees' skills and provide game-changing solutions to our customers.

Phoenix specializes in inter-agency functionality that connects our federal, military and commercial clients with shared mission solutions. We do this with Big Data technologies, Machine Learning techniques, Cloud-Hosted platforms, and enterprise architectures.

Our team is geographically dispersed across the country. Thus, we rely on innovative techniques to advance our employees' skills and promote company culture:
We incentivize employees to participate in our Open-Source GitHub projects
We incentivize and support employees in writing whitepapers for the community
We invest in research and development (R&D) to expand our mission capabilities
We promote technical discussion across Slack, Google Meet and Social Media platforms
With these innovations, Phoenix provides a dynamic and inclusive environment for our employees. Please visit us at https://www.phoenix-opsgroup.com/ for more information.

Phoenix Operations Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Phoenix Operations Group does not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, non-disqualifying physical or mental disability, national origin, veteran status or any other basis covered by appropriate law. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.",5.0,"Phoenix Operations Group
5.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
146,Electrical Estimating Engineer,$37k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job location
Job location

America/Caribbean, USA, Kentucky, Louisville, KY

City and Zip code

Louisville 40229

Job details
Job title

Electrical Estimating Engineer

Job type

Permanent position

Job content

Fives designs and supplies world-class material handling and sorting solutions for the Intralogistics sector to serve global leaders in the shipping industry. The Group and its Intralogistics dedicated teams - around 500 people in France, Italy, China, Japan, Korea and the United States - automate internal logistics streams for postal and courier companies, distribution centers, and baggage handling systems. As we continue to grow to meet the demands of this rapidly growing market segment, we are looking for an experienced Electrical Estimator to join our team.

Position Summary:

Analyses customer requests and proposes solutions to meet customer needs. Ensures that the solution being proposed to the customer is sound, competitive and meets the specifications with respect to technical performance.
Participates in customer meetings with sales to gather information and analyze the requirements.
Reviews bids for specifications, acceptance criteria, and accuracy of the proposals to ensure the technical solution is properly represented.
Advises Project Management and Senior Management on the ‘bid no bid’ process as to the feasibility of the customer request.
Reviews and analyses proposals submitted to determine the beneficial derivatives and possible applications to justify expenditures.
Reviews incoming proposals including contracts, terms and conditions and statements of work to determine risk factors and areas of concern. Works with project management, engineering and sales to create project budgets to minimize risks and protect gross margins.
Responsible for working with the proposal manager to develop the technical aspects of the proposals as well as the layout and manifest of the system as it relates to your scope of work.
Responsible for developing the proposal level acceptance testing procedure as needed.
Proposes new solutions and components for the Product Development Department to develop that would open new markets and or increase the competitiveness of the proposals
Leads and drives the estimating process through the organization.
Prepares estimates by calculating the most economical costs, both material and labor, to meet the requirements of the proposal, product or project. Works closely with operations, engineering and sales teams to understand and help develop the best solution to meet the customers’ requirements and expectations.
Work closely with SAP users group to streamline and improve the estimating process.
Conducts special studies to develop and establish standard hour and related cost data or effect cost reductions.
Consults with clients, vendors, or other individuals to discuss and formulate estimates and resolve issues.
Travel as required.

Education and Experiences

Bachelor's degree (B. S.) from four-year College or university.
A minimum of two years related experience and/or training.
Or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Knowledge in the distribution and order assembly process and/or knowledge in the postal sorting process and/or knowledge in the courier sorting process.
Ability to use AutoCAD proficiently.

Applicant criteria
Job

Engineering

General information
Reference number
2020-627
Job opening category

Standard

Country

United States

Location site

Fives Intralogistics Corp. - Louisville",3.8,"Fives
3.8","Louisville, KY",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1812,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
147,Gas Processing Engineer,-1,"Purpose: * To design and manage a system that can process natural gas coming from a production facility on an oilfield location or directly out of a natural gas gathering pipeline to a level of quality that is acceptable for combustion in dual fuel engines.
Essential Duties (including but not limited to): *
Lead the design process for our natural gas processing, scrubbing and measurement unit.
Provide drawings of the designed unit or work with other co-workers to provide a sat of plans for the fabrication of the gas processing unit.
Frequently visit job-sites and work with a team of engineers to create and maintain a process for scrubbing and cleaning natural gas from production or gathering facilities into a combustible fuel source for Tier 4 Dual Fuel Engines.
Once a method has been established, visit job-sites to ensure the process is safe and efficient while making adjustments to ensure the highest level of safety and efficiency are achieved.
Assist in the rigging up and rigging down of equipment when starting and finishing a specific job-site and/or well.
Work with safety departments from Texas Pride Fuels and customers to ensure that the set-up was completed in a safe and orderly fashion.
Analyze data and communicate findings and results to upper management.
Communicate any and all information and process changes to upper management.
Be the subject matter expert in the handling of natural gas and dealing with other hazardous items.
Ensure safety and consistency in the design of any gas processing systems utilized.
Maintain a safe working environment by being knowledgeable on safety risks associated with natural or liquefied gas produced, stored or transported by vessels or pipelines and mitigate risks through the design of the process.
Wear the proper company issued PPE and safety equipment while adhering to all company safety protocols while on an oil and gas site at all times.
Other duties as assigned.
Essential Qualifications: *
Bachelor’s Degree in Mechanical Engineering, Automotive Engineering, Chemical Engineering or other Engineering related degree. *(Required)*
*OR* Trade or mechanical school certification. *(Required) *
Experience processing wellhead gases and custody transfer of natural gas. *(Required)*
Experience with H2S scavengers. *(Required)*
Experience dealing with pressure control valves and gas chromatographs. *(Preferred)*
Experience designing and processing skid units. *(Preferred)*
Experience processing natural gas to engine-fuel quality. *(Preferred)*
Extremely organized while also being detail and process oriented.
Driven individual who is not afraid of hard work.
Excellent communication skills both written and verbal.
Ability to speak, write and read the English language.
Able to exercise effective judgment, sensitivity, creativity to changing needs and situations.
Able to establish and maintain healthy working relationships with people in course of work.
Must satisfactorily pass a drug and background check.
Ability to travel 50% of each month.
What We Offer: *
401k with company match.
PTO provided.
Aggressive medical, dental and vision benefits.
Great working environment.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Relocation Assistance
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Dual Fuel experience in the oilfield: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Springtown, TX 76082 (Required)
Required travel:
25% (Required)
Additional Compensation:
Other forms
Work Location:
One location
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",-1,American Energy Innovations,"Springtown, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
148,Physical Security System Advanced Systems & Test Engineer,$58k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Basic Qualifications :

Bachelor's degree in systems engineering, a related specialized area or field is required (or equivalent experience) plus a minimum of 5 years of relevant experience; or Master's degree plus a minimum of 3 years of relevant experience. Agile experience preferred

CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:

Department of Defense Secret security clearance is required within a reasonable period of time. Applicants selected will be subject to a U.S. Government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Due to the nature of work performed within our facilities, U.S. citizenship is required.

Responsibilities for this Position:

General Dynamics Mission Systems has an immediate opening for a Physical Security System Advanced System & Test Engineer. This position provides an opportunity to further advance the cutting-edge technology that supports some of our nation’s core defense/intelligence services and systems. General Dynamics Mission Systems employees work closely with esteemed customers to develop solutions that allow them to carry out high-stakes national security missions.

REPRESENTATIVE DUTIES AND TASKS:

Performs requirements analysis, requirements definition, requirements management, functional analysis, performance analysis, system design, detail trade studies, systems integration and test (verification), validation and interface definition studies of subsystem or system elements under supervision of the lead systems engineer
Performs technical planning, cost and risk analyses, and supportability and effectiveness analyses for subsystems and system elements
Performs customer requirements analysis, develops system requirements and defines allocations to lower levels (elements and components)
Performs detailed technical analyses for a subsystem or system elements
Develops and evaluates systems, networks and information systems to ensure designs meet applicable governmental security specifications
May provide system accreditation/certification evaluation and test support to ensure all technical security features (e.g., identification, authentication, access control, labeling, and auditing) of the system are considered and function properly
May develop system security documentation on both new and fielded information systemsÂ
Participates in Modeling and Simulation
Researches and analyzes data, such as vendor products, COTS components, GFE/CFE, specifications, and manuals to determine feasibility of design or application
Supports the generation of technical engineering products by using the appropriate standards, processes, procedures, and tools throughout the system development life cycle
May provide leadership and/or direction to lower level employees
Independently determines proposed approach to solutions
Contributes to the completion of major programs and projects
Plans and executes project tasks for activities described above
Creative, innovative responsibilities requiring advanced decision-making skills
Defines processes for technical platforms, system specifications, input/output and working parameters for hardware and/or software compatibility
Demonstrates good judgment in selecting methods and techniques for obtaining solutions
Designs a complete and complex framework, system or product
Identifies, analyzes and resolves system design weaknesses
Regular contact with senior levels of internal work groups
Works under limited direction
Contact with Deputy Program Managers Engineering (DPME) and other professionals within the Engineering department and with project teams across the company
Frequent contact with external customers
Travel may be required
Security clearance may be required
Provides resolution to a diverse range of complex problems
Independently determines approach to solutions
Keeps abreast of technology trends
Contributes to the achievement of business objective

KNOWLEDGE SKILLS AND ABILITIES:

Proficient use and understanding of systems engineering concepts, principles, and theories
Proficient knowledge of other related disciplines
Proficient with requirements management & system modeling tools
Recognizes various architectural patterns
Proficient in Microsoft Office applications
Proficient written and verbal communications skills
Able to sell concepts and ideas
Creative thinker
Ability to multi-task
Proficient ability to grasp and apply new information quickly and effectively handle complex assignments
Shows initiative on assignments, exercises independent judgment and professionally executes projects with little direction
Proficient ability in communicating issues, impacts, and corrective actions
Proficient ability to clearly report relevant to sound systems engineering design
Company Overview:

General Dynamics Mission Systems (GDMS) engineers a diverse portfolio of high technology solutions, products and services that enable customers to successfully execute missions across all domains of operation. With a global team of 12,000+ top professionals, we partner with the best in industry to expand the bounds of innovation in the defense and scientific arenas. Given the nature of our work and who we are, we value trust, honesty, alignment and transparency. We offer highly competitive benefits and pride ourselves in being a great place to work with a shared sense of purpose. You will also enjoy a flexible work environment where contributions are recognized and rewarded. If who we are and what we do resonates with you, we invite you to join our high performance team!

General Dynamics is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer that is committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/Disability/Veteran

To learn more about the General Dynamics Mission Systems Pittsfield facility, click HERE.",3.6,"General Dynamics Mission Systems, Inc
3.6","Pittsfield, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1952,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
149,Design Automation Engineer,-1,"The Role

Accessibility Notice: If you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process due to a physical or mental disability, please send an email to acmtc.recruiter@us.atlascopco.com or call 805-928-5757.

Reasonable accommodation requests will be considered on a case-by-case basis.

Atlas Copco Gas and Process is seeking a Design Automation Engineer to reside in either Voorheesville, New York, Cologne, Germany, Santa Maria, California, Pune, India, or the possibility of working remotely. The primary objectives of this position include:

Work with a global team of experts focused on developing next generation design automation software built on top of the latest Computer-Aided Technologies (CAx). Utilize multidisciplinary experience from mechanical/aerodynamic engineering, Knowledge-Based Engineering (KBE), and Software Engineering to formally capture knowledge for reuse in design automation software applications.

Work as a team to conceptualize, develop, and deploy design methods in form of engineering and design automation software
Develop robust intelligent parametric components of larger software solutions with the intent of automating the engineering and design of high tech Engineered-to-Order products
Work as part of an agile engineering and design automation software development team
Programmatically represent complex mathematical models encapsulating engineering knowledge and rules
Capture, and formalize, engineering knowledge as normalized data for consumption in software applications
Work with stakeholders to gather project requirements, gather and refine product rules, and create prototype solutions for preliminary review for clarity prior to formal software development
Reverse engineer existing designs to capture methods for encapsulation in design automation software
Continuously advance specialized knowledge through engagement with external communities of experts/3rd parties and training

What you can expect from us?

Imagine yourself working in a company shaped by endless innovation. With us, you are given plenty of freedom to follow your ambitions and act as an entrepreneur, surrounded by the stability of a leading company. When you join Atlas Copco you get a great deal of responsibility from day one. Why? Because we know that you have the drive and the ability to make sound decisions – and will ask for help when you need it. As a global company, we are proud to be a diverse and multi-talented group of people that provides fresh ideas on how to best serve our customers. We feel strongly about promoting equal opportunities and growing sustainably with a long-term perspective.

What we expect of you?

B.S. in Mechanical Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Software Engineering, or Computer Science
Minimum of 8 years of experience in CAx Design Automation, KBE, or equivalent
Minimum of 5 years of experience in industrial, aerospace, automotive, heavy equipment, or Turbomachinery industries
Design Automation software solutions are diverse making many of the following, or equivalent, a plus:
Expert in parametric and product/component modeling technologies for automation
PTC / Creo parameter/relations-based modeling, Dassault Systems SolidWorks equation-based modeling, or equivalent CAx software parametric engine
Complex freeform modeling
Interpart modeling
System Level Design (i.e. Top Down Design)
Familiarity and appreciation for programming technologies
Microsoft.NET (C#, VB.NET, C++), Java, Python, MS VBA, Spreadsheet programming, or equivalent programming language experience
PTC Creo APIs, Dassault Systems SolidWorks APIs, or equivalent CAx API development experience
Relational database (Access, MS SQL Server, Oracle, etc) and SQL Experience
Familiarity and appreciation for user interface technologies
WPF.NET, Winforms, CAx UI authoring tools (i.e. PTC Creo UI Editor)

City
Voorheesville, Santa Maria, Cologne Germany, Pune India

Recruiter
cassandra.quinn@atlascopco.com

Hiring Manager
Aaron Elliott

Passionate people create exceptional things
At Atlas Copco we believe in challenging the status quo, always looking for a better way. Our leading-edge technology enables us to innovate for a sustainable future.
We believe that people make it happen and with us you are empowered to act. Your ideas can make a real difference and contribute to the quality of life for people everywhere.
We offer a wide range of interesting job roles and many opportunities to grow. This is where it begins – Join us at the Home of Industrial Ideas.",-1,Comptec NY,"Santa Maria, CO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
150,Systems Engineer - Requirements,-1,"About Highlight:

Know Way. Know How.

For over ten years, Highlight has provided Development and Modernization, Secure IT and Mission Solutions for our federal government customers. We know the technology; we understand the way our customers and their stakeholders work; and we know how to implement industry best practices for development and services, delivering end-to-end solutions that minimize risk and maximize results.

Overview:

You will join a team which is responsible for ensuring the Department of State's IT programs and system capabilities are in place to meet vital Diplomatic and National Security needs. You will help the State Department meet its mission to lead “America’s foreign policy through diplomacy, advocacy, and assistance by advancing the interests of the American people, their safety and economic prosperity.”

To do this, we need highly skilled professionals with a history of successfully supporting IT systems and platforms to meet missions of national importance. You will efficiently and effectively deliver support to ensure the welfare and protection of U.S. citizens abroad, for the issuance of passports and other documentation to citizens and nationals, and for the protection of U.S. border security and the facilitation of legitimate travel to the United States.

As a Requirements Systems Engineer, you will translate project requirements into project objectives and tasks, managing task assignment to project resources and reporting on and managing project scope throughout the lifecycle. You will manage all aspects of projects including scope, schedule, resources, quality, costs, change and risk.

Responsibilities:
Conduct internal and customer kick off meetings establishing understanding and consensus on project objectives and timelines.
Organize and facilitates release planning, daily stand-up meetings, reviews, retrospectives, and sprint planning, demos and other Scrum related meetings.
Update agile tracking systems to provide transparency on Product & Sprint Backlogs.
Assist with internal and external communication, improving transparency and distributing timely information.
Identify and manage project dependencies, critical paths and risks.
Assist team with making appropriate commitments through story selection and task definition.
Identify and remove impediments, preventing distractions that interfere with the ability of the team to deliver sprint and project goals.
Set and manage client expectations by solving complex issues and changes when appropriate exercising complex Risk, Issue and Change Management best practices.
Proactively review project deliverables for accuracy and apprise management of issues affecting project status offering solutions to solve the issues.
Work with internal and client departments to coordinate systems testing, user acceptance testing, installation and support.
Proactively manage changes in project scope, identifies potential out of scope activities and devises contingency plans.
Coordinates and directs geographically dispersed project teams to meet project objectives.
Ensure satisfactory transfer of possession and control of deliverables upon completion (handoff) and close all associated documentation and archive appropriate records.
Qualifications:
Current Top Secret clearance.
5 years of experience with Bachelor's degree, 3 years with Master's, or 9 years of relevant experience.
Demonstrated understanding of Agile project management, the Agile life cycle and Agile practices in use, and the information flow required including the metrics and data points used in feedback loops.
Demonstrated track record of successfully delivering solutions and managing multiple projects simultaneously.
Minimum of 1 year Agile Development Methodology.
2-5 years’ experience leading medium and large projects.
Demonstrated excellence in written and oral communication skills along with proven success working in an integrated product team environment.
Prior experience as a Systems Engineer (Systems Architecture, System Requirement Definition, Integration & Test, etc).
Technical leadership experience (Integrated Product Team Lead, Systems Engineering Lead, Chief Engineer, Chief Architect, Integration & Test Lead, etc).

Preferred Qualifications:

Experience working with Department of State CA/CST programs.
Prior experience negotiating with customers to convert customer needs into testable system requirements.
Experience reviewing and recommending new equipment and HW/SW requirements.
Experience reviewing and recommending cloud services.
:

#nw",4.0,"Highlight Technologies, LLC
4.0",Virginia,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
151,Database Administrator - Cloud Services,-1,"Why 2nd Watch

2nd Watch is in growth mode, and we are looking for like-minded, focused team members to join us! We are looking for the most technically forward-thinking, cloud-passionate employees in the world, and strive daily to align our core values with those that we hire Elevating Each Other, Being Outcome Driven, Winning as a Team, Being Bold, Trusting Each Other, and Having FUN! these are all key elements to who we hire.

2nd Watch has a unique company culture and working environment that live and breathe success and promote pushing the envelope every day in your respective role at the company. This is what drives our teams a perpetual thirst for knowledge, and a desire to work with the best people and take on big challenges together. Getting our attention takes creativity, integrity, a desire to improve yourself and your co-workers each day, and a track record of caring about who you are affecting, both positively and negatively, while you are getting the right stuff done.

We offer roles ranging from all levels in our Sales, Managed Cloud Services, Cloud Enablement, DevOps, Product Development teams and beyond. We are looking for superstars to help raise the bar, setting industry-level standards around project management and delivery of AWS, Azure, and Google Cloud services.

About 2nd Watch

As a cloud native company, 2nd Watch has walked alongside our clients for over a decade helping them migrate to the cloud, accelerate application development, and deliver on their companys strategic goals through the blend of technology and innovation that is at our core. Our services deliver cloud native capabilities through strategic consulting, modernization services, and specialized technology practices focused on maximizing the value of public cloud through:
Business Transformation
Cloud Advisory
Datacenter Migration & Application Modernization
Optimization
Data Engineering
Compliance, Security & Business Continuity
DevOps
Managed Cloud services
With a client NPS of 85, our approach has been successful for some of the worlds leading brands and is tested, trusted, and proven to accelerate your cloud adoption.

2nd Watch is an AWS Partner Network (APN) Premier Consulting Partner, a Microsoft Azure Gold Partner, and a Google Cloud Platform Partner. The venture-backed company is headquartered in Seattle, Washington. To learn more about 2nd Watch, visit www.2ndwatch.com or call 888-317-7920.

Position Title:

Database Administrator ( DBA ) Cloud Services

The ideal candidate is someone who

· Operates with the highest levels of integrity

· Thinks Big and takes on Big Challenges

· Has a continuous thirst for knowledge and is a perpetual learner

· Strives to make themselves and everyone around them better

· Has a passion for technology

Database Administrator - Cloud

Continue building your technical skills with an awesome team of industry professionals
Make your mark in this rapidly growing startup as we bring Cloud Services to the Enterprise
Work closely with top-tier customers to ensure success in a highly rewarding role

2nd Watch (www.2ndwatch.com ) is a global systems integrator based in the US, and we specialize in helping enterprise customers migrate their infrastructure to the cloud using the majority of opensource technologies. Were well funded, growing rapidly and have already established an impeccable track record of customer success across the country.

We're building our team with talented and passionate Database Administrators to maintain client databases & applications.

Were hiring exceptional Database Administrators to work with our enterprise customers. 2nd Watch puts our customers first and we obsess over ensuring their trust is our first priority. To earn that trust in a constantly changing technology arena like cloud-computing, it requires building a world-class team to tackle unforeseen challenges. You will be responsible for supporting, maintaining, configuring and troubleshooting a wide range of databases and applications spanning multiple clients.

Responsibilities:

Supporting a broad range of relational and non-relational database technologies, including but not limited to Aurora, MySQL, Oracle, SQL Server, PostgreSQL, NoSQL, DynamoDB, and Redshift
Installing database software
Creating databases
Performing upgrades and patching of the database and software to new release levels
Starting up and shutting down the database
Managing the databases storage structures
Managing users and security
Managing schema objects, such as tables, indexes, and views
Making database backups and performing recovery when necessary
Proactively monitoring the databases health and taking preventive or corrective action as required
Monitoring and tuning performance and query optimization
Perform regular security reviews including recommending gaps in infrastructure not meeting compliance rules (PCI, SOC2, HIPAA etc), document systems, processes, and procedures
Feed market intelligence and potential product improvements to the exec and technical team and development team
Expert development of run books and system configuration and architecture documentation
Continuously improve your skills, product expertise, and knowledge on related technical topics
Ensure that our applications and infrastructure are designed and implemented to the highest security standards thus maintaining and enhancing customer trust
Evangelize security within 2nd Watch and be an advocate for keeping customer information secure
Requirements:
Bachelors in Computer Science or related discipline
Experience working in public cloud infrastructures, such as AWS and Azure.
Experience working in large enterprise environments
Technical degree and 10+ years experience in Database Administration
AWS and database technology certifications are highly desired
Working knowledge of database administration activities including backup strategies and alerting
Automation experience a plus; Jenkins, Chef, Puppet, CloudFormation
You will have access to several customer production sites and applications.
Confidentiality and non-disclosure of client information is a requirement and non-negotiable
Familiarity of a disaster recovery process and reporting security breaches is desired
Familiarity with and experience working with the following compliance standards: Sarbanes Oxley, HIPAA, PCI, SOC-2
Powered by JazzHR",3.8,"2nd Watch, Inc.
3.8",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
152,Advanced Mechanical Engineer,$50k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"Basic Qualifications :

Bachelor’s degree in Mechanical Engineering, a related specialized area or field is required (or equivalent experience) plus a minimum of 5 years of relevant experience; or Master's degree plus a minimum of 3 years of relevant experience.

CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:

Applicants selected will be subject to a U.S. Government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Due to the nature of work performed within our facilities, U.S. citizenship is required.

Responsibilities for this Position:

Imagine building your career by developing the solutions that support the mission of our nation’s service members, intelligence analysts and first responders. That’s the challenge that’s waiting for you at General Dynamics Mission Systems. Here you have the opportunity to redefine innovation and excellence for the world. Are you ready? Then make a career move that makes an impact at General Dynamics Mission Systems.

We apply advanced technologies such as Artificial Intelligence, Blockchain, AR/VR, Cloud Native and Quantum Physics to solve our customers’ missions in cyber, RF, undersea, interstellar space and everything in between.

As an Advanced Mechanical Engineer, you’ll design and develop in such areas as mechanical, thermal, hydraulic, thermodynamic, or heat transfer for production, transmission, measurement, and use of mechanical and/or electromechanical systems, instruments, controls, engines and/or machines. Basically, you’ll test your skill and knowledge each and every day by working with the best of the best.

What you’ll experience:
Hands on approach for identifying and eliminating process inefficiencies and constraints using various data analysis techniques (TOC, SPC, DOE, 6 Sigma, etc.)
Applies Quality and SPC tools to manufacturing processes and performs analysis of the associated data to drive continuous improvement
Proficient use and understanding of tolerancing and performance budgeting in addition to Design for Manufacture (DFM) concepts, principles, and theories
Develops, evaluates, and improves manufacturing processes, utilizing knowledge of product design, materials and parts, fabrication processes, tooling and production equipment capabilities, assembly methods, and quality control standards
Identifies Key Process Characteristics (KPC’s) and tracks and reports in program metrics
Creates designs and releases models / drawings for tooling used in the fabrication and testing of optics and optical assemblies. Troubleshoots and modifies designs as required.
Solid knowledge with technical standards, manufacturing/fabrication methods, government/industry standards
Ensures compliance of practices, procedures and instructions relative to applicable corporate standards (ISO, MIL, etc)
Develops detailed work instructions for critical optical manufacturing processes / tests
Contributes to continuous improvement activities and Root Cause / Corrective Action investigations
Actively uncovers technical and organizational risks and ensures they are included in risk mitigation plans
What you bring to the table:
Solid understanding of statistics and application to manufacturing processes including statistical process control (SPC), design of experiments (DOE), statistical hypothesis testing.
3D CAD experience (Solidworks experience preferred)
Technical drawing knowledge: drawing standards, GD&T (Geometric, Dimensioning and Tolerancing), etc.
Ability to create verification compliance documents to show drawing requirements and customer / industry specifications are being adhered to
Knowledge of Design for Manufacturability and Design for Assembly
Requires technical evaluation skills, and basic manufacturing engineering knowledge
Six Sigma/lean manufacturing tool skills a plus
What sets you apart:
Creative thinking with the ability to multi-task
Ability to quickly grasp and apply new information
Effectively handle and lead complex assignments
Ability to write technical papers and proposals
Company Overview:

General Dynamics Mission Systems (GDMS) engineers a diverse portfolio of high technology solutions, products and services that enable customers to successfully execute missions across all domains of operation. With a global team of 12,000+ top professionals, we partner with the best in industry to expand the bounds of innovation in the defense and scientific arenas. Given the nature of our work and who we are, we value trust, honesty, alignment and transparency. We offer highly competitive benefits and pride ourselves in being a great place to work with a shared sense of purpose. You will also enjoy a flexible work environment where contributions are recognized and rewarded. If who we are and what we do resonates with you, we invite you to join our high performance team!

General Dynamics is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer that is committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/Disability/Veteran",3.6,"General Dynamics Mission Systems, Inc
3.6","Cullman, AL",-1,10000+ Employees,1952,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
153,Assistant Chief Bldg Engineer,-1,"JOB SUMMARY

Assist the Chief Engineer in directing the engineering departments operations (provide technical and administrative support), preplanning of mechanical preventive maintenance, and supervises and directs maintenance personnel in installation, repair, and maintenance of all mechanical and electrical equipment and systems. Assumes the Chief Engineers’ responsibilities as necessary. The Assistant Chief Engineer must strive for the highest level of professionalism, while meeting the clients needs, and a commitment to achieving the goal of 100% uptime within critical or noncritical facility operations.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES

Supervise and direct maintenance staff on shift and monitor performance of assigned responsibilities. Perform and/or direct the performance of all maintenance departmental service requests, insuring that work performed in these areas is accomplished efficiently with a minimum amount of disruption and inconvenience. Check malfunctioning equipment and ascertain corrective action required to restore to satisfactory operating condition.

Develops and/or reviews Maintenance Critical Environment Work Authorizations (CEWAs) for assigned facilities and systems. Reviews and concurs with Construction CEWAs for assigned systems.

Leads or directly operates and monitors critical and non-critical system equipment and components. Oversees CEWA work efforts (including 3rd party contractors) for the safe and compliant operation, maintenance (corrective and preventive), and modification of critical equipment. Disables and enables fire alarm control panels and systems.

Provide training and supervision aimed at expanding the capabilities of the operations staff. Specific duties include, but not limited to: Demonstrating the proper use and care of tools and instruments, giving hands on instruction in basic maintenance, safety, and trouble shooting procedures, recommending relevant outside engineering courses for enrollment and instilling an overall level of professionalism in manner and appearance.

Supervise and implement the preventative maintenance program. Specific duties include but are not limited to: scheduling of preventative maintenance with a minimum disruption of building services, performing and/or delegating preventative maintenance tasks to the appropriately qualified maintenance staff member, orders parts and equipment required for repair, maintenance and installation of new equipment and facilities, and maintains inventory.

Performs Building Management System Console operations.

Direct the performance of contracted maintenance work as needed. Specific tasks include but are not limited to: insuring the timely performance of maintenance contract work, overseeing the fulfillment of equipment warrantee obligations by the installer and securing equipment manuals and drawings from the installers/contractors.

Respond immediately to emergency situations (fire, evacuation, equipment failure, etc.) and customer concerns.

Comply with departmental policy for the safe storage, usage, and disposal of hazardous materials. Maintains a clean and safe workplace.

Insure the availability of an adequate operating inventory of tools and supplies. Specific duties include, but not limited to: Preparing and submitting purchase-order requests, developing sources for stock materials and performing periodic checks for supplies.

Responsible for the operational management and effective daily leadership and administration of the engineering team with the objectives of safely, efficiently, and effectively operating machinery and systems in a cost-effective manner. The Assistant Chief Engineer must ensure the highest level of professionalism, while meeting the clients’ needs, and commitment to achieving the goal of 100% uptime throughout the engineering team. Responsible for protecting and improving the value of the clients’ assets and ensuring that building engineering systems continue to perform their intended function.

Limited travel is required in this position.

Performs additional job duties as requested.

REQUIRED SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE, ABILITIES

5+ years experience in data center operations, maintenance, and engineering management supporting a Tier 3 or greater facility operations.

Strong working technical knowledge and understanding of critical data center systems, including HVAC, Standby emergency power, uninterruptable power supplies, and associated infrastructure.

Applicable license / permit for trade as required (e.g. HVAC, Journeyman or Master Electrician, City/State License).

Ability to effectively respond to sensitive issues, complex inquiries or complaints from clients, co-workers, supervisor, and/or management.

Proficient in basic computer applications and software such as MS Office.

IV. DESIRED SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE, ABILITIES

Operating Engineers license (SMA) or equivalent

Experience with CMMS and BAS

Prior experience in development of critical environment programs and procedures

Demonstrated verbal/written communication skills.

V. PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS

Employee will be required to frequently bend, squat, climb stairs and ladders, stand and walk and occasionally crawl and climb.

Employee is required to handle objects (manual de dexterity), push and pull, reach above shoulder level and have fine finger movements. The employee must be able to carry/lift loads of up to 50 lbs.

Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer Women/Minorities/Persons with Disabilities/US Veterans",3.8,"CBRE
3.8","Lincoln, RI",-1,10000+ Employees,1906,Company - Public,Real Estate,Real Estate,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
154,Design Automation Software Engineer,-1,"The Role

Accessibility Notice: If you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process due to a physical or mental disability, please send an email to acmtc.recruiter@us.atlascopco.com or call 805-928-5757.

Reasonable accommodation requests will be considered on a case-by-case basis.

Atlas Copco Gas and Process is seeking a Design Automation Software Engineer to reside in either Voorheesville, New York, Cologne, Germany, Santa Maria, California, Pune, India, or the possibility of working remotely. The primary objectives of this position include:

Work with a global team of experts focused on developing next generation design automation software built on top of the latest Computer-Aided Technologies (CAx). Utilize multidisciplinary experience from mechanical/aerodynamic engineering, Knowledge-Based Engineering (KBE), and Software Engineering to formally capture knowledge for reuse in design automation software applications.

Leverage core Engineering and Computer Science principals to realize CAD/CAM/CAE centric design automation software solutions
Envisage, gather requirements, architect, construct, and deploy engineering and design automation software
Responsible for conceptualizing hybrid solution architectures often leveraging out of the box CAx technologies as part of a larger custom software solution to facilitate rapid development/deployment
Support the full lifecycle of complex CAx design automation software from conception through run and maintain
Programmatically represent complex mathematical models encapsulating engineering knowledge and rules
Capture, and formalize, engineering knowledge as normalized data for consumption in software applications
Work as part of an agile engineering and design automation software development team
Continuously advance specialized knowledge through engagement with external communities of experts/3rd parties and training

What you can expect from us?

Imagine yourself working in a company shaped by endless innovation. With us, you are given plenty of freedom to follow your ambitions and act as an entrepreneur, surrounded by the stability of a leading company. When you join Atlas Copco you get a great deal of responsibility from day one. Why? Because we know that you have the drive and the ability to make sound decisions – and will ask for help when you need it. As a global company, we are proud to be a diverse and multi-talented group of people that provides fresh ideas on how to best serve our customers. We feel strongly about promoting equal opportunities and growing sustainably with a long-term perspective.

What we expect of you?

B.S. in Mechanical Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Software Engineering, or Computer Science
Minimum of 8 years of experience in CAx Design Automation, KBE, or equivalent
Minimum of 5 years of experience in industrial, aerospace, automotive, heavy equipment, or Turbomachinery industries
Design Automation software solutions are diverse making many of the following, or equivalent, a plus:
Expert with programming technologies
Microsoft.NET (C#, VB.NET, C++), Java, Python, MS VBA, Spreadsheet programming, or equivalent programming language experience
PTC Creo APIs, Dassault Systems SolidWorks APIs, or equivalent CAx API development experience
Relational database (Access, MS SQL Server, Oracle, etc) and SQL Experience
Working knowledge of user interface technologies
WPF.NET, Winforms, CAx UI authoring tools (i.e. PTC Creo UI Editor)
Familiarity and appreciation for parametric modeling technologies for automation
PTC / Creo parameter/relations-based modeling, Dassault Systems SolidWorks equation-based modeling, or equivalent CAx software parametric engine
Complex freeform modeling
Interpart modeling
System Level Design (i.e. Top Down Design)

City
Voorheesville, Cologne

Recruiter
cassandra.quinn@atlascopco.com

Start a journey towards something greater
At Atlas Copco we believe in challenging the status quo, always looking for a better way. Our caring culture and leading-edge technology enable us to innovate for a sustainable future. With us you become part of a global community of passionate people making a tangible impact on people’s lives.
We offer a wide range of interesting job roles and many opportunities to grow. This is where it begins – Join us at the Home of Industrial Ideas.",-1,Comptec NY,"Voorheesville, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
155,Software Development Engineer - AWS Security,$66k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"· Bachelors degree in Computer Science, related field, or equivalent work experience
· 3+ years of professional experience in software development
· 3+ years of professional experience with Java, C++, or similar object oriented language
· 3+ years of working knowledge of data structures, algorithm design, problem solving, and complexity analysis
· Experience with agile development or similar methodologies for continuous development of product and technology
· Experience with distributed systems and web services design and implementation

At Amazon Web Services (AWS), Security is job zero. Our team is responsible for inventing new security services that enable and automate security solutions at AWS’ massive scale. We are looking for a Software Development Engineer to help innovate and build new services from the ground up that will make security and innovation simultaneous for AWS product teams. You will have the opportunity to define, design, build, and operate new services from end to end in collaboration with industry leading security experts. You will work in an agile team to translate business requirements from senior leadership into tools and services that will influence how AWS product teams securely deliver the world’s largest cloud platform. Come build with us!

We are looking for SDE who is excited about engineering services and systems at AWS scale. You'll be designing for the AWS cloud on the AWS cloud. In this role you will be responsible for the architecture, design and implementation of highly scalable distributed systems that provide availability, scalability and latency guarantees. In addition you will be expected raise the standards of the organization by mentoring junior engineers, interviewing and upleveling the coding standards. This is a highly visible program across AWS where you will have the opportunity to have a huge impact.

You'll be part of a world-class team in a fast-paced environment that has the entrepreneurial feel of a start-up. This is an opportunity to operate and engineer systems on a massive scale, and to gain top-notch experience in cloud computing. You'll be surrounded by people who are smart, passionate about cloud computing, and believe that world class service is critical to customer success.

· Masters degree or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering, or related field
· Knowledge of professional software engineering practices & best practices for the full software development life cycle, including coding standards, code reviews, source control management, build processes, testing, and operations
· Experience in communicating with users, other technical teams, and senior management to collect requirements, describe software product features, technical designs, and product strategy
· Experience mentoring junior software engineers to improve their skills, and make them more effective, product software engineers
· Experience influencing software engineers best practices within your team
· Hands-on expertise in many disparate technologies, typically ranging from front-end user interfaces through to back-end systems and all points in between
· Meets/exceeds Amazon’s leadership principles requirements for this role
· Meets/exceeds Amazon’s functional/technical depth and complexity for this role
Amazon is an Equal Opportunity Employer – Minority / Women / Disability / Veteran / Gender Identity / Sexual Orientation / Age",3.9,"Amazon Dev Center U.S., Inc.
3.9","Herndon, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
156,Sr Software Engineer I,-1,"The Senior Software Engineer will work within a team environment supporting and developing web applications for our internal and external customers. The Software Engineer will be responsible for implementing provided specifications in an IDE for various technologies Microsoftf.NET, SQL Server and SQL Reporting Services with supervised technical management oversight. The individual will also be responsible for debugging and submitted customer issues with existing releases of applications, documentation of coded objects, customer issues analysis to determine gaps in functionality and development of business requirements. The Software Engineer will work within an Agile Software Development team environment with participation in daily scrums and planned sprints.

Responsibilities will include:
Application development programming from UML models and functional specification, at a high proficiency and quality level.
Candidate will provide software engineering and database management support related to tasking associated with the full application lifecycle which include software requirements analysis, software design, software development, software testing, and release management.
Software engineering assignments will be complex in scope to proto typing solutions for incorporation into a formal release. Database management and queries required to support in-country Qatar Program management requirements including scripts to update or correct records form data views and construct reports, dashboards and metric workflows.
Support product/application releases utilizing source code configuration management utilities and release procedures to insure version control and maintain quality standards.
Assist in the development of UML models and functional specification.
Interface with customers in support of deployment plans of newly released or beta applications and to gather business requirements
Required Skills:
Minimum 4+ years working with users, determine user requirements, hardware/software and remote device integration utilized in complex warehouse automation application deployments.
Formal education in OOD/OOA methods.
Ability to travel
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position will need a U.S. Security Clearance within 1 year of start date
Desired Skills:
SECRET clearance
Microsoft Team Foundation
Software development using Microsoft C#
Microsoft SQL.
Required Education :

Bachelor of Science (BS) Degree in Computer Science or Software Engineering or Management Information Systems or a related degree

U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems

170108

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Burlington, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
157,Data Engineer,$53k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"Basic Qualifications :

Bachelor’s degree in systems engineering, a related specialized area or field is required (or equivalent experience) plus a minimum of 2 years of relevant experience; or a Master's degree.

CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:

A TS/SCI security clearance with the ability to obtain a Polygraph is required at time of hire. Candidates must be able to obtain the Polygraph within a reasonable amount of time from date of hire. Applicants selected will be subject to a U.S. Government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Due to the nature of work performed within our facilities, U.S. citizenship is required.

Responsibilities for this Position:

Developing mission-critical systems that help keep people safe is what we do. At General Dynamics Mission Systems, you’ll be part of the team that helps heroes make a true impact. The work we do is important. The challenges we face are career-defining. The opportunity we can offer is one-of-a-kind.

We apply advanced technologies such as Artificial Intelligence, Blockchain, AR/VR, Cloud Native and Quantum Physics to solve our customers’ missions in cyber, RF, undersea, interstellar space and everything in between.

As a Data Engineer, you’ll lead model and simulation activities as you participate in requirements analysis and management, functional analysis, performance analysis, system design, trade studies, systems integration and test (verification). It’s your chance to step up to the challenge and prove you’re ready to lead the world.

REPRESENTATIVE DUTIES AND TASKS:

We are seeking a Data Engineer to support the Insider Threat mission. Data Engineers work with various security system data owners to automate data integration and collection strategies. Work closely with the data science team to ensure data cleanliness and accuracy.

Support data science team by designing, developing and implementing scalable ETL process for disparate datasets into a Hadoop infrastructure
Design, develop, implement and maintain data ingestion process from various disparate datasets using StreamSets (experience with StreamSets not mandatory)
Develop processes to identify data drift and malformed records
Develop technical documentation and standard operating procedures
Leads technical tasks for small teams or projects

KNOWLEDGE SKILLS AND ABILITIES:

Working knowledge of entity resolution systems
Experience with messages systems like Kafka
Experience with NoSQL and/or graph databases like MongoDB or ArangoDB
Any of the following databases: SQL, MongoDB, Oracle, Postgres
Working experience with ETL processing
Working experience with data workflow products like StreamSets or NiFi
Working experience with Python RESTful API services, JDBC
Experience with Hadoop and Hive/Impala
Experience with Cloudera Data Science Workbench is a plus
Understanding of pySpark Leadership experience
Creative thinker
Ability to multi-task
Excellent use and understanding of data engineering concepts, principles, and theories

#CJ3

#CB

Company Overview:

General Dynamics Mission Systems (GDMS) engineers a diverse portfolio of high technology solutions, products and services that enable customers to successfully execute missions across all domains of operation. With a global team of 13,000+ top professionals, we partner with the best in industry to expand the bounds of innovation in the defense and scientific arenas. Given the nature of our work and who we are, we value trust, honesty, alignment and transparency. We offer highly competitive benefits and pride ourselves in being a great place to work with a shared sense of purpose. You will also enjoy a flexible work environment where contributions are recognized and rewarded. If who we are and what we do resonates with you, we invite you to join our high performance team!

General Dynamics is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer that is committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/Disability/Veteran",3.6,"General Dynamics Mission Systems, Inc
3.6","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1952,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
158,Cloud Software Engineer (Clearance Required),$83k-$166k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the job:

You’ve got the hot skills, the winning attitude and the clearance, but maybe your job doesn’t live up to your career goals? At CollabraSpace, you decide which project best suits your interests, talents, and ambitions. Our tasks run the full range from Proof of Concept studies and QRC oriented tasks to Enterprise level production systems with ten thousand+ users. We’re looking for those interested in learning. Really. We have smart people and informed customers, and working together and learning from one another creates success for everyone. Tell us what you like to do, chances are we have a program ready to reward your talents.

Requirements:
Experience with distributed scalable Big Data Store (NoSQL) such as HBase, Cloud Base/Accumulo, Big Table, etc., as well as experience with the Map Reduce programming model, the Hadoop Distributed File System (HDFS), and technologies such as Hadoop, Hive, Pig, etc
Demonstrated work experience with Serialization such as JSON and/or BSON
Demonstrated work experience with developing restful services, Ruby on Rails framework, LDAP protocol configuration management and cluster performance management (e.g. Nagios)
Knowledge of analytical needs and requirements, query syntax, data syntax, data flows, and traffic manipulation
Clearance: Applicants must be U.S. Citizens possessing an active TS/SCI security clearance with Polygraph.
Additional Desired Experience:

Experience developing and deploying:
Analytics that include foreign language processing
Analytic processes that incorporate/integrate multi-media technologies, including speech, text, image and video exploitation
Analytics that function on massive data sets, for example more than a billion rows or larger than 10 Petabytes
Analytics that employ semantic relationships (i.e., inference engines) between structured and unstructured data sets
Analytics that identify latent patterns between elements of massive data sets, for example more than a billion rows or larger than 10 Petabytes
Analytics that employ techniques commonly associated with Artificial Intelligence, for example genetic algorithms.
Experience developing and deploying analytics that discover and exploit social networks.
About us: Collaboration is the fusion of people and ideas toward a common goal; and at CollabraSpace it’s part of everything we do. It's the foundation upon which Collabraspace was created, at the core of our corporate philosophy, and even represented in our logo where different pieces of one circle work together. As a technical services and product company, Collabraspace supports the critical mission of our nation’s security through ongoing collaboration with our team members, customers, and partners.

Across our 20+ programs we provide enterprise software development solutions and real-time collaboration to both government and private industry. CollabraSpace is headquartered in Annapolis Junction, MD, close to the majority of our work and therefore, close to you.

CollabraSpace Facts:
Team. At CollabraSpace, we truly believe in the team. We’ll always do our best to find a position that makes you happy to go to work every day, support the charitable causes that are important to you, and encourage your involvement with the company by providing events for the whole family.
Security. We offer competitive salaries but more than that, we make sure the salary we are offering you can be supported by multiple programs. Why is that important? See bullet #1; if you’re not happy we will do our best to find something that does make you happy.
Benefits. Our comprehensive benefits package means you pay very little for a full suite of coverage.
100% company paid premiums for Health and Dental plans for employees and eligible dependents.
100% company paid Life & Disability plans.
401(k) & Roth plan with company contribution immediately vested.
Annual bonus plan, spot bonuses for a job well done, and referral bonuses.
Paid Time Off (PTO) allowing you to use your time off as you see fit.
Formal education and training benefits.
Transparency. You have heard it before but here you’ll truly experience it. The management team “puts it all on the table” and always has an open door.
Training and Education. It’s part of our collaborative environment. Besides the traditional off-site training which we pay for upfront, CollabraSpace offers in-house Technical Exchanges on a range of topics presented by our own technical staff or industry partners.
Honors. We earned the Alliance for Workplace Excellence Award for 4 years running and have been named to the Baltimore Sun’s Top 100 Workplaces 2013, 2014, 2015, and 2016; an award given based on survey responses from our team members. We are consistently ranked as one of the Top IT Firms in Baltimore by the Baltimore Business Journal.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

CollabraSpace is an equal opportunity employer. Employment policies and decisions on employment and promotion are based on merit, qualifications, performance, and business needs. The decisions and criteria governing the employment relationship with all employees are made in a nondiscriminatory manner, without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, physical or mental disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, or any other factor determined to be unlawful by federal, state, or local statutes.

Make a life at CollabraSpace, not just a living!",5.0,"CollabraSpace, Inc.
5.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
159,Mid-Software Engineer (Clearance Required),$87k-$174k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the job:


You’ve got the hot skills, the winning attitude and the clearance, but maybe your job doesn’t live up to your career goals? At CollabraSpace, you decide which project best suits your interests, talents, and ambitions. Our tasks run the full range from Proof of Concept studies and QRC oriented tasks to Enterprise level production systems with ten thousand+ active users. We’re looking for those interested in learning. Really. We have smart people and informed customers, and working together and learning from one another creates success for everyone. Tell us what you like to do, chances are we have a program ready to reward your talents.

Requirements:
7 years of professional experience with any combination of object oriented software development methodologies and languages such as JAVA/Java EE, C/C++, JavaScript, Perl/Python and UNIX scripting
BS degree or higher in Computer Science or related discipline. Additional equivalent experience may be substituted for a degree.
Clearance: Applicants must be U.S. Citizens possessing an active TS/SCI security clearance with Polygraph.
Our work typically includes the following:
Technologies such as Spring Framework, MySQL database, Tomcat and Restful Web Services development.
Agile and Scrum methodologies.
Analyze user requirements to derive software design and performance requirements.
Develop software solutions by analyzing system performance standards, conferring with users and system engineers. Analyze system flow, data usage and work processes and investigate problem areas.
Design, code, test, debug and integrate new software or modify existing software to add new features.
Develop data queries for existing or proposed databases or data repositories.
Implement and develop algorithms to meet and /or exceed system performance and functional standards.
Review, write and make recommendations for software and system documentation and software development process standards.
Design and modify software systems, using scientific analysis and mathematical models to predict and measure outcome and consequences of design.
Serve as the team lead at the level appropriate to the software development process being used on any particular project.
About us:


Collaboration is the fusion of people and ideas toward a common goal; and at CollabraSpace it’s part of everything we do. It’s the foundation upon which Collabraspace was created, at the core of our corporate philosophy, and even represented in our logo where different pieces of one circle work together in synergy. As a technical services and product company, Collabraspace supports the critical mission of our nation’s security through ongoing collaboration with our team members, customers, and partners.

Across our 20+ programs we provide enterprise software development solutions and real-time collaboration to both government and private industry. CollabraSpace is headquartered in Annapolis Junction, MD, close to the majority of our work and therefore, close to you.
CollabraSpace Facts:
Team. At CollabraSpace, we truly believe in the team. We’ll always do our best to find a position that makes you happy to go to work every day, support the charitable causes that are important to you, and encourage your involvement with the company by providing events for the whole family.
Security. We offer competitive salaries but more than that, we make sure the salary we are offering you can be supported by multiple programs. Why is that important? See bullet #1; if you’re not happy we will do our best to find something that does make you happy.
Benefits. Our comprehensive benefits package means you pay very little for a full suite of coverage.
100% company paid premiums for Health and Dental plans for employees and eligible dependents.
100% company paid Life & Disability plans.
401(k) & Roth plan with company contribution immediately vested.
Annual bonus plan, spot bonuses for a job well done, and referral bonuses.
Paid Time Off (PTO) allowing you to use your time off as you see fit.
Formal education and training benefits.
Transparency. You have heard it before but here you’ll truly experience it. The management team “puts it all on the table” and always has an open door.
Training and Education. It’s part of our collaborative environment. Besides the traditional off-site training which we pay for upfront, CollabraSpace offers in-house Technical Exchanges on a range of topics presented by our own technical staff or industry partners.
Honors. We earned the Alliance for Workplace Excellence Award for 4 years running and have been named to the Baltimore Sun’s Top 100 Workplaces 2013, 2014, & 2015; an award given based on survey responses from our team members. We are consistently ranked as one of the Top IT Firms in Baltimore by the Baltimore Business Journal.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled
CollabraSpace is an equal opportunity employer. Employment policies and decisions on employment and promotion are based on merit, qualifications, performance, and business needs. The decisions and criteria governing the employment relationship with all employees are made in a nondiscriminatory manner, without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, physical or mental disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, or any other factor determined to be unlawful by federal, state, or local statutes.
Make a life at CollabraSpace, not just a living!",5.0,"CollabraSpace, Inc.
5.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
160,DOD Data Scientist/Engineer - Senior,$113k-$183k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview

Guidehouse is a leading management consulting firm serving the public and commercial markets. We guide our clients forward towards new futures that build trust in society and your professional skills along the journey. Join us at Guidehouse.

Responsibilities

In the position of Data Scientist, the incumbent will support the Naval Air Systems Command (NAVAIR) in a once-in-a-generation digital transformation, driving change and devising how data can be integrated, controlled, distributed, and accessed by programs, business units and operators across the enterprise. Guidehouse is seeking an enthusiastic data scientist with the desire to harness data through the application of data science principles, tools, and methods and to share this knowledge as a mentor and coach for others. The individual will support the NAVAIR Digital Group in establishing practical and applied data science practices at NAVAIR, and in solving complex problems that have data driven solutions. This individual will additionally mentor and instruct employees during this process with the goal or sharing their knowledge and growing the data science skill base in Southern Maryland at Patuxent River.

Qualifications

Security Clearance:

Must have an Active Secret Clearance or above.

Responsibilities:

Work with large, complex data sets.
Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed.
Conduct end-to-end analysis that includes data gathering and requirements specification, processing, analysis, ongoing deliverables, and presentations.
Build and prototype analysis pipelines iteratively to provide insights at scale.
Develop comprehensive understanding of data structures and metrics advocating for changes where needed for both products development and sales activity.
Interact cross-functionally with a wide variety of people and teams.
Work closely with engineers to identify opportunities for, design, and assess product improvement.
Make business recommendations (e.g. cost-benefit, forecasting, experiment analysis) with effective presentations of findings at multiple levels of stakeholders through visual displays of quantitative information.

:Required Skills

5 years of relevant work experience in data analysis or related field. (e.g., as a statistician / data scientist / computational biologist / bioinformatician).
Experience with statistical software (e.g., R, Python, Julia, MATLAB, pandas) and database languages (e.g., SQL).
Deep expertise and experience with statistical data analysis such as linear models, multivariate analysis, stochastic models, sampling methods.
Applied experience with machine learning on large datasets.
Experience articulating business questions and using mathematical techniques to arrive at an answer using available data. Experience translating analysis results into business recommendations
Able to clearly communicate (speaking and writing) technical concepts to a non-technical audience
Experience with data engineering and data security practices
Experience managing, unifying, and automating dataflows from disparate sources

Required Experience:

Masters Degree (preferred) or Bachelors Degree (required). Heavy preference given to Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Information Science, or a similar quantitative field
5 years related work experience with Masters (7 with Bachelors)
2 to 4 years of programming experience with the ability to write / maintain scripts in Python (or other scripting languages)
Strong understanding of SQL
Working knowledge of data format conversion
Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written.
Ability to work both independently and as part of a team.
Strong problem solving skills.
Ability to maintain a DOD Secret clearance required.

Desired Experience:

MS degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., statistics, operations research, bioinformatics, economics, computational biology, computer science, mathematics, physics, electrical engineering, industrial engineering).

Additional Requirements

The successful candidate must not be subject to employment restrictions from a former employer (such as a non-compete) that would prevent the candidate from performing the job responsibilities as described.

Disclaimer

About Guidehouse

Guidehouse is an Equal Employment Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status, religion, creed, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law, ordinance, or regulation.

Guidehouse will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law or ordinance including the Fair Chance Ordinance of Los Angeles and San Francisco.

If you have visited our website for information about employment opportunities, or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation, please contact Guidehouse Recruiting at 1-571-633-1711 or via email at RecruitingAccommodation@guidehouse.com. All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.

Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of Guidehouse and Guidehouse will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.

Rewards and Benefits

Guidehouse offers a comprehensive, total rewards package that includes competitive compensation and a flexible benefits package that reflects our commitment to creating a diverse and supportive workplace.

Benefits include:

Medical, Rx, Dental & Vision Insurance

Personal and Family Sick Time & Company Paid Holidays

Parental Leave and Adoption Assistance

401(k) Retirement Plan

Basic Life & Supplemental Life

Health Savings Account, Dental/Vision & Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts

Short-Term & Long-Term Disability

Tuition Reimbursement, Personal Development & Learning Opportunities

Skills Development & Certifications

Employee Referral Program

Corporate Sponsored Events & Community Outreach

Emergency Back-Up Childcare Program",3.6,"Guidehouse
3.6","Patuxent River, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
161,Principal Software Engineer Data Platform (Streaming),$147k-$237k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview Come join the ""Data Platform team"" as a ""Pricipal Software Engineer"". Data Platform team provides real-time streaming and Machine Learning platforms for use across Intuit for various data products. What you'll bring BS/MS in Computer Science or related area, or equivalent work experience 8+ years of experience developing systems/software for large business environments (Java, J2EE) 5+ years of experience designing complex distributed systems, management products or business applications Solid design and coding skills (Java, J2EE, PHP, Ruby, Perl, XML, REST, SOAP, JSON) Strong experience with Big Data and Streaming technologies like Kafka Strong OOD and SOA principles, with ability to implement them in a language of choice (Java/J2EE) Strong experience leading design and implementation of robust and highly scalable Data services Strong knowledge of JBoss, Maven and Spring Skilled in software development lifecycle processes. Experience with SCRUM, Agile and iterative approaches a plus Able to operate at highly varying levels of abstraction from business strategy to product strategy to high level technical design to detailed technical design to implementation Synthesize achievable solutions from diverse inputs, alternative sources (build / buy / partner) and complex data Experience with AWS services a plus Prior working experience in utility computing and/or cloud computing domain highly desired Team/Leadership Qualifications Team player possessing strong analytical, problem solving and communication skills Strong mentoring skills. Able to influence and communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical people Demonstrated ability to work with global teams across time zones Ability to work effectively in a fast paced, complex technical environment. High adaptability and flexibility Experience driving for results across cross-functional teams while maintaining effective working relationships Excellent communication skills. Communicates clearly, succinctly and persuasively to all levels of employees, customers and management (including executives) ""Self-starter"" attitude and the ability to make decisions independently How you will lead Drive significant technology initiatives end to end and across multiple layers of architecture Drive design and implementation of durable and software solutions that will solve critical customer problems Recommend development best practices for application development Recommend and support development tools Capture requirements and use cases Deliver technical design and implement highly available, scalable, and secure web services with excellent quality Partner with other groups both inside and outside of Intuit for cross-functional design, solution integration and on-boarding of mobile/SaaS/PaaS/web/desktop offerings Work with cross-functional team members from Architecture, Product Management, Q/A and Production Operations to develop, test, and release features Passionate for continuous learning, experimenting and applying cutting edge technology and software paradigms Actively stay abreast of mobile/SaaS/PaaS trends and standards, recommend best practices and share learning Pursue and resolve complex or unchartered technical problems and share key learnings Provide technical leadership and be a role model to software engineers pursuing technical career path in engineering Provide/inspire innovations that fuel the growth of Intuit as a whole Apply your experience and innovation to generate creative ideas for emerging business needs Coach and mentor other engineers in process and methodologies Provide perspective on leading industry trends, recommendations on new and emerging technologies, technology prototypes, patent proposals and engineering process improvements",4.2,"Intuit - Software Engineering
4.2","Mountain View, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1983,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
162,Senior Software Engineer (C++/.NET),-1,"NeuroWave Systems Inc. is a pioneering medical device manufacturer. Our goal is to revolutionize the standard of care in Anesthesia & Critical Care by providing next generation brain monitoring systems & automated drug-delivery devices to improve patient safety, outcomes and quality of life.

We are looking to fill an immediate opening for a software engineer with a background in data acquisition systems and/or multi-threaded software design to aid in the development and implementation of an advanced brain monitoring system for use in the operating room, and an autopilot for delivery of anesthesia/sedation for military and civilian applications. We are looking for someone with a solid technical background (C++/.NET) and good work ethics and interpersonal skills. The candidate must be detail-oriented, systematic, persistent, driven and willing to work hard. NeuroWave offers a strong salary, health benefits, 401(k) and outstanding growth potential.
Position Description:
Sr. Software Engineer is responsible for all aspects of software engineering and the full life cycle development in compliance with NeuroWave’s Quality Management System (ISO 13485 compliant). The individual will work in a small focused team that operates in a dynamic and fast-paced environment. This position will involve software design, implementation, verification/validation and documentation of Windows IOT-based medical monitors, which collect, analyze, and display real-time physiological data obtained from our advanced data acquisition systems, and which also communicate with and control our proprietary infusion pumps.
Basic Qualifications:
5-10 years of SW engineering industry experience, with strong emphasis on Object-Oriented Analysis and Design
Experience with the following development languages:
C/C++
C#/.NET
Experience with the following Operating Systems:
Windows XP/7/8/10/IOT
Experience with the following tools/technologies:
Visual Studio
Excellent technical, conceptual and problem solving skills
Excellent written and verbal communication skillsOther Qualifications (a plus):
Knowledge of Graphical User Interface development is strongly desired
Knowledge of embedded system development
Knowledge of Borland C++/ Embarcadero (RAD Studio) products
Experience with data analysis/ digital signal processing tools
Matlab
GNU Octave
Scilab
Experience with mobile development technologies
OS: Android/IOS
Dev: Xamarin
Experience with any RTOS (VxWorks, QNX, Nucleus, etc.)
Experience with HTML/CSS/JavaScript
Experience in software product life cycles
Experience in working within an established quality system, preferably related to medical device design, manufacturing and servicing (e.g., ISO 13485, FDA cGMP)Education Requirements:
Bachelors in Computer Science or related discipline. Higher degree is welcome.
Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
relevant: 5 years (Required)
Software Engineering: 5 years (Preferred)",4.0,"NeuroWave Systems Inc
4.0","Cleveland Heights, Cuyahoga, OH",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
163,Geospatial Data Engineer with TS/SCI Clearance,$55k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Travel Required: None
Requisition Type: Regular

GDIT is your place. You make it your own by embracing autonomy, seizing opportunity, and being trusted to deliver your best every day. We think. We act. We deliver. There is no challenge we can’t turn into opportunity. And our work depends on TS/SCI level cleared Geospatial Data Engineer joining our team to support our Intelligence customer in Springfield, VA

The Geospatial Data Engineer is required to extract and/or acquire geospatial information, derivative information and multi-INT data for analysis and visualization to solve problems and enhance the knowledge of NGA missions. This also includes extracting specific feature data in accordance with the NGA Feature Data Specifications, project specific guidance, and other NGA data and product specifications.

Required Skills
BS/BA and 8+ years of experience or equivalent years of education and experience
At least 3+ years of experience in engineering and managing spatial data infrastructure to include both proprietary and open source technologies. This includes experience conducting data transformations between spatial data formats, QA/QC on data, understanding NSG data schemas, database management, and managing OGC compliant web services.
Must have a strong background in Relation Database Management System (RDBMS) and NoSQL concepts and tools to include firm understanding of SQL and Python syntax for ETL workflows.
Must be comfortable working in a linux shell environment as well as standard GUI management tools.
Prior experience deploying and using PostgreSQL and Postgis extension to manage spatial data.
Prior experience deploying and managing open source spatial data web servers such as GeoServer, MapServer, TileserverGL, or similar to enable OGC compliant web services.
Comfortable using GDAL, GRASS, GeoPandas, Rasterio, or other open source geoprocessing applications and tools.
Prior AWS Development or DevOps experience. Prior Elasticsearch experience creating and managing indexes.
Must have a Secret clearance and/or eligible for TS/SCI clearance

Job Duties

Create, update, and manage geospatial information system databases and products.
Obtain, compile and assess geospatial data sets to support requirements.
Collaborate with analysts and customers as required.
Use a variety of geospatial analysis software suites to accomplish the mission.
Provide geospatial analysis services in the form of datasets and visualization products

#GDITPriority

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Springfield, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
164,Electrical Engineer II,-1,"Who Are We?

QinetiQ Inc. is a leading innovator with over 25 years of experience rapidly developing advanced C5ISR sensor solutions and is a renowned world leader in robotics and autonomy.

The combined QinetiQ U.S. business unit brings capabilities across the full lifecycle of technology development from applied research and development to rapid prototyping, testing, fielding, and sustainment. Our expertise with unmanned platforms, broad sensing modalities, and cross-domain interoperability ensures that we deliver integrated solutions for Warfighter dominance in all phases of combat.

We are a world-class team of professionals who deliver next generation technology and products in robotic and autonomous platforms and systems, ground systems, soldier systems, maritime systems, airborne sensors and payloads, processing and exploitation capabilities, and integrated C2 solutions. Much of our work contributes to innovative research in ﬁelds such as sensor science, signal processing, data fusion, artiﬁcial intelligence (AI), machine learning (ML), and augmented reality (AR).

Our customers are always our number one priority and we consistently deliver Mission-Led Innovation to empower and protect our Defense and Security forces in the U.S. and abroad.

Your Contribution to Our Mission:

Support our experienced engineering staff in the design and development of EO/IR Sensor Systems and Embedded Electronics/Computing Systems for military applications.

Work with a dynamic team of Electrical, Electronic and Firmware Engineers in the prototype development and transition/fielding of leading edge technologies supporting MTEQ’s military customer base.

Participate in the design, development and testing of these systems, alongside leading experts in their field as part of a multi-disciplinary development team.

To Land This Job, You Need:

BS or MS degree in Electrical Engineering or equivalent discipline.
Minimum of 3 years related experience.
Intimately familiar with BETSS-C, BSS, PSSG and GBOSS systems and any other PM FPS QRC programs.
Ability to work through electrical, network, & configuration with components of all systems.
Familiar with and experience in participating in the CM/CCB process to evaluate baseline programs and ECP/ECRs.
Ability to identify issues with these systems to develop field bulletins and solutions for deployed systems worldwide.
Ability to interpret and understand engineering drawings, documents, and procedures.
Experience creating preliminary concepts and schematics for custom electronics designs.
Experience selecting electronic components for new and existing designs.
Experience collaborating with other engineering disciplines to develop new and retrofit hardware designs.
Familiarity with equipment and methodology for testing, troubleshooting, and diagnostics of electrical and electronic equipment and systems

Clearance Level Must Be Able to Obtain:

DOD Secret

Why QinetiQ Inc.?

Your work will contribute to the protection of American Warfighters and Security Forces.
Opportunity to work with cutting edge technology.
Extensive opportunities for continuous learning, professional growth and advancement.
We only hire the best! No matter if you are entry or senior level, you will have the opportunity learn from some of the best in the industry.
We have fun! We regularly have company events, from luncheons and costume contests to golf tournaments.
We care about YOU and YOUR FAMILY. We offer competitive benefits and health insurance options.

No One Has Time for Long Job Applications!

We completely understand. That is why we have made the application process easy. We promise. This will be simple.

Accessibility/Accommodation:

If because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to staffing@us.qinetiq.com or call (540) 658-2720 Opt 4 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.

QinetiQ Inc. is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.5,"QinetiQ Inc.
3.5","Lorton, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2001,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
165,EIT Certified Civil Engineer,$57k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"Essential Functions *
We are looking for Junior Qualified Professional candidates who already possess the following degrees: PE, PG, CEG (Civil Engineer, Professional Geologist, and Engineering Geologist).

The Jr. Septic Qualified Professional is responsible for supporting the Sr. Septic Qualified Professional by attending site & soil evaluations and supporting the team with design & installation field activities. He/she must understand and keep apprised of current local regulations, developing and fostering relationships with local regulators, contractors & vendors in the onsite industry.
Responsibilities: *
Understand and review soil evaluations and septic designs to submit to local regulators.

Nature and develop relationship with local regulations.

Identify regulatory drivers and trends

This position must be a self-motivated, energetic and service oriented individual who has a high-level of work intensity to be an individual contributor in providing the best level of

This individual must effectively manage a variety of various situations on a day-by-day basis that supports the team (Project Manager, Sales, Jr Qualify Professional, and Field

Technician) manpower, time, goals and objectives.

Basic people skills and clear communication skills both written and verbal are important when dealing with customers and coworkers.

Attention to detail: Exceptional organizational skills and attention to detail are essential.

Analyze soil and permeability data for Site Evaluation Reports generated internally by the company or by external QPs.

To identify local regulations and trends of the market
Requirements of the Position*
Education: *REHS, PE, CEG, or MA in a related field desirable.
• 5+ years of field work in County or State level regulatory experience preferable.

• Proven results in OWTS Plan Review, Civil or Survey Plan review.

• Track record of using qualitative and quantitative data to prioritize and drive decision-making.

• Excellent communication skills (documentation, listening/reading/writing)
Experience: *
• Provide a positive, friendly collaborative attitude in team environment
• Strong computer skills (Word, Excel, data entry, software systems)
• Ability to multi-task and work in a fast-paced environment
• Demonstrate excellent attendance and be able to adhere to a set schedule
• Preferred previous software/platform experience in AutoCAD and BlueBeam.
• Understand the wastewater/water treatment/similar industries (centralized or decentralized) market (desirable).
Specific Knowledge: *
• Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Installation, Operations, Maintenance

• Soil Field Texturing with COWA or NOWRA sponsored workshop/certification.

• Metrics-driven: Strong analytical and synthesis skills are a must, including the ability to absorb and process large amounts of data into actionable information.

• Must be a strong writer to generate clear and precise Site Evaluation Reports and Septic Plans and Specifications.

• Excellent people and management skills to interact with staff, colleagues, cross-functional teams and third parties. Excellent communication and presentation skills to effectively communicate
Skills: *information to business owners and to all levels within the organization
• Understanding of company products, services, and policies.
• Strong organization, time management and decision-making skills - able to meet deadlines, follow through with customers, and handle various multiple tasks in a day setting.

• Proficiency with computers, especially AutoCAD or BlueBeam software.
• Adaptability and accountability – able to make changes and accommodations as needed for the business. Reliable in role and responsibilities.

• Collaborative
• Service Oriented
• Integrity
• Ethical
• Learning knowledge of products and services – passionate for the business

Personal Characteristics:
• Attention to detail and organization
• Adaptability
• Positive Attitude & Enthusiasm in role
• Ability to communicate clear and effectively
• Collaborative
• Own a sense of integrity and follows a moral/ethical code of conduct
Final Description*
This individual will encompass the following:

· Ability to conduct siting and OWTS layout or capable of developing this skill independent of direct SQP field supervision.

· Strong verbal and written communication skills for internal and external partners.

· Knowledge of basic familiarity with a vast array of OWTS products, services and policies.

· Possess professional courtesy to interact with clients and occasionally the general public to answer common questions company’s products and

· Ability to multitask and remain calm under pressure, especially during peak seasons or intense situations.

· Be proficient with necessary technologies including computers, software applications, phone systems, etc.

· Ability to speak and communicate with regulators to ensure compliance.

· Ensure customer satisfaction and provide the highest level of professional customer support.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $55,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday",3.9,"Rotoplas USA
3.9","Fairfield, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1978,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
166,Staff Engineer (Geotechnical),$31k-$46k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

This position exists primarily to oversee and/or manage Geotechnical, CMT, and/or Environmental project activities and prepare high level analytical project reports. The incumbent is also responsible for ensuring client satisfaction and may be tasked with teaching, scheduling, coordinating and overseeing the activities of Field Professionals and Technicians.
The work requires the exercise of independent judgment and discretion in handling specific details and activities. The incumbent is expected to work both independently and within a team environment with minimum supervision.

Responsibilities:

Essential Functions:

Evaluate, discuss and understand client needs and prepare subsequent proposals.
Coordinate and manage routine geotechnical, CMT and/or environmental project activities, including staff or field operations and/or selected lab activities.
Inspect work and/or troubleshoot field quality control issues and make recommendations for corrections.
Accurately correlate basic soil properties with field data and classification test results.
Prepare high level analytical geotechnical, CMT and/or environmental reports for appropriate and timely distribution.
Track budgets & project financials for accuracy; invoice clients appropriately.
Maintain positive business relationships with clients, government officials, contractors, etc.
Participate in professional meetings and/or business development functions as needed.
Perform other special assignments and projects as assigned by Branch or Project Management.

Key Competencies:

Solid knowledge of engineering principals.
Thorough knowledge of Geotechnical, Construction Materials Testing and/or Environmental practices, procedures, codes and standards.
Ability to communicate effectively with a thorough knowledge of business English, spelling, arithmetic and vocabulary. Communications must be open and honest in keeping with Building & Earth open communication philosophy.
Ability to create and maintain accurate and confidential records and data and to prepare easily understandable reports for distribution.
Ability to organize, coordinate and prioritize tasks and schedules.
Ability to build and maintain effective working relationships with other employees, clients and client representatives and the public with a focus on maintaining a Customer/Client focus at all times.
Ability to dress, speak and act professionally & appropriately.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering or related field
PE License required or able to obtain within six months
3 years’ experience OR Master’s degree in related field
Experience in geotechnical investigations, geotechnical (or related) reports, defining testing plans, interpreting test data, performing engineering analyses for foundation design, drilling, boring plan layout, site preparation issues and/or slope stability.",4.5,"Building & Earth Sciences
4.5","Tulsa, OK",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
167,"Validation Engineer/Senior Validation Engineer, Quality Assurance",$54k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are seeking a highly dynamic and experienced Validation Engineer to join the Quality Assurance team to support the manufacturing of commercial Oligonucleotide API, as well as to provide validation support for internal computer systems. This individual will work closely with internal groups such as technical operations, IT, clinical, data management , and external stakeholders to enable successful completion of program milestones.

Qualifications, Requirements and Responsibilities:

The ideal candidate will have 5+ years of experience in the field of validation for the manufacture of Oligonucleotide API along with experience with computer validation.

Experience in a cGMP regulated manufacturing environment, with exhibited knowledge or proficiency in regulations related to equipment validation, process validation, computer validation, and quality systems.

Prior experience with the manufacture of Oligonucleotides experience is preferred.

A BS degree in Engineering or related field is required.

Ability to speak, present data, and defend approaches in front of audiences and inspectors.

Ability to comprehend technical information related to equipment, processes, computer systems, and regulatory expectations.

Experience and participation in regulatory inspections or audits.

Provide support for validation activities related to Dicerna products produced at 3rd party CMOs/ CTLs.

Participate in providing quality input for protocol generation, execution, and final package preparation for process, equipment, facility, and process validation experiments and studies.

Review and approve equipment/facilities/utilities requirements, qualification protocols and summary reports , as well as requirements traceability matrices for compliance to quality system requirements.

Develop and execute computer system validation protocols to validate internal Dicerna computer systems.

Development and implementation of SOPs/protocols/specifications/plans/reports with systemic procedural improvements related to validation activities.

Interact with third party manufacturers remotely and/or on-site.

Review and approve change controls related to the implementation of process changes, method improvements, and equipment upgrades at Dicerna CMOs.

Identify roadblocks and barriers ; develop resolutions and know when to communicate them; provide clear communication to team members to meet project expectations ; analyze data; evaluate results; form conclusions; recommend equipment and/or process improvements.

Knowledge of regulatory requirements for computer system

Knowledge of GLP, GMP, GCP, Part 11 regulations, FDA Guidance's for Industry, EU regulations, GAMP 5, and other standards.

Knowledge of global industry standards, for example: ISO, AAMI, and ANSI.

Experience with cold chain validation, shipping/distribution studies (specifically for combination devices) and packaging development (including labeling) is a plus.

Strong hands-on technical leadership and strong communication skills (written and verbal), including experience presenting in front of multidisciplinary teams.

Provide technical quality support on multiple drug manufacturing projects operating in parallel.

Perform investigations and resolution of validation failures, process validation experiment issues, process deviations, abnormal results, and other quality performance indicators.

Assist in the development and implementation of validation plans, inspection and testing strategies. Provide support for the implementation of process and product qualifications and validations.

Maintain quality system processes and procedures to ensure compliance to all company SOPs specifically for process and computer validation projects. Keep current on all applicable best practices and statutory regulations governing the design, procurement, manufacture, marketing, and distribution of combination products.

Knowledge of Microsoft Office® applications and spreadsheet programs such as Excel, Visio, Word, Power Point, and Microsoft Project.

Use of various remote working tools such as GoToMeeting and Zoom.

The ability to work independently with minimal supervision, interact with staff (at all levels) in a fast-paced environment, sometimes under pressure, remaining flexible, proactive, resourceful and efficient, with a high level of professionalism.

Excellent written and verbal communication skills, strong negotiation and decision-making skills, and attention to detail are equally important.

The ability to comprehend regulations and guidance documents, apply critical thinking skills to evaluate requirements, effectively communicate written and oral findings.

Strong organizational skills, with the ability to handle multiple tasks.

Ability to use risk assessment tools to support validation projects.

Skills:

Validation

People Skills

Quality Mindset

Strong Customer Satisfaction Focus

Team Oriented

Communication

Collaborative

Results

Problem Solving

Mathematical Skills",4.7,"Dicerna
4.7","Boulder, CO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2007,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
168,Software Engineer II - JAVA / Information Exploitation,-1,"U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.

Who we are
BBN Technologies is a premier research and development centers. Our diverse research portfolio combines the best technologies to deliver innovative, custom solutions with real-world benefit.

Located in Arlington, VA, our Information Exploitation group is seeking a Staff Scientist with software research interests. Our world-class team works with a broad range of Government agencies to solve problems that are both technically challenging and have a real operational impact. The ideal candidate will have strong experience in Java development with some experience or interest in machine reasoning, semantic web technologies, data analytics, or artificial intelligence technologies.

What you will do
Our research work applies the above technologies to build both prototype and real operational systems. You will be working on challenging problems including:

• Producing sophisticated software in a fast-paced agile environment;
• Developing mission-critical applications for deployment into global enterprise operations;
• Optimizing software for knowledge representation, storage, and query systems for high performance.
• Designing novel machine reasoning and learning algorithms and solutions to complex, open-ended intelligence problems.

What you will need
• BS in Computer Science or equivalent discipline and 2 years of experience; or MS in Computer Science or equivalent discipline and 0 years of experience.
• Proficiency in Java and the Java-based development ecosystem.
• Current DoD or IC Top Secret security clearance with SSBI. US citizenship is required

Other skills that would be awesome!
• 2-3 years of related research experience in one of the technical areas mentioned above.
• Experience with Web application development.
• Familiarity with modern software configuration management tools such as Docker, Gradle, Ivy, etc.
• TS/SCI is highly desired

Why us?
We offer outstanding benefits that include flexible work schedules, a competitive 401k company match, a Retirement Contribution plan, performance based incentive, paid parental leave, paid time off, and many other employee discounts.

This requisition is for future work. If you meet the requirements, you will be contacted by the recruiter.
167428

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
169,NETWORK ENGINEER II,$44k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB SUMMARY

Under the general direction of the Manager of Network Engineering, the Network Engineer II will spend approximately 25% of the time on network troubleshooting, 20% of the time on network design, 15% of the time on configuration of equipment and services, 10% of the time on research and development for equipment and technology, and 10% of the time on customer and internal communication. An additional 7% of the time will be spent on equipment implementation, 5% of the time on equipment maintenance, 5% of the time on training, and 3% of the time on Network Engineering costing. Remote work with reporting on-site once a week to our Ellettsville office if hired in the greater Indianapolis area.

The Network Engineer III is responsible for architecting the network through logical design, implementation of equipment, and administration and configuration of the network. The Network Engineer will maintain the current network through upgrades, equipment refreshments, forecasting of areas needed for improvement, and troubleshooting and resolving issues that occur throughout the network based on thought and skill-based solutions.

In this position, the Network Engineer II will impact the whole organization via the health and expansion of the core, aggregation, and access networks that carry all of the Commercial and Residential data, Streaming TV, and Voice services. The Network Engineer will design the network infrastructure for customers as well as for Smithville. This includes creating processes to minimize customer impacts, developing standard architecture for network survivability and redundancy, planning network spend to meet budget and designs, and developing Methods of Procedure (MOP) to document network changes and maintenance activities. At times, the Engineer will perform overnight maintenance and network restoration work.

The Network Engineer II will spend a significant amount of time planning and scheduling activities for themselves and others. Coordination with customers, Support teams, Sales, Customer Service Representatives, Telecommunication, and Plant Engineering will be required during installation, troubleshooting, planned maintenance, outages, and new service turn-ups. Additionally, the Network Engineer will be required to make important decisions on a regular basis. Decisions will include but are not limited to: meeting team objectives, supporting a new project effectively in the current network, impact of customers during outages and network upgrades, and best practices to improve and administer the network.

The Network Engineer II will be expected to communicate daily with Network Operations, Sales, Technical Support, and Warehouse/Inventory. On a weekly basis, the Engineer will communicate with Customer Service, Plant Engineering, Central Office Engineers, Telecommunications, Cable Teams, and Project Management. On occasion, they will communicate with IT and Accounting.

RESPONSIBILITIES
Network Troubleshooting– MPLS, OTN, ERPS, SIP, BGP, Layer 2, and hardware IP routing (25%)
Network Design– Residential, Commercial, Core, and Voice (20%)
Equipment and Services Configuration (15%)
Research& Development for Equipment and Technology (10%)
Customer and Internal Communication (10%)
Equipment Implementation– Cisco, Ciena, Calix, and Metaswitch (7%)
Equipment Maintenance (5%)
Training (5%)
Network Engineering Costing - SalesForce Commercial Costing (3%)
QUALIFICATIONS
Technical Degree in Telecommunications or Information Systems or equivalent industry experience
Industry certifications (Cisco CCNA, CCNP)
Knowledge of Internet Protocols, routing and switching, OTN, GPON, VOIP, and troubleshooting
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Attention to detail
Good project management skills; ability to work to deadlines
Methodical and analytical approach
Expected use of company vehicle, laptop, cell phone, light meter, speed tester, testers (EXFO or JDSU) for Ethernet/T1, fiber cleaning kits, basic tools (snips, screwdrivers, hammers, and more), and printer/copier
Expected to learn on the job within 6-9 months– familiarity with Smithville Calix, Cisco, Ciena, and Metaswitch design, circuit monitoring tools, Smithville locations, Smithville specific procedures for circuit deployments, Smithville documentation (fiber and customer data), customer contact Standards of Procedure (SOP), and outage response.
TYPICAL WORKING CONDITIONS
Approximately 80% of the time work is completed indoors in a climate controlled office environment (office, meeting room, or similar), 10% of the time outdoors exposed to changing weather conditions, and 10% of the time outdoors in an enclosed vehicle or temporary shelter
On occasion, the Network Engineer II will work above ground where the possibility of falling exists (ladders)
Other conditions include indoors in tight equipment spaces, around loud equipment, and possible eye hazards due to laser exposure
Typically works 40 hours per week; may work overtime, evenings, and/or weekends as needed to meet critical deadlines or respond to problems
PHYSICAL DEMANDS
Continuous fingering, handling, feeling, talking, and hearing.
Often sitting, walking, reaching at/below and above shoulder level, lifting up to 30 pounds, and close and distance vision.
Sometimes standing, bending, squatting, climbing, kneeling, twisting, lifting 31 up to and over 45 pounds, and color and depth vision.
Rarely pulling.


REQUIRED BEHAVIORAL CHARACTERISTICS
Accountability: Demonstrates integrity, accountability, and efficient stewardship of Smithville resources in a manner consistent with Smithville’s Value Statements.
Adaptability: Changes behavioral style or method of approach when necessary to achieve a goal; adjusts style as appropriate to the needs of the situation. Responds to change with a positive attitude and a willingness to learn new ways to accomplish work activities and objectives
Communication and Collaboration: Creates an atmosphere in which timely and high-quality information flows smoothly up and down, inside and outside of the organization; encourages open expression of ideas and opinions. Develops cooperation and teamwork while participating in a group, working toward solutions which generally benefit all involved parties.
Initiative: Does more than is required or expected in the job; does things that no one has requested that will improve or enhance products and services, avoid problems, or develop entrepreneurial opportunities. Plans ahead for upcoming problems or opportunities and takes appropriate action.
Job Proficiency: Applies and improves extensive or in-depth specialized knowledge, skills, and judgment to accomplish a result or to accomplish one’s job effectively. Understands technical aspects of one’s job and continuously builds knowledge, keeping up-to-date on the technical or procedural aspects of the job.",3.7,"Smithville Telephone Company
3.7","Indianapolis, IN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1922,Company - Private,Telecommunications Services,Telecommunications,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
170,"Mechanical Engineer, Lead",-1,"WR is in need of a lead Mechanical Engineer to support the Enhanced Control Display Unit (ECDU) project.

Position responsibilities will include, but are not limited to the following:
Researches, plans, and designs mechanical and electromechanical products and systems, and directs and coordinates activities involved in fabrication, operation, application, installation, and repair of mechanical or electromechanical products and systems.
Independently researches and analyzes data such as customer design proposal, specifications, and manuals to determine feasibility of design or application.
Using experience and independent judgment, designs products or systems such as instruments, controls, robots, engines, machines, and mechanical, thermal, hydraulic, or heat transfer systems.
Plans and directs engineering personnel in fabrication of test control apparatus and equipment, and development of methods and procedures for testing products or systems.
Directs and coordinates fabrication and installation activities to ensure products and systems conform to engineering design and customer specifications.
Coordinates operation, maintenance, and repair activities to obtain optimum utilization of machines and equipment.
Independently designs products and systems to interface machines, hardware, and software.
Evaluates field installations and recommends design modifications to eliminate machine or system malfunctions.
General Engineering Duties:
Participates in the research and analysis of customer design proposals, specifications, and manuals to determine feasibility of design or application.
Consults with other engineering staff to evaluate interface between hardware and software, and operational and performance requirements of overall system.
Writes and maintains documentation to describe program development, testing, changes, and corrections.
Writes documentation or reviews documentation written by others that describes installation and operating procedures.
Supports leading and mentoring of junior personnel.
Candidates must possess the following knowledge, skills, and experience:
Bachelor of Science degree in Mechanical Engineering, or similar.
Six (6)+ years of professional engineering design, test, and analysis experience in one of the following areas:
Shock and vibration, and/or Airborne and structure borne noise
Heat transfer/dissipation
Chassis
Circuit Card
Connector
Harness layout for Optimization of Mechanical Design for accessibility and ease of Repair and Replacement
Qualification/Requirements:
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.
Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Ability to read, analyze, and interpret the most complex documents.
Ability to write presentations and articles using original or innovative techniques or style.
Ability to make effective and persuasive arguments and presentations on controversial or complex topics to top management, public groups, and/or boards of directors.
Ability to deal with nonverbal symbolism (formulas, scientific equations, graphs, etc.,) in its most difficult phases.
Ability to comprehend and apply principles of calculus, modern algebra, and statistical theory.
Ability to apply principles of logical or scientific thinking to a wide range of intellectual and practical problems. Ability to deal with a variety of abstract and concrete variables.
Language Skills:
Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals.
Ability to write routine reports, operating instructions and correspondence.
Ability to speak effectively before groups of customers or employees of organization.
Mathematical Skills:
Ability to work with mathematical concepts such as probability and statistical inference, and fundamentals of plane and solid geometry and trigonometry.
Ability to apply concepts such as fractions, percentages, ratios, and proportions to practical situations.
Reasoning Ability:
Ability to solve practical problems and deal with a variety of concrete variables in situations where only limited standardization exists.
Ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in written, oral, diagram, or schedule form.
Physical Skills/Environment:
Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Possess average physical ability including the ability to conduct occasional visits to customer facilities, to see the computer screen, and operate equipment.
Generally performs work within an office environment or at a customer site. Travel may be required.
Active Secret Security Clearance required.

WR is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer and is committed to diversity in our workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, traits associated with race, color, citizenship status, national origin, ancestry, genetic information, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions, including lactation, age, religion, marital status, physical or mental disability, veterans’ status, or any additional factors that are protected by law. Please see https://wrsystems.com/our-responsibility/ for more information.

Required Skills

Required Experience

Job Location
Little Creek, US-VA",3.8,"WR Systems
3.8","Little Creek, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
171,Systems Engineer (SSDS) - Senior - Moorestown,$52k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"In-Depth Engineering is seeking multiple senior level Systems Engineers to support our Ship Self Defense System (SSDS) program. Ship Self-Defense System (SSDS) is an integrated weapons system used aboard large U.S. Navy Aircraft Carriers, amphibious assault ships (LHA), (LHD) and Dock landing ships (LSD). The work is performed at our customer site in Moorestown, NJ. Candidates for consideration must be a US citizen and have an active Department of Defense secret clearance.

In-Depth Engineering remains committed to hiring during this period of uncertainty associated with COVID-19. We have implemented extensive policies and procedures, including mandatory use of face masks, social distancing in a low-density engineering lab environment and necessary cleaning and sanitizing. As appropriate, some efforts may be conducted in a telework environment.

Conduct model-based systems engineering

Utilize agile methodologies design engineering solutions

Develop solutions for complex mathematical and physics-based problems

Responsible for algorithmic design, data analysis and requirements development

Participate in large scale system of systems development effort

Conduct system trade studies and analyses of alternatives

Conduct system performance modelling and analysis

BS degree in Systems or Computer Engineering, Physics, Mathematics, or related discipline

6 – 10 years of related experience

Knowledge of DOORs, Rhapsody, UML

Familiarity with development on a Linux/Red Hat platform

Experience in Java, C, C++ (object-oriented programming, XML, SQL)

Strong oral and written communication skills

Must be U.S citizen

Ability to obtain DoD secret security clearance

Desired Qualifications:

Understanding of SSDS and its configurations

In-Depth Engineering provides a competitive package of salary and benefits, including medical, dental, and vision coverage, a Safe Harbor 401(k) program, generous Paid Time Off (PTO), STD, LTD, life insurance, and tuition assistance for higher education. Prospective employees will receive consideration without discrimination because of race, creed, color, sex, age, national origin, or handicap. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer.",3.5,"In-depth Engineering Corporation
3.5","Mount Laurel, NJ",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Government,-1,-1,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
172,Data Engineer,$69k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Engineer will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture. The ideal candidate is experienced at data wrangling, enjoys data systems, and enjoys building things from the ground up. The data engineer will support the analytics teams at our client’s site by creating processes and programs to ingest the many unstructured files we receive, transform the data into a standard form and load it into the ecosystem. The right candidate will be excited with the prospect of optimizing and redesigning the client’s data architecture for the next set of data initiatives.
Use tools to build processes to extract, transform and load data from multiple sources
Assemble complex data sets that meet business requirements
Identify, design and implement processes to automate manual processes
Create structured datasets from unstructured data from multiple sources
Experience working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment
QUALIFICATIONS
3-5 years of experience with SQL query language plus experience creating complex queries
3-5 years of experience with Hadoop; specifically, Hive, HiveQL and HDFS
3-5 years of experience building processes supporting ETL work
1-3 years of experience building and optimizing big data pipelines and data sets
1-3 years of experience with programming languages: Python, Scala, PySpark
Strong Analytical skills
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Information Systems or some other related field
OneMagnify powers business performance for its clients with actionable analytics, compelling marketing communications through brand strategy, and technology solutions for companies here and around the world. We think that’s pretty cool, making us an exciting place to work. But there is so much more to this employee-centric company. For example, it’s all the fun and important things we do—like our charitable giving team program, summer poker walks, quarterly cake day and, of course, the creative client solutions we deliver daily. It all stems from a culture of caring—for each other, our clients and the world around us.

OneMagnify is an equal opportunity employer.
OneMagnify is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",4.7,"OneMagnify
4.7","Dearborn, MI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1967,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
173,Senior Data Engineer,-1,"*JOB DESCRIPTION - SENIOR DATA ENGINEER* ClearOne Advantage is a fast-growing company that is aggressively hiring due to increased business. We are always improving our marketing, culture and technology to provide our employees with the best work atmosphere and our customers with excellent customer service. COA’s proprietary software is tailored to our industry and allows the client to receive the best service possible. We are seeking a Senior Data Engineer who can develop and maintain COA’s data environment, including data warehousing, data ingestion, ETL/ELT, data exchange, data lineage, and data quality. This role will interact daily with our Data Analytics/Data Science, Finance, Operations, DBAs, Site Reliability, and DevOps teams. Ideal candidate will be smart, passionate about data and eager to continually grow. If you are looking to work in a team environment, a place where you are more a name than a number, where you interact with leadership daily, then please send your resume for review! *Perks: * * For Baltimore candidates - great location, right on the water in the Canton Crossing Tower * Casual work environment and remote flexibility * Room for advancement *JOB REQUIREMENTS**Job Duties: * * Design and implement data warehouse solutions (schema design, partitioning, data ingestion, security, encryption, scrubbing, optimization, etc.) * Design and implement data exchange solutions with partners and other third parties (secure data integration, file integrity, data ingestion, data quality, file retention, etc.) * Design and implement data streaming solutions (clickstream, phone, third party services) for real-time/near-time ingestion into the data warehouse * Establish programmatic tasks and perform unit tests of code and solutions * Interface and consume application APIs for batch data ingestion * Work with Data Science group to design, implement, and optimize analytic solutions * Work with other departments on reporting design and efficiency * Follow corporate and team standards for design, security, efficiency, application logging, monitoring/alerting, and documentation * Triage and fix production application issues * Stay abreast of new technologies and practices to further enhance team capabilities and own skills * Participate in on-call rotation to support new and existing products *Qualifications: * * 4+ years hands-on experience in Application Development * 2+ years operating in an Agile environment * 3+ years hands-on experience with Microsoft® SQL Server, including using indexes, stored procedures, views, and triggers * 3+ years hands-on experience with ETL/ELT tools (Five Tran, Informatica, Switch, SSIS, etc.) * 2+ years hands-on experience with Business Intelligence tools (Tableau, Looker, Microstrategy, Brio, etc.) * 1+ years working with Snowflake, AWS Redshift, or other commercially scaled cloud data warehouse provider * 1+ years working in Amazon Web Services (AWS) or other cloud environment * Awareness of analytics tools (R, SPSS, SAS, etc.), machine learning (Jupyter, etc.), artificial intelligence * Working knowledge of encryption protocols and data scrubbing methods * Working knowledge of data streaming tools and methods for real-time/near-time data availability * Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field / equivalent experience * Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, rapid growth environment * Ability to solve problems and learn business rules and processes * Ability to demonstrate strategic, data-driven thinking combined with efficient implementation * Ability to communicate clearly and effectively to both technical peers and business customers * Ability work on a team as well as complete projects and tasks individually * Hands-on, self-starter with a positive attitude and strong work ethic * Authorized to work on US. At this time, ClearOne cannot offer sponsorship. *Technical Skills: * * Required – Microsoft SQL Server 2016-2019, T-SQL, SSIS, SSRS, SSAS, Snowflake, Fivetran, Python, SFTP, Tableau, Amazon Web Services, JSON, GitHub * Preferred – MongoDB, NewRelic, JavaScript, .NET Core 3.1, Confluent, Kafka, R, Jupyter AAP/EEO Statement: Clear One Advantage provides equal employment opportunity to all employees and job seekers without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, disability, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, veteran status, or any other protected characteristic under federal, state or local laws. Job Type: Full-time Pay: $95,000.00 - $140,000.00 per year Benefits: * 401(k) * Dental insurance * Flexible schedule * Health insurance * Paid time off * Referral program * Vision insurance Schedule: * Monday to Friday Supplemental Pay: * Bonus pay Experience: * Microsoft SQL Server: 4 years (Required) * Data Warehouse: 4 years (Required) * Application Development: 4 years (Required) * ETL (Extract Transform Load): 3 years (Required) Work authorization: * United States (Required) Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available: * No: Not providing sponsorship for this job Company's website: * www.clearoneadvantage.com Work Remotely: * Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"ClearOne Advantage
4.4","Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
174,Senior Data Engineer,$67k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta has an immediate need for a Senior Data Engineer to join a fast-paced program in support of a government customer with a very critical national security mission. This is a multi-year program, where the successful candidate will work on an interdisciplinary project team of more than 30 highly qualified individuals with a wide array of skills that include client (reactjs), server (spring java), QA Automation Engineers, UI/UX Designers, and DevOps engineers. The team is responsible for building a next generation Mission Information System and is performing greenfield Software Development using modern technologies via an Agile DevOps approach.

This Senior Data Engineer will play a vital role collaborating as part of this cross-functional Agile team to create and enhance data ingestion pipelines and address big data challenges. The Senior Data Engineer will work closely with the Chief Architect, systems engineers, software engineers, and data scientists on the following key tasks:
Provide Extraction, Transformation, and Load (ETL) experience coupled with enterprise search capabilities to solve Big Data challenges
Design and implement high-volume data ingestion and streaming pipelines using Open Source frameworks like Apache Spark, Flink, Nifi, and Kafka on AWS Cloud
Leverage strategic and analytical skills to understand and solve customer and business centric questions
Create prototypes and proofs of concept for iterative development
Learn new technologies and apply the knowledge in production systems
Monitor and troubleshoot performance issues on the enterprise data pipelines and the data lake
Partner with various teams to define and execute data acquisition, transformation, processing and make data actionable for operational and analytics initiatives

Required Qualifications / Experience:

BS in Computer Science, Systems Engineering, or a related technical field or equivalent experience with at least 8+ years in systems engineering or administration (6+ years with a MS/MIS Degree).
Must have an active Top Secret security clearance and able to obtain a TS/SCI with Polygraph.
3 years of experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, NiFi.
3 years of experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python (preferred) and/or Java.
3 years of experience with and managing data across relational SQL and NoSQL databases like MySQL, Postgres, Cassandra, HDFS, Redis, and Elasticsearch.
3 years of experience working in a Linux environment.
2 years of experience working with and designing REST APIs.
Experience in designing/developing platform components like caching, messaging, event processing, automation, transformation and tooling frameworks.
Experience developing data ingest workflows with stream-processing systems: Spark-Streaming, Kafka Streams and/or Flink.
Experience transforming data in various formats, including JSON, XML, CSV, and zipped files.
Experience with performance tuning of ETL jobs.
Experience developing flexible ontologies to fit data from multiple sources and implementing the ontology in the form of database mappings / schemas.
Strong interpersonal and communication skills necessary to work effectively with customers and other team members.

Preferred Qualifications / Experience:

Data engineering experience in the Intelligence Community or other government agencies.
Experience with Microservices architecture components, including Docker and Kubernetes.
Experience developing microservices to fit data cleansing, transformation and enrichment needs.
Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, S3, EMR, RDS, Redshift, Athena and/or Glue.
Experience with Jira, Confluence and extensive experience with Agile methodologies.
Knowledge about security and best practices.
Experience developing flexible data ingest and enrichment pipelines, to easily accommodate new and existing data sources.
Experience with software configuration management tools such as Git/Gitlab, Salt, Confluence, etc.
Experience with continuous integration and deployment (CI/CD) pipelines and their enabling tools such as Jenkins, Nexus, etc.
Detailed oriented/self-motivated with the ability to learn and deploy new technology quickly.

Clearance Level: TS/SCI with Poly

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5","Reston, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
175,Product Lab & Testing Engineer,$54k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"PURPOSE OF JOB

Do you have ideas? Do you look at a product and want to understand how it delivers its benefits? Do you like hands on work? Do you like collaborating with others to achieve a goal?

Conduct product testing for the growing Owens Corning Roofing Components business. This role will be based at the Components R&D Center in Granville, OH which includes a Product Testing Laboratory that conducts performance testing and a Pilot Line that runs prototyping trials. This supports the manufacturing and new product development activities for the Roofing, Geosynthetics, and Protective Packaging business segments. The work includes conducting product testing, data collection and analysis, competitive benchmarking and customer-inspired test method development. This position works closely with the product development, pilot, quality teams and customers.

Join an organization that believes that every employee owns a piece of our bold growth goals and ultimate success. We are a market-leading Fortune 500® company with a history and focus on growth through customer-inspired innovation. Owens Corning is devoted to delivering sustainable solutions across our three business segments while striving to ensure our people and products make the world a better place. We take pride in having an inclusive and diverse workplace with employees around the globe. A holistic sense of community exists across our entire organization as our talent grows globally. We are a company that fully recognizes the importance of paving a path to a sustainable and safe enterprise through investing in our people. Our desire to make an impactful difference in the world flows from top down to all levels of the organization. By being a company that instills pride within each and every employee, we aspire to build market-leading businesses; global in scope - human in scale.

Reports to: Program Leader, Components Core Technologies

Span of Control: An individual contributor of a small team.

JOB RESPONSIBILITIES

TEST METHOD DEVELOPMENT & PRODUCT TESTING (80%)

Develops test methods and technical claims.Conducts product testing and competitive benchmarking.

Lives the Owens Corning safety culture every day, working safely and identifying and driving improvements
Conducts product testing, analyzes data and reports results and recommendations
Develops customer-inspired test methods and validates against field performance
Develops meaningful technical claims to help market and sell OC products
Provides technical direction and feedback to others, sharing knowledge throughout the organization
Supports operation of pilot line plastic extrusion equipment to create prototypes

LAB OPERATIONS (20%)

Supports lab operations and improvements, partnering with others to deliver successful outcomes.

Communicates and coordinates within team and with lab customers on product testing results and timings
Leads projects to support lab operation improvements and long term strategy

JOB REQUIREMENTS

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelors degree in Engineering or Science field
Must be comfortable using a computer including MS Office Suite (Word, Excel, Outlook, Powerpoint)
Knowledge of laboratory practices
Ability to repetitively lift objects up to 40 lbs and stand for a large portion of the day

PREFERRED EXPERIENCE:

2-3 years experience in industrial R&D lab is preferred
Experience leading projects, especially in R&D environment is preferred
Experience using statistics to drive data-based decisions and develop customer-inspired test methods is preferred
Technical knowledge and experience with ASTM, roofing, geosynthetics, or packaging testing is preferred
Prior experience operating plastic extrusion equipment is preferred
Ability to travel up to 10% of the time is preferred

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES:

Strong desire to learn and own delivery of project outcomes.
Self-motivated with the ability and desire to work independently to learn and apply new technical areas.
Team oriented, with high energy and desire to build strong relationships, collaborate and drive results
Passion for understanding how things work and the ability to collect, analyze and present data to drive decisions.
Resilience and agility to adapt to an ever-changing environment and business.
Out of the box thinking to identify new approaches to overcome obstacles.
Ability to understand and translate customer needs into feasible test methods and meaningful technical claims.
Practices safety-conscious behaviors in all operational processes and procedures.
Attention to detail and dedication to documenting and embedding knowledge within the organization.
Excellent written, presentation and verbal communication skills. Strong computer and organizational skills.",3.9,"OWENS CORNING
3.9","Granville, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1938,Company - Public,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
176,Data Engineer,$90k-$135k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Us


Interested in working for a human-centered technology company that prides itself on using modern tools and technologies? Want to be surrounded by intensely curious and innovative thinkers who push one another to come up with the best solutions possible?

Seeking to solve complex technical challenges by building products that work for people, meet and exceed the needs of businesses, and work elegantly and efficiently?

Modeling ourselves after the 1904 World's Fair, which brought innovation to the region, 1904labs is seeking top technical talent in St. Louis to bring innovation and creativity to our clients.

Our clients consist of Fortune 500 and Global 2000 companies. We partner with them on complex projects that range from reimagining and refactoring their existing applications, to helping to envision and build new applications or data streams to operationalize their existing data. Working in a team-based labs model, using our own flavor of #HCDAgile, we strive to work at the cutting edge of technology's capabilities while solving problems for our clients and their users.

The Role


As a Data Engineer you would be responsible for developing and deploying cutting edge distributed data solutions. Our engineers have a passion for open source technologies, strive to build cloud first applications, and are motivated by our desire to transform businesses into data driven enterprises. This team will focus on working with platforms such as Hadoop, Spark, Hive, Kafka, Elasticsearch, SQL and NoSQL/Graph databases as well as cloud-based data services.

Our teams at 1904labs are Agile, and we work in a highly collaborative environment. You would be a productive member of a fast paced group and have an opportunity to solve some very complex data problems.

Requirements for Data Engineer


3+ years of progressive experience as a Data Engineer, BI Developer, Application Developer or related occupation.
Agile: Experience working in an agile team oriented environment
Attitude / Aptitude: A passion for everything data with a desire to be at the cutting edge of technology and consistently deliver working software while always keeping an eye on opportunities for innovation.
Technical Skills (You have experience with 2 or more of these bulletpoints):
Programming in Java (Or similar JVM language such as Scala, Groovy, etc) and/or Python
Architecting and integrating big data pipelines
Working with large data volumes; this includes processing, transforming and transporting large scale data using technologies such as: MR/TEZ, Hive SQL, Spark, etc.
Have a strong background in SQL / Data Warehousing (dimensional modeling)
Have a strong background working with and/or implementing architecture for RDBMS such as: Oracle, MySQL, Postgres and/or SQLServer.
Experience with traditional ETL tools such as SSIS, Informatica, Pentaho, Talend, etc.
Experience with NoSQL/Graph Data Modeling and are actively using Cassandra, HBase, DynamoDB, Neo4J, Titan, or DataStax Graph
Installing/configuring a distributed computing/storage platform, such as Apache Hadoop, Amazon EMR, Apache Spark, Apache Hive, and/or Presto
Working with one or more streaming platforms, such as Apache Kafka, Spark Streaming, Storm, or AWS Kinesis
Working knowledge of the Linux command line and shell scripting
Desired Skills for Data Engineer
Analytics: Have working knowledge of analytics/reporting tools such as Tableau, Spotfire, Qlikview, etc.
Open Source: Are working with open source tools now and have a background in contributing to open source projects.
Perks
Standard Benefits Program (medical, dental, life insurance, 401(k), professional development and education assistance, PTO).
Innovation Hours - Ten percent (10%) of our work week is set aside to work on our own product ideas in a highly collaborative and supportive environment. The best part: The IP remains your own. We are a high-growth culture and we know that when we help people focus on personal and professional growth, collectively, we can achieve great things.
Dress Code - we don't have one
While we are in the midst of the Covid pandemic our primary work location is our home offices. Once this is behind us, we will return to our normal hybrid model of working from the office and from home. For this reason we still prefer local candidates. While we would prefer local candidates your current location is not the most important factor; please help us understand why you would like to call St. Louis home if you would be relocating.

]]>",4.7,"1904labs
4.7","Saint Louis, MO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
177,Sr Software Engineer (NiFi),-1,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space is supporting a U.S. Government customer on a large mission critical development and sustainment program to design, build, deliver, and operate a network operations environment; including introducing new cyber capabilities to address emerging threats. Raytheon Intelligence & Space is seeking a NiFi Developer to support the design, development, and deployment of advanced cybersecurity capabilities.

Responsibilities include:
Collaborating within Agile Scrum teams as a key contributor responsible for the design, test and implementation of advanced cybersecurity-oriented capabilities
Developing and performing automated builds, testing, and deployments in support of NiFi development.
Required Skills:
.U.S. Citizenship
Secret security clearance
Must be able to obtain TS/SCI clearance
Must be able to obtain DHS Suitability
6+ years of directly relevant experience
Experience with high-velocity high-volume stream processing: Apache Kafka, Apache NiFi, StreamSets, etc.
Experience configuring and administering NiFi installations
Experience in building data ingestion workflows/pipeline flows using NiFi, NiFi registry
Experience creating custom NiFi processors
Experience with NiFi performance tuning
Strong proficiency in Java and at least one other programming language such as JavaScript or PowerShell
Knowledge of security principles and methods
Experience with Agile methodologies, such as Scrum, ideally in a DevOps environment
Solid judgment and analytical skills; strong follow-up and organizational skills
Ability to explain technical concepts and adjust messaging based on the audience, including non-technical groups
Ability to influence through outstanding interpersonal skills, collaboration, and negotiation skills
Ability to work well within a team environment, as well as independently
Ability to optimize workflows based in NiFi
Knowledge of IP networking including TCP, UDP, DNS, DHCP, firewalls, IP routing, etc.
Desired Skills:
Experience with NiFi-supported scripting languages (Python, Groovy)
Experience creating custom NiFi processors
Full Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) experience
Experience with performance tuning of NiFi processing
Required Education:
BS Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Computer Information Systems, OR Computer Systems Engineering. Two years of related work experience may be substituted for each year of degree level education.

Desired Certifications:
DoD 8570.1 IAT Level II
This position is contingent upon customer approval.

DOMinoRIS

160615

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Dulles, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
178,Senior Civil Engineer,-1,"Summary/Objective*
The Senior Project Engineer-Civil is responsible for the design of erosion & sedimentation control plans, floodplain analysis, storm water management, best management practices, site layout, utility design, and grading. They will also be responsible for completing calculations, reports, and spreadsheets. They support and complement the project team by providing a strong work ethic and thrive in being the senior technical leader on the project team environment. Project types represent a broad cross section of commercial, governmental, industrial, institutional, recreational facilities, residential, and retail.
Main Responsibilities*
The specific responsibilities of this position include, but are not limited to, the following:
Design multi-acre retail, commercial, industrial and/or residential development including due diligence, permitting and limited contract administration.
Analyze survey reports, maps, drawings, blueprints, aerial photography, and other topographical or geologic data to plan projects.
Research, understand and apply City, State, and Federal codes
Estimate project costs, including materials, equipment, and labor.
Communicate tasks and schedule and coordinate project assignments with project team.
Execute assigned tasks accurately, on schedule, and within budget.
Prepare proposals for technical engineering portions of project.
Understand all contracted scope of work and monitor/process additional work authorizations when requested by client or required for project completion.
Visit sites as required.
Mentor and train subordinate engineers.
Perform Quality Control Reviews of plans and reports before issuance.
Work in assistant project manager role to support project manager or manage projects directly where appropriate.
Coordinate, monitor and review work performed by sub-consultants
Provide technical support for customers and support regional business development initiatives as a technical resource.
Promote the reputation of the company through the technical quality of his/her work.
Represent us professionally at all project related meetings and inspections.
Working Relationships*
Supervision received: Reports to and receives guidance from the Civil Department Manager. May also receive direction/need coordination with other Department Heads or Project Managers in multi-disciplined projects.
Supervision given: Supervises engineers and designers either full-time or a project-by-project basis.
Core Competencies*
Strong knowledge of the technical aspects of the civil engineering practice
Thorough knowledge of all codes applicable to his/her discipline
Critical thinking and problem solving
Leadership and mentoring
Project and resource management
Problem solving/analysis
Communication proficiency with team members and clients
Ability to build relationships and interact with review agencies
Financial management to budget and goals/objectives
Basic Qualifications*
Bachelor’s Degree in Civil Engineering or equivalent and PA Professional Engineer’s License (or ability to obtain within 1 year)
Minimum of Ten (10) years’ experience with progression to similar position
Experience with subdivision and land development projects
Experience with design software (AutoCAD Civil 3D, and Hydrologic/Hydraulic design software)
Fluency with Micro Soft Office Suite
Demonstrated background in plan production and project execution
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Experience:
Civil Engineering: 10 years (Preferred)
License:
Professional Engineer (Preferred)",-1,"McCarthy Engineering Associates, Inc.","Wyomissing, PA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
179,Senior Life Cycle Naval Engineer,$63k-$141k (Glassdoor Est.),"(Req.# 4185)

ICI Services is looking for a motivated individual who wants to join our team in support of the Surface Maintenance and Engineering Planning Program (SURFMEPP) in Portsmouth , VA . We are a mid-sized defense contractor providing Engineering & Integration, Systems Acquisition, Information Warfare, and In-Service Sustainment to government clients in 14 states and the District of Columbia. We need a Senior-Level Life Cycle Engineer ready to join a fast-paced and exciting work environment.
Security Clearance:
Applicant must hold an active Department of Defense (DoD) SECRET personnel security clearance.
Responsibilities:
The Surface Maintenance Engineering, Planning, Program (SURFMEPP) maintains, monitors, and refines Class-wide and Individual-Ship Maintenance Plans for all non-nuclear surface ships to ensure material readiness for the projected service life, develop life-cycle strategies to address system upgrades, and fully implement the Class Maintenance Plan into each surface ship's maintenance schedule and availability planning process. SURFMEPP is headquartered at the Norfolk Naval Shipyard in Portsmouth, VA.

The Life Cycle Engineer acts as the Subject Matter Expert (SME) concerning the analysis of current and historical data from multiple Surface Warfare enterprise maintenance databases and technical SMEs to develop long term depot maintenance resource requirements for the expected service life of each class of Surface Navy ships. Work product supports the creation of class specific Technical Foundation Papers and Requirements White Papers, with the overall goal of ensuring ships reach the expected service life.

Specific duties include:
Access and collect unfiltered data to determine execution costs for specific repairs of equipment in depot level availabilities. Utilize EXCEL-based database software applications to create and analyze data tables and charts.
Liaison with technical stakeholders of Surface Ship Classes (NAVSEA Technical Warrant Holders, Ship Design Managers, In-Service Engineering Agents) to request information in support of determining depot maintenance requirements and strategies.
Interface with Type Commander and Regional Maintenance Center maintenance staff, as well as other maintenance stakeholders, to obtain maintenance execution and material condition data of Surface Navy vessels for evaluation of future depot maintenance needs
Identify and create life cycle execution strategies for depot level overhauls across ship’s expected service-life
Conduct maintenance execution history analysis of shipboard systems and equipment maintenance history data to determine life cycle costs and maintenance periodicities. Analyze data to illustrate trends in cost, maintenance and reliability.
Prepare briefs and reports outlining current, historical, and forecasted repair costs and repair execution strategies for all types of depot level overhauls.
Prepare and manage planning and resourcing exhibits which underlie the workload cost of requirements being programmed for execution.
Assist in the development of other products as may be required to support requirements development efforts.
Conduct risk analysis feasibility studies to analyze, evaluate and determine practicability and adaptability of proposed solutions; subsequently determines and evaluates efficiency of adopted improvements to ensure satisfactory progress and fulfillment of requirements.
Performs detailed industrial analysis to ensure that the maintenance requirements are executable within the constraints of the Fleet Response Plan (FRP) and the industrial base of each port.
Experience Requirements:
15-20 years of surface Navy engineering experience
Familiarity of US Navy HM&E and Combat Systems operations and maintenance practices and terminology
Familiarity with Navy Maintenance and Logistics databases (3M, CSMP, VSB, MRS, M&SWP, NMD, SCLSIS, CCIMS, CMP, AIM, etc.)
Highly proficient in MS Office programs and other database management tools and software, especially Excel.
Extensive analytical/math skills (linear algebra, constraints analysis, statistical methodologies)
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, ability to work independently, ability to deliver briefs to executive level leadership, attention to detail, and superb customer interaction
Education Requirements:
Bachelor degree in applied sciences or engineering and a minimum of 15-years of related engineering experience. In lieu of a BS degree, a HS diploma and 19 years of in-depth experience in the applied sciences or engineering field.
EOE/M/F/ Disability/Vet
VEVRAA Federal Contractor

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
surface naval engineering: 10 years (Required)
analytical/math skills: 10 years (Required)
Company's website:
www.icisrvcs.com/careers
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.0,"ICI Services Corporation
3.0","Portsmouth, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
180,Outside Plant (OSP) Engineer,-1,"OSP Engineering department with regular Field Engineering requirements while maintaining project completion guidelines for yearly facility build-outs, line extensions, and general maintenance. This position would require significant time traveling to the job sites as well as time in an office environment. The position requires developing accurate project plans, managing projects from inception to completion, ensuring efficiency and completion on time and within budget. Communicate and coordinate with internal departments, as well as construction contractors, as necessary to guarantee project deadlines and commitments are met on time. Travel to job sites for documenting on-going job status updates and resolve any conflicts or issues that may arise. Ensure projects are maintained in OTELCO’s project tracking system, completed, and closed with great accuracy.

Essential Job Functions:
• Responsible for designing and developing outside plant equipment installation, modifications, upgrades and construction activities.
• Supports Designs of line setup and staking specifications, and cable and line extensions.
• Conducts job costing activities and prices out job components.
• Assist in the planning, analysis, and recommendations in support of new construction of outside plant network structures and facilities. Included, but not limited to, Fiber-To-The-Premise, Copper/DSL, and Hybrid Fiber Coax technology.
• Supports/Oversee permitting with State, Local and Federal agencies.
• Responsible for obtaining right-of-way use approval.
• Responsible for acquiring field data.
• Responsible for maintaining all contractor as-built changes and assisting the Mapping department with updates to drawings.
• Willing to travel within and outside OTELCO’s current footprint, when called upon.

Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:
• Experience with Google Maps/Earth, AutoCAD, ESRI, Adobe Acrobat and Microsoft Office Suite
• Knowledge of standard practices in Telecommunications
• Strong problem-solving skills
• Knowledge of construction services, ordering and installation of the following: Fiber, Telco, Coax, and general Aerial/Underground construction supplies.
• Attention to detail is paramount
• Ability to read and interpret legal land descriptions and easement agreements
• Ability to work independently on multifaceted projects
Position Title: Project/Field Engineer Department: Engineering
Reports To: OSP Engineering & Mapping Manager FLSA Status: Non-Exempt
• Strong verbal and written communication skills to present facts clearly and accurately in graphic form
• Experience working to tight deadlines
• Excellent analytical skills
• Must be able to work overtime as required

Education and Experience:
• 1-5 years of Telecom project management experience preferred
• Knowledge of Telecom construction
• High School diploma
• Associate degree preferred
• Knowledge in CAD, ESRI and Microsoft Office

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Right-of-way use: 3 years (Preferred)
Telecommunications: 4 years (Preferred)
Telecommunications construction: 3 years (Preferred)
Project deadlines: 3 years (Preferred)
Plans, analysis, & recommends support of new construction: 3 years (Preferred)
OSP Engineering: 3 years (Preferred)
Google Maps/Earth, CAD, ESRI and Microsoft Office: 4 years (Preferred)
Telecommunications Project Management: 4 years (Preferred)
Education:
High school or equivalent (Required)
Location:
Bangor, ME 04401 (Required)
License:
Driver's License (Required)
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Aggressive -- competitive and growth-oriented
Company's website:
www.otelco.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",2.9,"OTELCO
2.9","Bangor, ME",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1998,Company - Public,"Cable, Internet & Telephone Providers",Telecommunications,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
181,DevOps Engineer/Senior System Admin,$83k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"DevOps Engineer

Expressions Network is currently seeking a DevOps Engineer to join our team in Annapolis, MD.

Who we are:

• Expression Networks is a leading provider of tailored and integrated information technology, software engineering, data analytics, and electromagnetic spectrum management solutions for federal and commercial clients. We help each client meet the challenges of ever more demanding missions, ensuring our clients are well-equipped to succeed in an increasingly volatile and complex future.

• [1] https://corp.expr.net/

About the role:

• You will work with a team to deploy, operate, and maintain cloud-based applications. You should be knowledgeable and customer-oriented, possessing strong communication and presentation skills. You should also have superior technical expertise and a problem-solving aptitude.

What you’ll do:

• Mature and streamline DevSecOps pipeline, policies, and processes

• Support operations and maintenance activities for both Linux and Windows platforms

• Configure, troubleshoot, and support software tools, computer environments, and cloud deployments

• Install software/application patches and upgrades

• Plan and execute software deployments

• Review and implement STIG requirements

• Support customer requests

Our ideal candidate:

Education and Experience

• Secret security clearance

• Associate's degree in Information Technology (IT), computer science, or related field

• 2 years of experience in a DevOps role and a strong understanding of modern DevOps tools

• Familiarity with troubleshooting Windows and Linux OS issues

• Experience working in AWS or Microsoft Azure

• Experience configuring, deploying, and managing microservices-based frameworks

• Security+ certification

• Bachelor’s degree in IT, computer science, or related field

• Experience with troubleshooting applications running on both Windows and Linux OS

• Experience with installing, configuring, and administering SolarWinds

• Experience with Information Security: applying STIGs, IAVAs, and maintaining/updating security documentation

• Experience administering in the DISA/DoD network

• Experience with DISA SSL certificate requests and installation

What we offer:

• Compensation including annual salary based upon relevant experience and education.

• Comprehensive benefits package including healthcare insurance, paid vacation and holidays, matching 401k plan, and Education reimbursement.

To Apply:

Please submit your resume via the ""APPLY NOW"" button

Equal Opportunity Employer

References

Visible links
https://corp.expr.net/",4.8,"Expression Networks LLC
4.8","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1997,Contract,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
182,Senior Software Engineer (Clearance Required),$114k-$222k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the job:

CollabraSpace PRIME contract is seeking a Software Engineer to join the software development team who will develop and sustain integrated, feature-rich capabilities that promote modernization of visualization and presentation tools. The software development team will provide application development and support to tools that allow mission analytic users to view existing data or contribute new information in a collaborative environment.

The Software Engineers will be forward deployed for their development efforts and will work independently of the primary development team. Required documented experience includes Groovy, Java, Unit Testing, Git and IDE (either IntelliJ or Eclipse preferred). The Software Engineers should have familiarity with MongoDB.

Additional information:
Approximately 15 team members made up of software, system, and test engineers
Requirements:
Fourteen (14) years experience as a SWE in programs and contracts of similar scope, type, and complexity is required.
Analyze user requirements to derive software design and performance requirements
Debug existing software and correct defects
Provide recommendations for improving documentation and software development process standards
Design and code new software or modify existing software to add new features
Integrate existing software into new or modified systems or operating environments
Develop simple data queries for existing or proposed databases or data repositories
Write or review software and system documentation
Serve as team lead at the level appropriate to the software development process being used on any particular project
Design or implement complex database or data repository interfaces/queries
Develop or implement algorithms to meet or exceed system performance and functional standards
Assist with developing and executing test procedures for software components
Develop software solutions by analyzing system performance standards, confer with users or system engineers; analyze systems flow, data usage and work processes; and investigate problem areas
Modify existing software to correct errors, to adapt to new hardware, or to improve its performance
Design, develop and modify software systems, using scientific analysis and mathematical models to predict and measure outcome and consequences of design
Design or implement complex algorithms requiring adherence to strict timing, system resource, or interface constraints; Perform quality control on team products
Implement recommendations for improving documentation and software development process standards
Oversee one or more software development teams and ensure the work is completed in accordance with the constraints of the software development process being used on any particular project
Confer with system engineers and hardware engineers to derive software requirements and to obtain information on project limitations and capabilities, performance requirements and interfaces
Coordinate software system installation and monitor equipment functioning to ensure operational specifications are met.
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related discipline from an accredited college or university is required. Four (4) years of SWE experience on projects with similar software processes may be substituted for a bachelor’s degree.
-Clearance: Applicants must be U.S. Citizens possessing an active TS/SCI security clearance with a Polygraph.
Additional Desired Experience:
Experience with ElasticSearch is a plus.
About us: Collaboration is the fusion of people and ideas toward a common goal; and at CollabraSpace it’s part of everything we do. It's the foundation upon which Collabraspace was created, at the core of our corporate philosophy, and even represented in our logo where different pieces of one circle work together. As a technical services and product company, Collabraspace supports the critical mission of our nation’s security through ongoing collaboration with our team members, customers, and partners.

Across our 20+ programs we provide enterprise software development solutions and real-time collaboration to both government and private industry. CollabraSpace is headquartered in Annapolis Junction, MD, close to the majority of our work and therefore, close to you.

CollabraSpace Facts:
Team. At CollabraSpace, we truly believe in the team. We’ll always do our best to find a position that makes you happy to go to work every day, support the charitable causes that are important to you, and encourage your involvement with the company by providing events for the whole family.
Security. We offer competitive salaries but more than that, we make sure the salary we are offering you can be supported by multiple programs. Why is that important? See bullet #1; if you’re not happy we will do our best to find something that does make you happy.
Benefits. Our comprehensive benefits package means you pay very little for a full suite of coverage.
100% company paid premiums for Health and Dental plans for employees and eligible dependents.
100% company paid Life & Disability plans.
401(k) & Roth plan with company contribution immediately vested.
Annual bonus plan, spot bonuses for a job well done, and referral bonuses.
Paid Time Off (PTO) allowing you to use your time off as you see fit.
Formal education and training benefits.
Transparency. You have heard it before but here you’ll truly experience it. The management team “puts it all on the table” and always has an open door.
Training and Education. It’s part of our collaborative environment. Besides the traditional off-site training which we pay for upfront, CollabraSpace offers in-house Technical Exchanges on a range of topics presented by our own technical staff or industry partners.
Honors. We earned the Alliance for Workplace Excellence Award for 4 years running and have been named to the Baltimore Sun’s Top 100 Workplaces 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, and 2018; an award given based on survey responses from our team members. We are consistently ranked as one of the Top IT Firms in Baltimore by the Baltimore Business Journal.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

CollabraSpace is an equal opportunity employer. Employment policies and decisions on employment and promotion are based on merit, qualifications, performance, and business needs. The decisions and criteria governing the employment relationship with all employees are made in a nondiscriminatory manner, without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, physical or mental disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, or any other factor determined to be unlawful by federal, state, or local statutes.

Make a life at CollabraSpace, not just a living!",5.0,"CollabraSpace, Inc.
5.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
183,Project Engineer EI,$65k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"DRMP is a multi-discipline firm serving clients in the public, private and industrial sectors in the development of infrastructure for the community-at-large and has been in business since 1977. DRMP currently employs 500+ professionals in 18 office locations spread strategically across our service areas. Today, DRMP is ranked among Engineering News-Record’s “Top 500 Design Firms” in the United States and has received numerous awards locally and nationally for engineering achievements. As we continue to grow, we seek to add talented and motivated individuals to work on exciting projects while maximizing their personal growth potential. DRMP is where talent and a strong work ethic are rewarded by opportunity and advancement within the company.

DRMP Offers:
• Excellent compensation package
• Outstanding holiday and paid time-off programs
• 401(k) Plan and Match
• Competitive health and dental insurance premiums
• Variety of voluntary benefit options
• Company furnished life insurance
• Flexible spending account

The primary responsibility of a Project Engineer is to provide design work on projects.

Primary responsibilities include (but not limited to) the following:
Assist in the planning, design, and production of engineering drawings.
Oversee the production of these drawings and carry out specific assignments in preparing and assembling specifications.
Participates in conducting engineering investigations and planning work by completing well-defined tasks including collection and analysis of data; perform routine calculations, and participate in evaluating the feasibility of alternate solutions.
Prepare assigned sections of reports under close review of experienced professionals.
Requirements for the position:
Bachelors of Science in Civil Engineering.
Must possess Fundamentals of Engineering (EI) certification or Professional Engineering License in the State of Florida.
3-6 years of experience.
Able to perform basic engineering design using CADD and/or Microstation with supervision.
Knowledge of codes and design and construction practices.
Excellent communication skills.
Valid driver’s license with approved/acceptable driving history required.
Preferred candidate would possess any and all experience in:
Land Development: Interest in Land Development, site work, infrastructure, stormwater, utilities and permitting.
Municipal Services: Experience in preparation of construction plans, drawings, and specifications for general civil projects required.
Utilities: Experience in preparing drawings for all types of water and wastewater utility systems of drawings using AutoCAD",3.8,"DRMP
3.8","Gainesville, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
184,Dev Ops Engineer,$46k-$86k (Glassdoor Est.),"Essential Functions:

Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Work closely with development and technical teams in deploying their applications and automating resource provisioning.
Provide operational support for new and existing sites/software, and debugging production issues.
Perform functions required for the deployment, configuration, support, and troubleshooting of issues within the Credit Union’s complicated technical environment while building and maintaining a suite of automation scripts and packages to support his function.
Enable and assist teams with Application Performance Monitoring.
Perform other job-related duties as assigned by Manager(s).

Other Duties:

Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

Competencies:

Achieve goals beyond job requirements and take prompt action to accomplish objectives.
Clearly convey and receive information and ideas through a variety of media to individuals or groups in a manner that engages the listener, helps them understand and retain the message, and invites response and feedback. Keep others informed as appropriate. Demonstrate good written, oral, and listening skills.
Consistently maintain high levels of activity or productivity; sustain long hours when necessary, work with vigor, effectivenss and determination over a sustained period
Break down problems into component and recognize the interrelationships; make sound, well-informed, and objective decisions. Compare data, information, and input from a variety of sources to draw conclusions; take action that is consistent with available facts, constraints, and probable consequences.
Organize work, set priorities, and determine reources requirements; determines necessary sequence of activities needed to achieve goals.
Build constructive working relationships with clients/customers, other work units, community organizations and others to meet mutual goals and objectives. Behave professionally and supportively when working with individuals from a variety of ethnic, social and educational backgrounds.
Commitment to developing professionally by attending professional conferences and taking advantage of a variety of learning activities.
Introduce newly gained knowledge, focus on best practices, and value cutting-edge practices and approaches.

Education and Experience Requirements:

4-year degree in Information Systems or equivalent work experience.
2+ years of experience with Information/Business Systems.
2+ years of experience with AWS
2+ year scripting experience in Python, Powershell, Javascript, etc
2+ years of experience in the Financial Industry, preferably in the banking space.
1+ years of experience maintaining Chef, Ansible or Puppet (Ansible preferred)
1+ years of experience with network/server configuration for automated software deployment
1+ years of experience programming in C#, Java, etc.

Additional Eligibility Requirements:

Ability to use a wide variety of licensed and open source technologies and tools.
Ability to code and script for both physical and virtualized environments, such as AWS and Azure.
Experience with systems, IT operations, process improvement and best practices of the same.
Comfort with frequent, incremental code testing and deployment.
Strong grasp of automation tools, such as Ansible, Chef or Puppet.
Proven work in Continuous Integration using Jenkins or equivalent.
Ability to build and maintain proper source code repositories in SVN and GIT.
Comfort with collaboration, open communication and reaching across functional borders.
Adherence to policies, procedures and documentation standards.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills

Work Environment:

This job operates in a professional office environment. This role routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopier/scanner, filing cabinets, and fax machines.

Physical Demands:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. This is a largely sedentary role. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to stand, talk, hear, and use hands and fingers to handle, feel or operate objects, tools or controls and to reach with hands and arms. Ability to operate a computer is required.

Travel:
Minimal, as required by the business or professional development.

Service Excellence: The DCU Way:
All employees are expected to provide service excellence the “DCU Way” through teamwork and by providing quality service to internal and external members, incorporating the Guiding Principles of DCU’s culture:

People come first
Do the right thing
Make a difference

Bank Secrecy Act (BSA):

All Credit Union employees are required to complete all BSA related training annually and maintain knowledge of current BSA policies, specifically those related to functions performed within the department and identify and report possible suspicious activity.

We are proud to be an EEO/AA employer M/F/D/V

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.9,"Digital Federal Credit Union
3.9","Marlborough, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1979,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
185,"Principal Data Engineer - Secureworks - Austin, TX; Atlanta, GA; or US Remote",$84k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Secureworks

Secureworks® (NASDAQ: SCWX) a global cybersecurity leader, enables our customers and partners to outpace and outmaneuver adversaries with more precision, so they can rapidly adapt and respond to market forces to meet their business needs. With a unique combination of cloud-native, SaaS security platform and intelligence-driven security solutions, informed by 20+ years of threat intelligence and research, no other security platform is grounded and informed with this much real-world experience. www.secureworks.com

We enjoy competitive compensation and benefits packages, and reward and recognize our employees for exceptional results. A constant focus on continued learning and growth keeps our team members engaged and excited about “what’s next.” We offer flexible work options when available, and emphasize the importance of work-life balance. We know that when our people are rewarded, recognized, and rejuvenated, we win as a team.

Role Overview


We are looking for a detail-oriented, talented, and enthusiastic data engineer to work in a fast-paced, startup-like environment with a seasoned cross-functional team of Security Experts, Data Scientists, and Machine Learning Engineers to advance the state-of-the-art in network defense. If you love the challenges that come with big data then this role is for you. Duties include large-scale data routing, modeling, extraction, transformation, loading, warehousing, and composing such systems together with support for monitoring and mediation logic. You will use the latest big data platforms and technologies (e.g. NiFi, Spark, Kafka, NoSQL, Docker, Kubernetes, AWS/GCP) to help federate algorithms and applications across many clouds as part of the next generation Secureworks platform.

The ideal candidate will have a software development background with an emphasis on distributed systems and some familiarity with data science or machine learning, though personal expertise is not required. This role requires a data engineer that can take architectures from concept to reality and work well within a collaborative environment. If you’re an engineer with experience solving big data problems, you might have what it takes to become an elite member of our team and help us innovate faster than the bad guys.

Key Responsibilities
Design, build, launch, and maintain infrastructure to support large-scale data routing, streaming and historical processing, data warehousing, and container orchestration.
Employ a variety of languages and tools to marry big data systems together and hunt down opportunities to acquire new data from other systems.
Recommend and implement ways to improve data reliability, efficiency, and quality.
Collaborate with data scientists and security researchers to productize new methods of extracting information from structured and unstructured data.
Work effectively on a geographically distributed team to deliver high quality software against aggressive schedules.
Minimum Requirements
Minimum of 6 years of experience in data engineering, data modeling, ETL development, or data warehousing.
Minimum of 2 years of experience of software engineering in Scala.
Minimum of 2 years of experience with scripting languages like Python, Ruby, Perl, Bash, etc.
Minimum of 3 years of experience with big data platforms (e.g. Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, HBase, etc)
Experience with Amazon AWS, Google GCP, or similar cloud provider.
Preferred Experience
Experience working with containers and container orchestration solutions such as Docker, Kubernetes, Mesos, etc.
Experience with stream-processing systems, such as NiFi/StreamSets, Kafka, Storm/Heron, Spark, or Flink.
Experience with distributed NoSQL databases, such as HBase, Cassandra, or Accumulo.
Secureworks (A Dell Technologies Company) is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Secureworks are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, physical, mental or sensory disability, HIV status, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, family medical history or genetic information, family or parental status, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Secureworks will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. Learn more about Diversity and Inclusion at Secureworks here.",3.8,"Secureworks
3.8","Atlanta, GA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1999,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
186,Mechanical Engineer II - Systems,$51k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Fujifilm Dimatix, Inc. strives to offer a healthy work environment that promotes individual responsibility and growth, a collaborative spirit, and an atmosphere that encourages learning, professional development and achievement.
We search for the most talented and qualified people for both external and internal opportunities. At Fujifilm, performance, development and accountability are the standards to which the company and its people strive toward. And to support its employees, we offer programs that motivate, educate and promote a healthy work-life balance, which increase employee satisfaction and overall personal well-being.
Fujifilm is committed to offering a comprehensive and flexible benefit program to meet the needs of employees and their families. This flexible approach allows employees to create a program that fits their lives. At Fujifilm, INNOVATION and PEOPLE matter.
FUJIFILM Dimatix, Inc. is an E-Verify Employer
EO-employer-M/F/Vets/Disabled
ATTN Staffing Services: We do not accept unsolicited resumes.

POSITION SUMMARY:
Mechanical Engineer to contribute to the development of industrial inkjet printing systems. This position requires a combination of technical depth, design experience, a willingness to be hands on, and a collaborative spirit. The engineer will be involved at all stages of the development process from initial scoping and requirements generation, to engineering analysis and design execution, through validation and field support.
KNOWLEDGE: Uses skills as a seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of industry practices and company policies and procedures; resolves a wide range of issues in imaginative as well as practical ways. This job is the fully qualified, career-oriented, journey-level position.
JOB COMPLEXITY: Works on problems of diverse scope where analysis of data requires evaluation of identifiable factors. Demonstrates good judgment in selecting methods and techniques for obtaining solutions. Interacts with senior internal and external personnel.
SUPERVISION: Normally receives little instruction on day-to-day work, general instructions on new assignments.
ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:
Scoping project proposals. This includes estimating effort, cost, and technical risk.
Thermofluid analysis of inkjet system components including ink delivery systems, electronics enclosures, and electronics cooling.
Structural analysis of machine components such as gantries and mounts
Evaluation of, and contribution to, product requirements.
Concept generation and proposals
Feasibility testing
Design of industrial inkjet systems including high tolerance machined components, sheet metal, fluid systems, and industrial motion.
Tolerance stack up analysis
Conducting Design Failure Mode and Effect Analysis on new designs
Value engineering to reduce the cost of existing designs
Work cross-functionally with marketing, operations, field support and external partners to produce designs that achieve a thoughtful balance between function, quality, and cost.
Prepare and release product documentation including part drawings, assembly prints, product manuals, process documentation, etc.
Collaborate with the production and test teams to produce and enhance designs.
Drive verification and validation through the creation of test plans, working with technicians, performing tests, analyzing data, and meeting project goals by developing creative solutions to problems.
Interfacing with stakeholders to ensure that the product meets the intended customer’s requirements.
Work with the field support team to achieve successful installation of equipment and troubleshoot customer issues. This may include some travel.
Leverage research from industry and academic best practices to create new development processes that extend the engineering capabilities of the team
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES:
None
REQUIRED:
Advanced problem-solving skills utilizing science and engineering education to arrive at practical solutions.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to work individually as well as interact with vendors, customers, and other engineers and ability top work across several functional departments
High creativity
BS Engineering and 5-10 years related experience
Product design experience using a commercial CAD software.
Knowledge of proper drafting techniques per ANSI/ASME Y14.5M.
Ability to participate, lead, mentor in a team environment
DESIRED:
Advanced Engineering degree
Familiarity with commercial CFD and/or FEA analysis software
Statistics
Knowledge of printing, print systems
PHYSICAL DEMANDS:
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully
perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with
disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Ability to work long hours as required.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Ink Lab
OTHER:
Other duties as may be assigned.
Each employee’s primary objective is to assure that the quality, delivery and cost controls within his/her control meet or exceed all of our internal and external customers’ requirements.
Each employee is required to abide by the Employee Handbook and the rules and regulations explained and provided at each orientation and training session. Special attention must be given to the safety aspects of these documents.
FUJIFILM Dimatix provides competitive wages, a generous benefits package and a friendly, dynamic working environment.
Equal Opportunity Employer
FUJIFILM Dimatix is an E-Verify Employer",3.8,"FUJIFILM Dimatix
3.8","West Lebanon, NH",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1984,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
187,Perl Developer,-1,"Job Purpose: Accomplishes software requirements, by developing, testing, deploying and maintaining applications, processes, and databases.

Job Duties:
Design, develop, and maintain applications using Perl modules /code that meets requirements, is high quality, and performs efficiently and effectively.
Develops and maintains applications and databases by evaluating client needs; analyzing requirements; developing software systems.
Incorporate standards and best practices, including performance, security, scalability, and maintainability.
Contributes to team effort by accomplishing projects on time and with minimal defects.
Protects operations by keeping information confidential and adhering to all company information security policies.
Takes ownership of processes/applications post development, inclusive, but not limited to daily monitoring to ensure ongoing success.
Ensures that task ticket system is kept up to date with current status and notes are kept up to date.
Maintains professional and technical knowledge by attending educational workshops; reviewing professional publications; establishing personal networks; participating in professional societies.
Review and provide feedback on functional and technical requirements.
Define and propose solutions for meeting requirements.
Contributing to improvements in the software development lifecycle (SDLC) utilizing practices such as test-driven development (TDD), static code analysis, code reviews, continuous integration, continuous delivery, and automated security scanning.

Skills/Qualifications: Perl, SQL Server, Restful APIs, SOAP APIs, Information Analysis, Problem Solving, Attention to Detail, Software Design, Software Debugging, Software Development Fundamentals, Software Documentation, Software Testing, Software Requirements, Software Development Process

Strong communication and writing skills. Ability to communicate directly with peers, managers, and clients while leading development to a completed and successful solution. Strong organization skills to manage multiple timelines and complete tasks quickly within the constraints of internal/clients’ timelines.

Position Location: Work remotely.
Education Requirements: College degree preferred.
Pre-employment Requirements: Drug screening and background check
Experience: Minimum five years of experience developing and maintaining applications. Experience with loan servicing or other financial systems is an asset.",-1,Tech Talent Link,"Milwaukie, OR",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
188,"Wireless Modem Embedded Sr. Software Engineer (Bridgewater, NJ)",$96k-$151k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company:
Qualcomm Technologies, Inc.
Job Area:
Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Software Engineering
Job Overview:


Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in.

Develops, creates, and modifies general computer applications software or specialized utility programs. Analyzes user needs and develops software solutions. Designs software or customizes software for client use with the aim of optimizing operational efficiency. May analyze and design databases within an application area, working individually or coordinating database development as part of a team. Modifies existing software to correct errors, allow it to adapt to new hardware, or to improve its performance. Analyzes user needs and software requirements to determine feasibility of design within time and cost constraints. Confers with systems analysts, engineers, programmers and others to design system and to obtain information on project limitations and capabilities, performance requirements and interfaces. Stores, retrieves, and manipulates data for analysis of system capabilities and requirements. Designs, develops, and modifies software systems, using scientific analysis and mathematical models to predict and measure outcome and consequences of design.

The responsibilities of this role include:
Working independently with little supervision.
Making decisions that are significant in impact; errors are not readily apparent due to the complexity of work process/product or time between decisions and results; errors typically result in significant expenditure of time, resources, and funds to correct.
Using verbal and written communication skills to convey complex and/or detailed information to multiple individuals/audiences with differing knowledge levels. May require strong negotiation and influence, communication to large groups or high-level constituents.
Having a moderate amount of influence over key organizational decisions (e.g., is consulted by senior leadership to provide input on key decisions).
Completing tasks that require multiple steps that can be performed in various orders; tasks require simultaneously executing multiple cognitive abilities and maintaining information in short- or long-term memory.
Exercising exceptional creativity to innovate new ideas and develop innovative products/processes without established objectives or known parameters.
Using deductive and inductive problem solving; multiple approaches may be taken/necessary to solve the problem; often information is missing or conflicting; advanced data analysis and interpretation skills are required.
Occasionally participates in strategic planning within own area affecting immediate operations.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Engineering, Information Systems, Computer Science, or related field.
7+ years Software Engineering or related work experience.
3+ years experience with Programming Language such as C, C++, Java, Python, etc.
Preferred Qualifications
12+ years Software Engineering or related work experience.
3+ years experience with Database Management Software.
3+ years experience with API.
3+ years experience working in a large matrixed organization.
Master's Degree in Engineering, Information Systems, Computer Science or related field.
Familiarity with programming in resource constrained environments (MIPS, Memory) for embedded systems
Ability to work well in a team environment working on multiple projects with challenging deadlines across multiple geographies
Strong communications theory background, with signaling processing development experience preferred
3gpp (4G/5G) Physical layer software development
Microcontroller programming for control of hardware devices
Multi-core CPU/DSP programming environments
Tensilica experience is a plus
Applicants: If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number found here for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.

EEO Employer: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer; all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or any other protected classification.",4.0,"Qualcomm Incorporated
4.0","Bridgewater, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
189,Sr Principal Comm Network Systems Engineer,-1,"Do cool satellite views of places on Earth amaze you? Does the fire and fury of a rocket launching into space to examine distant galaxies excite you? These capabilities and more are made possible by products made at Raytheon Technologies. Would you consider joining us in developing the next generation of space-based systems? Raytheon Intelligence and Space organization is currently seeking qualified Senior Principal Engineers in the area of space networking or space networks. This position will initiate and support projects requiring novel ways of using networking (wired and/or wireless), network science, cybersecurity technologies, and/or RF communications processing to solve space-based problems. The Senior Principal Engineer will support SWAP, performance, affordability analysis and trade studies across entire constellations including ground segment and communications payloads.

This senior technical position requires a top performer with space systems domain knowledge and the ability to create new algorithms and paradigms in the areas of wireless networking and computing, software defined networking, network security (including cyber), machine learning, and wireless/RF communications in extremely constrained or hostile environments. This role requires regular engagement with customer counterparts as well as with internal Raytheon Technologies teams, and active participation in customer and program technical reviews. The Senior Principal Engineer is responsible for determining technical solutions that satisfy a diverse set of customer requirements.

Responsibilities of the Senior Principal Engineer include:
Provide technical leadership on space mission communication/network architecture trades
Develop the technical vision and strategies for solving real world problem across a variety of space programs
Provide engineering and technical leadership for space systems programs from product concept, proposal development, to integration & test and product delivery.
Provide engineering authority to all decisions impacting product integrity, system performance, and system functionality.
Provide technical support in developing and maintaining the analysis to predict overall system performance
Coordinate, write, and deliver technical presentations to both internal and external customers
Mentor junior engineers
Required Skills:
Minimum 10+ years of experience in Systems or Communications Engineering with an emphasis on networking
BS or MS in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or related STEM fields with relevant work experience
Must have technical knowledge of networking concepts, network protocol design, L2/L3 protocols, and space-based RF systems
Experience using network simulation and emulation tools
Must have direct experience with requirements development, analysis, verification and validation
Must have excellent communication skills (written, verbal, and presentation), and experience dealing with customers, management, technical staff, and internal / external organizations.
Active Secret Clearance
U.S. Citizenship required as this position requires an active U.S. Security Clearance as of 1st day of employment.
U.S. Citizenship required as this position requires the ability to access US only data systems.
Desired Skills:
Experience in the development of high reliability space payloads, sensors or technology
Experience in architecture development of software centric systems
PhD in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or related fields with relevant work experience
Experience in deploying a rigorous Integrated Product Development Process
Experience conducting critical design reviews, test readiness reviews, and test review boards
Skilled in proposal preparation, cost and schedule estimation and technical documentation related to contract deliverable items
Ability to perform payload SWAP, performance, and affordability analyses, as well as trade studies in ground segment, constellation design, and communication payloads.
Experience in performing Mission & CONOPS analysis
Experience as an LSE, Network IPT Lead or CE on previous programs
System level architecture & modeling experience
Experience using STK
Education Requirements:

Bachelors Degree in Engineering, Sciences, or Mathematics or related STEM discipline
*U.S. Citizenship Status is requires as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems**
#Space2020
168636

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
190,Sr Software Engineer II,-1,"TheTestEquipment and Environment Center (TEEC)appliesa systems Raytheon Missiles and Defense (RMD) products. The TEECusescommonplatformsandprocesses to design/developproduction,depot and engineeringteststations. Opportunities include:
Domesticandinternationaltravel
Innovativerapidprototyping
Supportinglive-firetestingofourproducts
Designing, developing or using
Designing,developing or integrating methods and equipment to effectivelytestsystems.
Job Description:

RMD Systems Integration and Test Directorate is seeking a Software Engineer for the TEEC.
The selected candidate will participate on multidiscipline engineering teams performing design, development and integration of MS test products within TEEC. Typical work involves the development of both engineering and production test equipment, environments and systems. As such, the candidate will contribute to the completion of all stages of test product development, and will be responsible for performing technical, cost and schedule management of their assigned projects. They will be expected to act, either as a part of their team or independently, to uncover and resolve issues associated with the development and implementation of test products.

This position is focused on, but not limited to, the design, development, integration, test, and maintenance of software for TEEC. The selected candidate will develop applications, libraries, and instrument drivers using the software style, development language, and integrated development environment specified by TEEC.

U.S Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.

Required Education, Skill, and Experience:
Requires a Bachelor of Science degree in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM)
A minimum of six (6) years of professional engineering experience developing and implementing high order programming languages, demonstrating applied knowledge of advanced principles, theories, and concepts. Professional experience with C#, C++, or C is required.
U.S. Citizenship is required.
Other required skills:
Professional engineering experience utilizing integrated development environments and debugging tools to troubleshoot software implementation and ensure integrity of the software products (experience with Microsoft Visual Studio is required).
Extensive professional engineering experience prioritizing and handling multiple tasks in a production environment, developing solutions under only general direction, and demonstrating excellent troubleshooting skills.
Extensive professional engineering experience working within a team environment.
Professional experience with project/workload management, utilizing resources effectively to satisfy internal customers and implementation schedules.
Professional engineering experience developing requirements for software products.
Professional experience using model based design and the Unified Modeling Language (UML) to visualize software architecture and design.
Experience with IBM Rhapsody or Cameo Enterprise Architecture.
Desired Skills:
Master of Science degree in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM)
ABET is the preferred, although not required, accreditation standard
Working knowledge of computer architecture and computer hardware optimization techniques.
Experience with the development and integration of software drivers for the operation of computer hardware interfaces.
Knowledge in common computer hardware interface and data protocols such as TCP/IP, UDP, RS-422 (experience with Microsoft Windows operating systems is preferred).
Professional experience developing automated test systems (familiarity with National Instruments (NI) TestStand (preferred) or Architect certification (CTD or CTA) highly preferred).
Experience with laboratory test instrumentation, electronics and software (experience with NI VISA, NI Measurement and Automation Explorer, or NI Switch Executive is preferred).
Professional and consistent written and interpersonal communication skills.
Experience using Software Configuration Management principles, environments and tools.
Knowledge in computer scripting language such as MATLAB/Shell/Perl/Python.
Company Overview:
Raytheon Technologies

169595

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tucson, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
191,Sr Software Engineer I,-1,"TheTestSystemsSolutionsCenter(TSSC)appliesa systems Raytheon Missiles and Defense (RMD) products. The TSSCusescommonplatformsandprocesses to design/developproduction,depot and engineeringteststations. Opportunities include:
Domesticandinternationaltravel
Innovativerapidprototyping
Supportinglive-firetestingofourproducts
Designing, developing or using
Designing,developing or integrating methods and equipment to effectivelytestsystems.
Job Description:

RMD Systems Integration and Test Directorate is seeking a Software Engineer for the TSSC.
The selected candidate will participate on multidiscipline engineering teams performing design, development and integration of MS test products within TSSC. Typical work involves the development of both engineering and production test equipment, environments and systems. As such, the candidate will contribute to the completion of all stages of test product development, and will be responsible for performing technical, cost and schedule management of their assigned projects. They will be expected to act, either as a part of their team or independently, to uncover and resolve issues associated with the development and implementation of test products.

This position is focused on, but not limited to, the design, development, integration, test, and maintenance of software for TSSC. The selected candidate will develop applications, libraries, and instrument drivers using the software style, development language, and integrated development environment specified by TSSC.

U.S Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.

Required Education, Skill, and Experience:
Requires a Bachelor of Science degree in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM)
A minimum of four (4) years of professional engineering experience developing and implementing high order programming languages, demonstrating applied knowledge of advanced principles, theories, and concepts. Professional experience with C#, C++, or C is required.
U.S. Citizenship is required.
Must have:
Professional engineering experience utilizing integrated development environments and debugging tools to troubleshoot software implementation and ensure integrity of the software products (experience with Microsoft Visual Studio is required).
Extensive professional engineering experience prioritizing and handling multiple tasks in a production environment, developing solutions under only general direction, and demonstrating excellent troubleshooting skills.
Extensive professional engineering experience working within a team environment.
Professional experience with project/workload management, utilizing resources effectively to satisfy internal customers and implementation schedules.
Professional engineering experience developing requirements for software products.
Professional experience using model based design and the Unified Modeling Language (UML) to visualize software architecture and design.
Experience with IBM Rhapsody or Cameo Enterprise Architecture.
Desired Skills:
Master of Science degree in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM)
ABET is the preferred, although not required, accreditation standard
Working knowledge of computer architecture and computer hardware optimization techniques.
Experience with the development and integration of software drivers for the operation of computer hardware interfaces.
Knowledge in common computer hardware interface and data protocols such as TCP/IP, UDP, RS-422 (experience with Microsoft Windows operating systems is preferred).
Professional experience developing automated test systems (familiarity with National Instruments (NI) TestStand (preferred) or Architect certification (CTD or CTA) highly preferred).
Experience with laboratory test instrumentation, electronics and software (experience with NI VISA, NI Measurement and Automation Explorer, or NI Switch Executive is preferred).
Professional and consistent written and interpersonal communication skills.
Experience using Software Configuration Management principles, environments and tools.
Knowledge in computer scripting language such as MATLAB/Shell/Perl/Python.
Company Overview:
Raytheon Technologies

163205

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tucson, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
192,Data Engineer,$101k-$181k (Glassdoor Est.),"COVID-19 UPDATE: The NYC office will remain closed until we feel it is safe to return. All interviews will be virtual until further notice.


Small Teams; Big Data

At Tapad, we look for individuals who are motivated by complex and challenging work. We want to work with people who share compelling solutions to those challenges, solutions informed by their unique experiences, passions, and expertise.

We are looking for a Data Engineer to join our global engineering team in New York City. We need a person who can work hands-on as an engineer, solving complex problems and building advanced software systems. We face daily challenges that are both unique and engaging, while processing data at petabyte scale. That is over one trillion data points in any given 60-day period — with consumer privacy and data security at the heart of everything we do.

The size and scale of our challenges demand the use of cutting edge, open-source technologies, like Apache Spark, Apache Beam, and Kubernetes. We're proud to have been built on Scala from day one.

Collaboration is at the forefront of our day-to-day at Tapad. You would be working with multiple engineering domains, and with our commercial teams, to guarantee that we are delivering the best products. We believe that our engineers have an obligation to dissent and discuss. A successful Tapad engineer understands that their ideas hold weight, and they contribute freely and regularly. We want someone who is motivated to find large-scale solutions with us. We work with big data on small teams. Every contribution is important.

When you work with us, you matter. We ask our employees to make an impact, and feel it is only right to give a lot in return. We offer every employee a 401k with matching, generous parental leave, and unlimited PTO (and we mean it!). We believe if you're sick, feel like you're getting sick, or just need a personal day, you should take that time to get better. We have free virtual lunches every month, free continuous education, and an open door policy every day. We make sure our virtual office is a welcoming space, full of individuals who can teach and learn from one another everyday.

Technologies we use at Tapad (don't worry, we'll teach you):
Google Cloud Platform (GCP), Google Dataflow/Beam, SQL, BigQuery
Scala, sbt, cats, http4s, fs2
Spark ML, TensorFlow, Kubeflow, Python, PyTorch
Airflow, Prometheus, Kubernetes
We are looking for candidates who meet some of the following qualifications:
3+ years of experience making significant contributions in the form of code
Strong understanding of algorithms and data structures and knowing when to apply them
Deep familiarity with one or more programming languages (Ex: Scala, Java, Python, etc.)
Interest in machine learning techniques to develop better predictive and clustering models
Experience working with high-scale systems
Proficiency in SQL
Interest in creating powerful machine learning tools that facilitate experimentation and productionalization at scale
Interested in data engineering and warehousing to develop ingestion engines, ETL pipelines, and organizing data to expose it in a consumable format
Bonus Experience:
Experience with building systems for model training and serving using TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch, Spark ML, or Kubeflow
Experience with functional programming
Strong understanding of concurrent and parallel programming
A day in the life as a Tapad Engineer:
Solve complex problems building advanced software systems, while processing several petabytes of data
Adapt quickly to utilize software engineering best practices
Demonstrate the ability to deliver quality software collaboratively
Designing, implementing, and running big data pipelines that canvas over petabytes of data
Contributing to real production projects that constitute Tapad's core offering
Collaborate with your team of engineers, and add to product, account, and business development functions to create new products and features
Learn functional programming
Ensure that the software you create is testable and tested
Tapad Perks:
Generous PTO - no accruing necessary
401k matching
On-site medical and dental partitioners (we bring the doctors in-house so you can make appointments at your convenience)
Scala School (we'll teach you!), Coursera, LinkedIn learning, peer-lead professional development, and an abundance of resources to help you stay sharp
Unlimited snacks and beverages, collaboration catered lunches
Discounts on gym memberships
Foosball, ping pong, diversity and inclusion group, book club, Tough Mudder, push-up challenges, and tons of other extra-curricular activities that will make you feel like part of the Tapad family
Check out our #TapadLife page to see what our employees have to say
Find more about our engineering culture HERE
About Tapad:

Founded in 2010, Tapad cracked the code on cross-device marketing technology. Our groundbreaking, proprietary technology assimilates trillions of data points to find the relationship between smartphones, desktops, laptops, tablets, and connected TVs. Ten years later, we are processing data at petabyte scale, with an engineering team that comprises roughly half of our entire organization. When you work with us, you matter, and your work matters.

We use Scala, in combination with large-scale data processing and open-source technologies, to build our device graph. Across our engineering teams, we also use Scala, GCP, Spark, Kubernetes, Python, TypeScript, Angular, and anything else that helps us get the job done. We're open-minded about new technologies, we're passionate about what we do, and we make time for everyone to learn and grow as the industry changes. Engineers at Tapad are approachable and ambitious people who think outside the box and solve big problems collaboratively. Are you up for the challenge?

Tapad is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and will consider all qualified applicants regardless of age, sex, race, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or family status, disability, or any other legally protected status.

Tapad does not accept resumes from unsolicited search firms nor recruiters. In no event shall fees be paid to any unsolicited search firms nor recruiters, regardless of whether the candidate is made an offer or accepts a placement at Tapad. All resumes received through any channels will be considered the sole property of Tapad.

Tapad's Talent Team is solely responsible for making the decision on forming partnerships with search firms and third-party recruiters. Any communication outside Tapad's Talent team will not be an agreement of services.",4.2,"Tapad
4.2","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
193,Data Engineer Co-op,$51k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description


Bose is about better sound, but better sound is just the beginning. We’re about inventing new technologies that truly benefit people and creating a culture where innovation and teamwork are highly valued. Working at Bose, you’re encouraged to question conventional thinking in the relentless quest to create products and experiences that change people's lives. Our culture is as distinctive as our products. Join a company that operates globally, with a culture that embraces new ideas.

We have an exciting Junior Data Engineer employment opportunity in our Data Enablement department. The team is working to build a world class data driven organization that includes proactive data quality framework, enable Data Science activity, advanced analytics, build centralized metadata repository, cross-platform data lineage, data inventory automation and other functions.

If you have a passion for being a part of a data driven culture by delivering value, please consider a career at Bose!

Responsibilities include:
Manage individual data delivery projects (project plan, requirements, technology selection, development, presentation etc)
Design and develop ETL workflows to integrate data management processes
Data Quality root cause analysis, assessment and improvement
Make applications “handshaking”
Evaluating new technologies
Preferable Skills and Experiences
Java, JavaScript, Python, Json, Groovy is a big plus
Talend, Snowflake, Databricks, PowerBI
Database development, solid SQL knowledge, Data Modeling
AWS background, information security, middleware and networking understanding
Application integration experience (e.g. RESTful API)
Ability to analyze complex structured and unstructured data
Strong in gaining knowledge of new technologies across data management disciplines
Strong interpersonal skills, accountability, written and verbal communication skills, time management
Good to have:
Understanding of machine learning, statistics, natural language processing, sentiment analysis
Data governance domain knowledge and tools (e.g. Collibra)
Data Catalog Development experience (e.g. Talend)
Sense of Humor!
To love good music and good sound!
Bose is an equal opportunity employer that is committed to inclusion and diversity. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, or any other legally protected characteristics. For additional information, please review: (1) the EEO is the Law Poster (http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/OFCCP_EEO_Supplement_Final_JRF_QA_508c.pdf); and (2) its Supplements (http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/ofccpost.htm). Please note, the company's pay transparency is available at http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/pdf/.pdf. Bose is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodations to individuals with disabilities. If you need a reasonable accommodation because of a disability for any part of the application or employment process, please send an e-mail to Wellbeing@bose.com and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.",3.7,"Bose
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1964,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
194,Sr Software Engineer-.NET- Virtual-Remote,-1,"Position Overview:

PerfectServe is looking for a top tier .NET/C# developer with a track record of professional excellence to join our team. In this extraordinary opportunity you will operate collaboratively within the Agile/SCRUM framework, working with a team of exceptionally talented product managers, designers, and engineers to deliver creative, elegant solutions for our customers’ clinical communications needs.

At PerfectServe, a Sr. Software Engineer is a technical leader whose primary duty is to write highly performant, well-structured and well tested code. They are responsible for enhancing and maintaining web services as part of an Agile team and are the go-to expert in their domain. The Sr. Software Engineer is responsible for collaborating on the design and development of each service under their responsibility. This includes feature delivery, adherence to code quality, testing, and the mentoring of junior members. The successful candidate will be responsible for leading the development and maintenance of several C# API services that back client facing UI services as well as C# API’s that connect 3rd party integrated solutions.

Key Responsibilities:

As a Sr. Software Engineer, you will be responsible for debating, designing, implementing and delivering user stories on time, with high quality, while following an Agile development lifecycle.

Additional responsibilities include:
Solving complex problems as part of a team
Writing code to standards, implementing best practices.
Identifying, and communicating, technical debt and risk, and effecting resolutions.
Collaborating with Product Owners in Release/Iteration planning.
Developing, designing, and documenting based on business requirements within an Agile context
Reviewing code for testability, maintainability and adhering to best practices.
Mentoring junior members on the team.
Essential Qualifications:

Team-oriented Sr. Software Engineer who can collaborate with business and QA staff on projects. Must be technically strong in Web design patterns, and best practices while displaying firm leadership skills, including communication of technical risk and debt. Excellent problem-solving abilities, analytical skills, and the ability to perform under tight deadlines are also essential.
5+ years of experience with C# and the .NET Framework and .NET Core.
5+ years ASP.NET Web API.
Expert level knowledge of RESTful Web API patterns
Expert level knowledge in ADO.NET and at least one .NET ORM Framework
Advanced level knowledge of MSSQL and structuring data for query optimization.
Strong Unit and Integration Testing techniques.
Strong understanding of the software development process.
Strong communication skills, both written and verbal.
Some experience with build and deploy tools (Jenkins, CloudBees).
Experience in Git.
Beneficial Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, a related field, or equivalent education.
Experience reverse engineering legacy .NET services.
React or Angular experience
Comfortable working with collaboration tools such as Slack, JIRA, Confluence
Environment, Physical& Other Requirements:

This position requires interaction with people and technology while either standing or sitting. In order to best service our customers on the phone, face-to-face, or on the computer, all employees must be able to communicate with or without reasonable accommodation.

Depending on the assignment, may require ordinary ambulatory skills sufficient to visit other locations; or the ability to stand, walk and manipulate (lift, carry, move) light to medium weights of 10 - 50 pounds. Requires good hand-eye coordination, arm, hand and finger dexterity, including ability to grasp, and visual acuity to use a keyboard, operate equipment and read technical information.

PerfectServe is committed to compliance with its obligations under all applicable state and federal laws prohibiting employment discrimination. In keeping with this commitment, it attempts to reasonably accommodate applicants and employees in accordance with the requirements of the disability discrimination laws. It also invites individuals with disabilities to participate in a good faith, interactive process to identify reasonable accommodations that can be made without imposing an undue hardship.

This position description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee.

PerfectServe, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer -----M/F/D/V.

Requirements
Expert level knowledge in ADO.NET and at least one .NET ORM Framework
Professional Experience with ASP.NET and Web API
Position requires experience with C# and the .NET Framework and .NET Core.",4.6,"PerfectServe
4.6",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
195,Data Engineer - Solovis,$59k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Solovis

Solovis is a revolutionary new SaaS platform offering a multi-asset class portfolio management and reporting solution for foundations, endowments, pensions, OCIOs, and family offices. Our firm is on a mission to set a new industry standard for performance, exposure, and portfolio analysis. The key to that success is to continue disrupting the industry with transformational technology designed specifically for limited partners. At Solovis, we recognize our employees by personally investing in them and providing a rewarding corporate culture centered around growth, training, and an opportunity to shape the future of our product.

Data Engineer

We are looking for a savvy Data Engineer who will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for use across existing products. The ideal candidate is an experienced data pipeline builder and data wrangler who enjoys optimizing and designing data systems. The Data Engineer will work alongside our software engineers, architects, and data analysts on data and integration initiatives and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. They must be self-directed and comfortable supporting multiple systems, products and data flows. The right candidate will be excited by the prospect of optimizing or even re-designing our company’s data architecture to support uses cases in the FinTech arena.

What you’ll do
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture
Work with large, complex financial data sets that require sophisticated processing and transformation.
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Build resilient and maintainable infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources.
Work as part of an Agile development team with stakeholders to develop new features to support their data infrastructure needs.
Manage data cross multiple platforms, including Azure SQL and Snowflake.
Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in our data systems.
Requirements

What you bring
Advanced working SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases. Must have the ability to write complex analytical queries.
Experience building and optimizing ‘big data’ data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Experience performing root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.
Strong analytic skills related to working with structured and semi-structured datasets.
Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.
A successful history of manipulating, processing and extracting value from large disparate datasets.
Experience supporting and working with several products in a dynamic environment.
We are looking for a candidate with 3+ years of experience in a Data Engineer role, who has attained a degree in Computer Science, and/or another quantitative field. They should also have experience using the following software/tools:
Experience with data pipeline and workflow management tools. Experience with Airflow and/or dbt is strongly preferred.
Cloud experience strongly preferred. Experience with Azure and Snowflake is a major plus.
Experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: C# and/or Python
Ability to understand, and contribute to technical discussions
Effective communicator with excellent verbal and written communication skills. Must be comfortable communicating with development teams, Product Owners, Product Management, and company leadership
High level of accountability for program execution, deliverables, and reporting to technical management
High motivation and drive to help product teams excel and deliver based on roadmap and associated timelines
Excellent interpersonal skills – ability to work well in a team with diverse personality types
Benefits

What we bring

Purpose – we are about providing our customers investment knowledge when they need it so that they can positively impact the world around them
Top notch team members and collaborative environment.
Endless opportunity with the ability to progress into various disciplines and expertise or into a leadership role as company growth continues
Solovis is an Equal Opportunity Employer and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any kind: Solovis is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Solovis are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to national, social or ethnic origin, sex, age, physical, mental or sensory disability, sexual orientation, marital, status, past or present military service, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate.",4.7,"eVestment
4.7","Irving, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
196,Sr Software Engineer II,-1,"Are you a passionate, motivated Software Developer interested in an opportunity to work in the Fort Wayne, IN area? Then join our team and contribute to programs that save lives and enable the freedoms we enjoy.

We are looking for Senior Software Engineer to help with the continued results of our products, and development of next generation systems. Every day at Raytheon Intelligence & Space, our extraordinary engineers are empowered for excellence and inspired to invent in an inclusive environment where work-life balance is an elegant solution, not a slogan.

Typical job functions for Senior Software Engineer include:
• Participation on collaborative, cross-disciplined integrated product teams, often employing agile software development techniques and resources to plan, design, develop, test, and integrate complex software and systems solutions.
• Being responsible for some or all of a Software product, contributing as a software team member and possibly instructing a small software team.
• Responsibilities spanning the full lifecycle of product development, from architecture and design, through integration, test, and field support.

Required Skills:
• Minimum 6 years of Professional Software development experience.
• Experience with C, C++, Java, or other computer languages.
• U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems
• Must have a BS / BA with a major in Software Engineering, Computer Engineering, Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Math, or other related field.
• Must be able to acquire SECRET Clearance within first year of employment.

Desired Skills:
• Experience with Agile lifecycle process including Scrum, Continuous Integration and Test Driven Development Methodologies.
• Experience with real-time operating systems (RTOS), embedded programming, processor/board architecture and design.
• Experience developing, guiding, or coaching a small software team.
• Experience with some or all phases of software development: architecture, design, implementation, testing, and system integration.
• Experience in Communications (Radios) or Electronic Warfare domains.
• MS / MA with a major in Software Engineering, Computer Engineering, Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Math, or other related field.

Raytheon Intelligence & Space is a supporting provider of integrated sensor, communication and electronic warfare systems giving military compels accurate and timely actionable information for the network-centric battlefield. You will continue your career working on cutting-edge technology by day, while in your free time you can have perfect work-life balance in this family-friendly small-town feel for a city its size.

We offer extensive reward and recognition programs in compensation, career development, health care, educational assistance, maternal and paternal leave, flexible work schedules, child/adult backup care, 401(k), paid holidays and paid time off. In addition, this position is eligible for relocation assistance.
169419

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Fort Wayne, IN",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
197,Sr. Test Software Engineer I,-1,"We have career growth opportunities for Test Software Engineers to join our diverse team supporting Electro-Optical Distributed Aperture System (EODAS) Test Automation in direct support of the McKinney Consolidated Manufacturing Center in McKinney Texas.

The Test Automation Department (TAD) is responsible for the design and development of test equipment hardware and software to support a range of products and customers. The McKinney Test Automation section within TAD is a growing and highly motivated team providing quality on-time solutions to supporting customers seeking innovative and economical solutions for the EODAS product line.

Primary responsibility will be to develop test software for a high rate/volume factory environment which exercise and analyzes deliverable product for our customer. Candidate will be expected to follow established department procedures and instructions while working closely with program / functional supervision to ensure the overall test software requirements and design objectives are met. Candidate must be able to support cradle to grave efforts including requirements, design, integration, verification, and maintenance for all test software activities within an Agile environment.

Required Skills:
•Minimum 4+years of test software development with emphasis in automated test systems
•Experience with LabWindows/CVI, Labview, TestStand , C++, C#, or other programming languages for test software development and maintenance
•Experience with interfacing test software with laboratory and production tests instrumentation (oscilloscopes, digital multi-meter, direct current power supplies, video analysis, etc.)
•Experience with the development and integration of test software drivers for the operation of computer hardware interfaces
•Experience planning, conducting, coordinating and managing technical test software development activities (requirements, design, integration, validation, and maintenance)
•Experience prioritizing and handling multiple tasks for a production environment
•Experience of different types of manufacturing and testing events (Environment Stress Screening (ESS) (Thermal and Vibe), Unit and Acceptance Testing (UT/AT), Device Verification Test (DVT))
•Experience in common computer hardware interface and data protocols such as TCP/IP, UDP, Serial Communication (Microsoft Windows environment preferred)
•Ability to translate test software requirements into cost effective and creative solutions for a production environment
•Ability to obtain a DoD issued Secret Clearance within first year of start date
•Proof of US Citizenship

Desired Skills:
•Agile life cycle process knowledge including Scrum and Product Owner experiences
•Knowledge of infrared video analysis
•Knowledge of Software Configuration Management principles, environments, and tools (Subversion or Git)
•Work with limited supervision and meet commitments for assigned schedule, financial, and technical goals
•Test Software Engineering experience working within a team environment
•Strong written and interpersonal communication skills
•Current and Active DoD Secret clearance or higher clearance

Required Education:
•Bachelors Degree (BS), Masters Degree (MS), or Doctorate (PhD) in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Software Engineering, Physics, Math or related STEM field is required

169885

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","McKinney, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
198,Sr. Test Software Engineer II,-1,"We have career growth opportunities for Test Development Engineers to join our diverse team supporting Airborne Multi-mode Radar (AMR) Test Automation in direct support of the McKinney Consolidated Manufacturing Center in McKinney, TX.
The Test Automation Department (TAD) is responsible for the design and development of test equipment hardware and software for a wide range of products and customers. The AMR Test Automation section within TAD is a growing and highly motivated team who consistently provides quality on-time on-cost solutions to support external and internal customers seeking innovative and economical solutions for their product lines. The section also supports change incorporation and obsolescence redesign efforts of various legacy systems in direct support of production capabilities. Position has potential domestic travel up to 10% in support of development activities.

Primary responsibility will be to develop test software to exercise and analyze deliverable product. Other responsibilities are to support conceptual and detailed design of test positions and test adapters as well as integration and post-delivery support of these test systems. Candidate will be expected to follow established procedures and instructions (IPDS and the One-page processes) while working closely with program / functional / factory supervision to ensure the overall design objectives are met. Candidate must be able to support cradle to grave efforts including proposal generation, conceptual modeling, detailed design, integration, and verification activities. The candidate will typically be the primary and often sole developer for the entire development cycle.

Required Skills:

•Minimum 6 years of test software development with emphasis in automated test systems; and experience with National Instruments LabVIEW and TestStand software with knowledge of other programming languages (C, C++)
•Some experience with digital and/or RF test equipment using COTS components to deliver test equipment solutions
•Development and integration of software drivers for the operation of computer hardware interfaces; and common computer hardware interface and data protocols such as SCPI, TCP/IP, UDP, and Serial Communication
•Microsoft Windows environment experience and familiarity from NT to Windows 10
•Experience with common laboratory/manufacturing test instrumentation and electronics (oscilloscopes, DMMs, power supplies etc.)
•Experience with modular instrument platforms such as PXI
•Proven experience developing effective solutions and demonstrating intermediate/advanced troubleshooting skills of computer systems, units under test, and custom hardware designs
•• U.S. Citizenship status is required, as this position will need a U.S. Security Clearance within 1 year of start date.

Desired Skills:

•Sense of process discipline, order, and attention to detail
•Work with limited supervision and meet commitments for assigned schedule, financial, and technical goals
•Professional engineering experience working within a team environment
•Strong written and interpersonal communication skills
•Ability to prioritize and adapt to sudden changes to priorities
•Knowledge of Configuration Management principles, environments, and tools
•Experience building strong relationships and effectively collaborating with distributed teams across multiple sites
•Experience working and communicating with all levels of management and individual contributors on the program team
•Production environment experience is preferred
•Knowledge and experience with Presidio/ITAS test automation system
•Mechanical design concepts

Required Education:

•Bachelor's degree in a related STEM discipline
•BS and 6 years of experience, MS and 4 years of experience, PhD and 2 years of experience.

Desired Education:

•Master's degree in related STEM discipline
•Bachelors Electrical and Computer Engineering (ECE) dual/double major

This position requires a U.S. person or the ability to obtain an Export Authorization from the appropriate government agency for non-U.S. persons. 169092

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","McKinney, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
199,"Sr Software Engineer, Batch",$68k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description


What We Do

We design, develop, deploy, and support batch systems. We store every order, cancel, and execution with care. We architect systems that can deal with billions of events per day. We optimize for increases in data volumes. We live and breathe automation. We are analytical thinkers. We are always learning our craft. If it’s broken, we fix it. If it needs refactoring, we refactor it. If it’s hard to test, we make it testable. We are pragmatic. We ship code weekly. We’re looking for like-minded individuals to join us.

Requirements
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent in Computer Science or related field preferred.
Strong knowledge of data structures and algorithms.
Experience with Python or experience in another language with a strong desire to learn Python.
Experience with Linux or UNIX-like systems and knowledge of at least one scripting language.
Experience with relational databases required, experience with Hadoop desirable.
Self-directed, self-motivated.
The Cboe Experience

Whether you are just beginning your career or are a senior-level professional, working at Cboe will offer you countless opportunities to develop skills, make an impact through meaningful contributions, and gain rich experiences at an accelerated pace. By working collaboratively with smart, genuine and hardworking colleagues, you will build enduring relationships through frequent collaboration that will serve you well throughout your career, regardless of your chosen path. And, along your exceptional career journey at Cboe you’ll receive amazing benefits and robust rewards.

Equal Employment Opportunity
We're proud to be an equal opportunity employer - and celebrate our associates' differences, including race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, and Veteran status.

Cboe Global Markets is an Equal Opportunity Employer. For more information, please click the following links:

Equal Employment Opportunity is The Law (in English)

Equal Employment Opportunity is The Law (in Spanish)
Equal Employment Opportunity is The Law (Supplement)

E-Verify Participation Poster (English)

E-Verify Participation Poster (Spanish)

Right to Work Poster (English)

Right to Work Poster (Spanish)",3.5,"Cboe Global Markets
3.5","Lenexa, KS",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1973,Company - Public,Stock Exchanges,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
